abandonment|See: riddance


Abhisambodhikaya|See: Corpus of Manifest Enlightenment
abiding nature|The lasting, enduring nature of all phenomena; the voidness of all phenomena.
abiding traits|See: naturally abiding family-traits
Able One|An epithet of a Buddha - one who has been able to reach the goal of enlightenment and is able to benefit all beings as much as is possible.
Able Sage|See: Able One

absence, absolute|See: absolute absence
absence, bare|See: bare absence

absolute absence|The absence of something impossible; the absence of something that has never existed and never can exist.
absolute nullification|The refutation of the possibility that something could exist.
absorbed concentration|Perfect concentration fully absorbed or sunk into an object of focus.

absorption on voidness, clear light|See: clear light absorption on voidness
absorption, total|See: total absorption
abstraction, nonstatic|See: noncongruent affecting variable
abstraction, static|See: static phenomenon

access clear light mental activity|Through advanced meditation practices of the anuttarayoga tantra complete stage, to reach the clear light level of mind -- in the sense of stopping the grosser levels of mind so that the mind operates only on the underlying clear light level, which is the subtlest level of mental activity, and which has been operating with no beginning -- and then both to recognize this subtlest level of mind for what it is and utilize it for cognizing objects.
access rigpa|Through special methods used by a dzogchen master in a personal interaction with a fully prepared dzogchen practitioner, the practitioner reaching the rigpa (pure awareness) level of mind -- in the sense of making the exclusive focus of attention this underlying subtlest, untainted level of mental activity, which has been operating with no beginning -- and then both recognizing rigpa for what it is and making use of its natural properties.
accomplished|See: highly accomplished
accomplishing awareness|See: accomplishing deep awareness
accomplishing deep awareness|One of the five types of deep awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The deep awareness that goes out to a cognitive object and which has the willingness to accomplish something with it, or to do something with it or to it, or to relate to it in some personal way. Also called: deep awareness to accomplish things.
accomplishment|The attainment of a spiritual goal.
accordant nature|A synonym for voidness (emptiness). Some translators render the term as thusness."
accounts, fabulous|See: fabulous accounts
accounts, illustrative|See: illustrative accounts
accounts, past life|See: past life accounts
accounts, revelatory|See: revelatory accounts


accustoming pathway mind|The level of mind of arya shravakas, arya pratyekabuddhas, and arya bodhisattvas with which they accustom themselves to the joined pair of shamatha and vipashyana focused nonconceptually on voidness -- or, in general, on the sixteen aspects of the four noble truths -- and thereby rid themselves of either one or both sets of automatically arising obscurations. Other translators usually render it as path of meditation."
achieve|To attain a goal.
acquired nirvana|States of release from all samsaric sufferings and their true causes, which are attained through the power of meditation.
acquirement|The obtainment or gain of something, such as a vow or a spiritual attainment, imputable on the mental continuum of the one who has gained it. An acquirement or acquiring of something is a noncongruent affecting variable -- a nonstatic phenomenon that is neither a form of material phenomena nor a way of being aware of something.
acquisition|See: acquirement
acting cause|All phenomena, other than the result itself, which do not impede the production of the result.
action, faulty|See: faulty actions
action, karmic|See: karmic action
action, naturally destructive uncommendable|See: naturally uncommendable action
action, naturally uncommendable|See: naturally uncommendable action
action, prohibited uncommendable|See: prohibited uncommendable action
action, thick|See: thick actions
action, uncommendable|See: uncommendable action
activate|To cause a karmic tendency to become a manifest karmic impulse that will give its result in the next moment. Also translated as arouse."

actual attainment|A significant spiritual goal that one actually attains or, literally, makes actual or makes real on one's mental continuum. The ordinary actual attainments refer to extrasensory and extraphysical powers, while the supreme actual attainment refers to enlightenment.
actual clear light mind|A subtlest level of consciousness that has a nonconceptual, blissful cognition of voidness.
actual fundamental part|The main part of a text or practice, containing the actual discussion of the principal topic.
actuality|See: actual nature
actualization|See: actualize
actualize|To attain a spiritual goal. To make the attainment of a spiritual goal really (actually) happen. Also translated as attain and attainment."
actual nature|A synonym for voidness (emptiness) or, in some mahamudra and dzogchen systems, the nature of everything as the play of inseparable awareness and voidness.
actual state|The full definitional state of something, such as one of levels of mental constancy.
actual state of the first dhyana|See: actual state of the first level of mental stability
actual state of the first level of mental stability|A state of mind attained on the basis of the attainment of a stilled and settled state of shamatha and which temporarily blocks all disturbing emotions and attitudes directed at phenomena on the plane of sensory desires (the desire realm). The various types of advanced awareness arise as a byproduct of the attainment of this state of mind. Also called: actual state of the first dhyana."
advanced awareness|Nonconceptual straightforward cognition of places, times, and distances that are obscure phenomena and of situations that are extremely obscure phenomena. A general term for both the five types of advanced awareness and the six extrasensory eyes, both of which are gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana). Sometimes also translated as heightened awareness or extrasensory perception."
advanced awareness for extraphysical emanation|Cognition that is able to produce many different simultaneous emanations that are any one of three types: (1) physical emanations made of the five elements of earth, water, fire, wind, and space, (2) verbal emanations - speaking in such a way that various people can understand the words in their own languages and at their own levels of understanding, or (3) mental emanations of thoughts and levels of mind, such as awareness of many levels of meaning of a Dharma passage. One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana).
advanced awareness of knowing other's minds|Cognition of others' thoughts and states of mind. One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana).
advanced awareness of recollection of past situations|Cognition of past lives. One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana).
advanced awareness of the depletion of tainted factors|One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana). Cognition of one's own state of being rid forever of the emotional obscurations preventing liberation from samsara.
advanced awareness of the divine ear|Cognition that is able to hear sounds at any distance and to understand them, regardless of language. One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana).
advanced awareness of the divine eye|One of the six types of advanced awareness gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental constancy (the first dhyana). (1) According to the Karma Kagyu explanation, cognition of the different effects of karma on different beings, such as their future rebirths. (2) According to Gelug, cognition of gross (obvious) forms and subtle forms, including those at great distances in space and time.


affected|To be influenced by or conditioned by causes and conditions.
affected phenomenon|A phenomenon that arises because of the  influence of causes and conditions, and which changes because of constantly being influenced by causes and conditions. This refers to all nonstatic phenomena. Translators often render the term as conditioned phenomenon."
affecting|To influence or condition other things so that it contributes to causing effects to happen.
affecting impulses|See: link of affecting impulses
affecting impulses, link of|See: link of affecting impulses
affecting variable|A phenomenon that continually changes (a nonstatic phenomenon) and which influences other nonstatic phenomenon to arise, in the sense that it contributes to causing them to happen.
affecting variables, aggregate of other|See: aggregate of other affecting variables

affirmation|See: affirmation phenomenon
affirmation phenomenon|An item, or a truth about an item, defined in terms of the establishment of something, without an object to be negated being explicitly precluded by the sounds that express it.

affirmingly known phenomenon|See: affirmation phenomenon
affirming negation|See: implicative negation phenomenon

affliction, emotional|See: disturbing emotion or attitude

aftermath|See: karmic aftermath
aftermath, karmic|See: karmic aftermath
agent|The person who commits an action.
aggregate|A network of many items, all of which are nonstatic phenomena. See also: aggregate factors of experience.
aggregate factors of experience|The five networks (five aggregates) that constitute all the nonstatic phenomena that make up each moment of the mental continuum of each limited being.
aggregate of consciousness|See: aggregate of primary consciousnesses
aggregate of distinguishing|One of the five aggregate factors of experience. The network of all instances of the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of distinguishing that could be part of any moment of experience on someone's mental continuum. Some translators render the term as aggregate of recognition. See: distinguishing.
aggregate of feelings|See: aggregate of feelings of levels of happiness
aggregate of feelings of levels of happiness|One of the five aggregate factors of experience. The network of all instances of the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of feeling a level of happiness or unhappiness that could be part of any moment of experience on someone's mental continuum. Also called aggregate of feelings. See: feeling a level of happiness.
aggregate of forms|See: aggregate of forms of physical phenomena
aggregate of forms of physical phenomena|One of the five aggregate factors of experience. The network of all instances of all types of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, physical sensations, physical sensors, and forms of physical phenomena included only among the cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena. Any of these can be part of any moment of experience on someone's mental continuum. Also called aggregate of forms."
aggregate of karmic formations|See: aggregate of other affecting variables
aggregate of other affecting variables|One of the five aggregate factors of experience. The network of all instances of subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors), other than feelings of levels of happiness and distinguishing, as well as all instances of noncongruent affecting variables, that could be part of any moment of experience on someone's mental continuum.  Some translators render the term as aggregate of volitions or aggregate of karmic formations."
aggregate of primary consciousnesses|One of the five aggregate factors of experience. The network of all instances of mental consciousness or of any of the five types of sensory consciousness that could be part of any moment of experience on someone's mental continuum. It also includes the network of all instances of deluded awareness and all-encompassing foundation consciousness in those systems that assert these two. Also called: aggregate of consciousness."
aggregate of recognition|See: aggregate of distinguishing
aggregate of volitions|See: aggregate of other affecting variables
aggregates, obtaining|See: obtaining aggregates
aggregates, tainted|See: tainted aggregates
aggregates, untainted|See: untainted aggregates
aging and dying|In a particular rebirth, the period starting immediately after the moment of conception and ending with the moment of death.
aging and dying, link of|See: link of aging and dying
aim, causal motivating|See: causal motivating aim
aim, contemporaneous motivating|See: contemporaneous motivating aim
aim, motivating|See: motivating aim
alaya|See: basis for all
alaya, deep-awareness|See: deep awareness alaya
alaya for habits|In the dzogchen system, foundational awareness for the habits of grasping for truly established existence, for karma, and for memories. The type of limited awareness that basis rigpa functions as, when it is mixed with dumbfoundedness.
alaya, primordial deepest|See: primordial deepest alaya
alaya, specific-awareness|See: specific-awareness alaya
alayavijnana|See: all-encompassing foundation consciousness
alertness|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that checks the condition of mindfulness's mental hold on the object of focus. It sees if the mental hold has been lost or is too weak or too tight due to flightiness of mind or mental dullness. It is more, however, than just reflexive awareness or implicit apprehension, which merely notices what is happening with the meditation. It resembles an alarm system to trigger a response with restoring attention to correct any faults.
all-encompassing|Including everything within its domain.
all-encompassing foundation consciousness|An unspecified, nonobstructive, individual consciousness that underlies all cognition, cognizes the same objects as the cognitions it underlies, but is a nondetermining cognition of what appears to it and lacks clarity of its objects. It carries the karmic legacies of karma and the mental impressions of memories, in the sense that they are imputed on it. It is also translated as foundation consciousness and, by some translators, as storehouse consciousness. According to Gelug, asserted only by the Chittamatra system; according to non-Gelug, assserted by both the Chittamatra and Madhyamaka systems.
all-permeating|The quality of rigpa (pure awareness) that it interpenetrates and pervades all instances of limited awareness (sem) without obstruction, in the same manner as oil permeates sesame seeds.
all-pervasive|Pertaining to everything.
all-pervasively affecting suffering|The suffering that comes simply from having tainted aggregates that serve as the basis for experiencing the suffering of suffering and the suffering of change. Such suffering is all-pervasive since it affects every moment of samsaric experience.
all-pervasive suffering|See: all-pervasively affecting suffering


amulet box tradition|A tradition of mahamudra meditation transmitted in the Shangpa Kagyu school.
analysis|See: subtle discernment
analysis, discerning|See: subtle discernment
analytical meditation|See: discerning meditation

ancient narratives|Stories from ancient times that Buddha told. One of the twelve scriptural categories.

anger|A root disturbing emotion, aimed at another limited being, one's own suffering, or situations entailing suffering, and which is impatient with them and wishes to get rid of them, such as by damaging or hurting them, or by striking out against them. It is based on regarding its object as unattractive or repulsive by its very nature.

antecedent practice for realization|A visualization practice in which one imagines oneself to be a Buddha-figure, for which one has received empowerment, and which one does as a method for actualizing oneself as the figure. It is antecedent in the sense of being a meditation practice undertaken both before and as a condition for being able to actualize oneself as the Buddha-figure. Synonymous with sadhana."
antigods|See: would-be divine


anuttarayoga tantra|In the Sarma (New Translation Period) Tibetan Buddhist schools, the fourth or highest class of tantra practice, emphasizing special internal methods for actualizing oneself as a Buddha-figure.

anuyoga tantra|In the Nyingma system, the second of the three inner classes of tantra, emphasizing practices involving the subtle energy-system of winds, channels, and creative energy-drops.
apparent Buddha Gem|The Corpus of Forms of a Buddha, as a source of safe direction.
apparent Dharma Gem|The twelve textual categories of teachings proclaimed by a Buddha's enlightening speech, as a source of safe direction.
apparent level Precious Gems|The level of Three Rare and Supreme Gems that are apparent to limited beings and which conceal a deeper level gem.
apparent Sangha Gem|"The individual person of any arya, whether lay or monastic, as a source of safe direction. 
"
apparent true phenomenon|See: superficial true phenomenon
apparent truth|See: superficial truth
appearance|The mental hologram (mental representation) of any external or internal object of cognition, which arises in the mind. Also called cognitive appearance."
appearance, cognitive|See: appearance
appearance-congealing|One of the three subtle appearance-making minds.
appearance congealment|Also translated as: appearance, white appearance

appearance, deceptive|See: deceptive appearance
appearance, giving rise to|See: appearance-making
appearance, impure|See: impure appearance
appearance-making|The aspect of mental activity that gives rise to (makes) a mental hologram of an object of cognition.
appearance-making basis rigpa|Pure awareness (rigpa) from the point of view of its aspect of spontaneously establishing appearances. Synonymous with the term effulgent rigpa."
appearance-making, discordant|See: dualistic appearance-making
appearance-making, dual|See: dualistic appearance-making
appearance-making, dualistic|See: dualistic appearance-making

appearance-making of non-true existence|According to the Nyingma school, the aspect of a limited being's sensory or nonconceptual mental activity that gives rise to (makes) a mental hologram of objects of cognition without making them appear to be truly existent thiss or thats, in the sense in which Madhyamaka defines true existence.
appearance-making of true existence|The aspect of a limited being's mental activity that gives rise to (makes) a mental hologram of seemingly true existence. It makes the mental holograms of objects of cognition appear to be truly existent, in the sense in which the Madhyamaka schools define true existence. In the non-Gelug systems, it occurs only with conceptual cognition and it makes appearances of objects of cognition to be truly thiss and thats.
appearance, pure|See: pure appearance
appearance, reflexive|See: reflexive appearance
appearances, discordant|See: dualistic appearances
appearances, dual|See: dualistic appearances
appearances, dualistic|See: dualistic appearances
appearances of non-true existence|In the Nyingma system, mental holograms of objects of cognition, which do not make them appear as if they were truly existent thiss or thats. This occurs only with sensory and nonconceptual mental cognition.

appearing object|The mental hologram (mental representation) of any external or internal object of cognition, which a cognition gives rise to. Equivalent to the cognitively taken object. Sometimes used interchangeably with mental aspect, and sometimes differentiated from mental aspect in the sense that a cognition takes on the mental aspect of its appearing object.
applying pathway mind|The level of mind of shravakas, pratyekabuddhas, and bodhisattvas with which they apply the joined pair of shamatha and vipashyana, focused conceptually on voidness -- or, in general, on the sixteen aspects of the four noble truths -- and which they gained with a building-up pathway mind, to gaining a nonconceptual focus on voidness. Other translators often render this term as path of preparation."
appreciation|Valuing something highly, usually the kindness of someone. Often used in the context of appreciating the kindness of one's spiritual mentor. Sometimes translated as respect."
apprehend|To cognitively take an object of cognition both correctly and decisively.
apprehension|See: apprehend
apprehension, explicit|See: explicit apprehension
apprehension, implicit|See: implicit apprehension


approximate and actualize oneself as a Buddha-figure|Intensive tantric meditation practice entailing visualization of oneself as a Buddha-figure and recitation of the appropriate mantras.
approximating vacuum|See: threshold
approximation retreat, great|See: great approximation retreat
arhat|A practitioner, of the shravaka, pratyekabuddha, or bodhisattva class, who has achieved a true stopping of the emotional obscurations and thus has attained liberation (nirvana). Also called a liberated being. Some translators render the term as foe-destroyer."
arhatship|The state of an arhat.
arise|See: dawn
arise, making|See: making arise
arising|See: cognitive arising
arising, automatically|See: automatically arising
arising, cognitive|See: cognitive arising
arising, simultaneously|See: simultaneously arising

arouse|The process through which a disturbing emotion or attitude brings on the arising of a karmic impulse. Also translated as activate."
artificial|See: contrived
arya|A practitioner who has had nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths and thus has attained a shravaka, pratyekabuddha, or bodhisattva seeing pathway of mind (path of seeing). Also called a highly realized practitioner or a highly realized being. Some translators render the term as noble one."
arya bodhisattva|A bodhisattva that has attained nonconceptual cognition of voidness. See also: bodhisattva.
arya pathway mind|The three pathway minds of shravaka, pratyekabuddha, and bodhisattva aryas (those with nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths) -- namely, their seeing and accustoming pathway minds, and their pathway minds needing no further training.
arya pratyekabuddha|A pratyekabuddha that has attained nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths. See also: pratyekabuddha.
arya shravaka|A shravaka that has attained nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths. See also: shravaka.
ascertain|See: decisively determine
ascertainment|A decisive cognition of a cognitive object; decisively knowing what an object of cognition is or how it exists. Also translated as decisive awareness and decisive cognition."
aspect, mental|See: mental aspect
aspects, naturally inseparable|See: natural inseparability
aspirational prayer|(1) A prayer for the attainment of a spiritual goal or of the circumstances conducive for reaching that goal. (2) In the context of the ten Mahayana far-reaching attitudes, a special discriminating awareness concerning phenomena toward which to aspire. This discriminating awareness is in connection with the aspiration never to be parted from a bodhichitta aim in all one's lifetimes and for the continuity of one's far-reaching activities for benefiting all beings never to be broken.
aspiring bodhichitta|A mind of bodhichitta which, when focused on one's own individual future enlightenment, is accompanied by the aspiration or wish to attain that enlightenment.
aspiring state of aspiring bodhichitta|See: merely aspiring state of aspiring bodhichitta

asserting one's identity|The fourth of the four obtainers that constitute the ninth link of dependent arising. Equivalent to a deluded outlook toward a transitory network.
assertion|A position, accepted by a Buddhist or non-Buddhist tenet system, in regard to a philosophical point.
assistant tutor|See: Master Debate Partner
associated with confusion|See: tainted
asura|See: would-be divine
atiyoga|In the Nyingma system, the third of the three classes of inner tantras, in which meditation practices to actualize the immediate causes for an enlightening mind and Corpus of Forms of a Buddha are emphasized.


attachment|The disturbing emotion that exaggerates the good qualities of an object that one possesses and does not wish to let go of it.
attachment, sticky|See: sticky attachment
attain|See: actualize

attainment, actual|See: actual attainment
attainment, subsequent|See: subsequent attainment
attention|The ever-functioning mental factor that engages mental activity with a specific cognitive object. The cognitive engagement may be merely to pay some level of attention to the object (strong or weak), or to focus on the object in a certain way (painstakingly, effortlessly, etc.), or to consider the object in a certain way (concordantly or discordantly). Also called: paying attention, consideration, take to mind, taking to mind.
attention, restoring|See: restoring attention
attitude|A mental factor that takes its cognitive object by regarding it from a certain point of view.
attitude, distorted antagonistic|See: distorted antagonistic thinking
attitude, disturbing|See: disturbing attitude
attitude, far-reaching|See: far-reaching attitude
attitude, nominal disturbing|See: nominal disturbing attitude
attitude of confusion|See: confusion
attitude-training|A spiritual training in which one cleanses disturbing attitudes from one's mind and trains to replace them with constructive attitudes. Also called: cleansing of attitudes, mind-training, Lojong.

audio category|The conceptual category of the sound of a word or name, in which the sound of all individual pronunciations of the word or name fit, regardless of the voice, volume, or pronunciation with which it is spoken.
audio universal|See: audio category
auditory consciousness|See: ear consciousness
automatically arising|Naturally arising or occurring on a mental continuum from time to time, without being based on previously having been taught an incorrect tenet system. When something, such as a constructive or a disturbing emotion automatically arises, it does so from a tendency for that emotion, built up from previous occurrences of the same emotion, and does not entail the occurrence or production of an emotion that has never occurred before.
automatically arising disturbing emotions and attitudes|Disturbing emotions and attitudes that arise on a person's mental continuum without being based on that person having been taught an incorrect tenet system.
automatically arising ignorance|See: automatically arising unawareness
automatically arising unawareness|The mental factor of either not knowing or knowing invertedly either behavioral cause and effect or the manner in which the self and all phenomena exist, and which arises on a person's mental continuum without being based on that person having been taught an incorrect tenet system. Others often translate it as automatically arising ignorance or innate ignorance."
automatically liberates itself in its own place|See: automatically releases itself in its own place
automatically releases itself in its own place|The quality of a conceptual thought or cognition that it ceases or dissolves simultaneously with its arisal, without any effort required to make it cease. Also called: automatically liberates itself in its own place.


auxiliary bonding practices|A set of nine practices and attitudes that, during an anuttarayoga tantra empowerment, one pledges to maintain in order to keep a close connection with tantra practice.
auxiliary disturbing emotions|A set of twenty disturbing emotions that derive from one of the three poisonous emotions of longing desire, hostility, or naivety. See: disturbing emotions and attitudes.
auxiliary secondary tantric vows|See: auxiliary thick actions
auxiliary thick actions|A set of  actions, in addition to the eight thick actions, that, at either a yoga or anuttarayoga empowerment, one vows to avoid and which, if committed, weaken meditation practice and hamper progress along the tantra path. Also called: auxiliary secondary tantric vows.


aversion|See: anger
awareness|The most general, all-inclusive term for cognizing an object. It is used in the sense of both being aware of something and making something an object of awareness, but not necessarily as a conscious act of will or knowing what the object is.
awareness, accomplishing|See: accomplishing deep awareness
awareness, advanced|See: advanced awareness
awareness, basis or fundamental realized|See: basis or fundamental realized awareness
awareness, clear light|See: clear light awareness
awareness, decisive|See: ascertainment
awareness, deep|See: deep awareness
awareness, discriminating|See: discriminating awareness
awareness, discriminating extraordinary|See: extraordinary discriminating awareness
awareness, discriminating ordinary|See: ordinary discriminating awareness
awareness, general|See: general awareness
awareness, limited|See: sem
awareness, normal|See: normal awareness
awareness of its own face|The nonconceptual cognition, by rigpa (pure awareness), of its own nature.
awareness, omniscient realized|See: omniscient realized awareness
awareness, pathway realized|See: pathway realized awareness
awareness, primally pure|See: primal purity
awareness, principal|See: principal awareness
awareness, pure|See: pure awareness
awareness, reflexive|See: reflexive awareness
awareness, reflexive deep|See: reflexive deep awareness
awareness, specific|See: specific awareness
awareness, subsidiary|See: subsidiary awareness

axioms, four|See: four axioms
balanced sensitivity|The mental state of being neither overly or underly attentive and neither overly, underly, or inappropriately responsive, both with feelings and actions, to either the situation of others or oneself, or the effect of one's behavior on others or on oneself.
bardo|The state of existence from the moment immediately after death until the moment immediately before conception. Translated as the inbetween state."
bardo existence|The period of time in the mental continuum of an individual limited being starting from the moment immediately after death until the moment immediately before conception.
bare|Without concepts or conceptual cognition.
bare absence|The natural state of being without concepts or conceptual cognition, which is the natural state or nature of awareness (mind). Also translated as bareness."
bare cognition|Cognition of a cognitive object without that cognition being through the medium of a concept, universal, or category.
bareness|See: bare absence


bases for conceptually isolated items|In Gelug, equivalent to individually characterized object exclusions of something else, which serve as the bases for imputation of the corresponding conceptually isolated items. For instance, the nonstatic negation phenomenon nothing other than 'this,' implicitly apprehended when explicitly apprehending this and which serves as the basis for imputation of the static negation phenomenon nothing other than this, which is the mental representation of nothing other than 'this' in the conceptual cognition of this."


basis for all|A synonym for rigpa (pure awareness), used primarily in treasure texts of the mind division.
basis for designation|See: basis for labeling
basis for imputation|See: basis for labeling
basis for labeling|A phenomenon on which another phenomenon is mentally labeled. Also translated as basis for imputation or basis for designation."
basis level|In the context of basis, pathway, and resultant levels of something being specified, the level of something - for instance, the level of Buddha-nature -- that occurs in general, whether or not one has achieved some attainment on the Buddhist spiritual path.


basis rigpa|Pure awareness (rigpa) from the point of view of it being a type of Buddha-nature or working basis for attaining enlightenment.


becoming|See: link of further existence

behavioral cause and effect|The principles of karma, whereby certain actions produce certain effects. The cause is one's behavior – how one acts, speaks, and thinks – and the effect is what one experiences. Behavioral cause and effect is about the connection between one's behavior and what one experiences as a result.
behavior, tamed|See: tamed behavior

being, divine|See: divine being
being, individual|See: person
being, limited|See: limited being
being, ordinary|See: ordinary being
being, sentient|See: limited being
being true to one's word|The mental state with which, once one gives one's word to do something to benefit others, one does not break one's promise. The seventh of the ten far-reaching attitudes developed by bodhisattvas according to the Theravada tradition.
belief in a fact based on reason|A constructive emotion that considers a fact about something to be true, based on having thought, with logic, about the reasons that prove it. Also called confident belief."
belief in a fact, clearheaded|See: clearheaded belief in a fact
belief in a fact with an aspiration|A constructive emotion that considers true both a fact about something and a wish one holds about that object, such as that one can attain a positive goal and that one will attain it.
belief in facts|See: believing a fact to be true
believing a fact to be true|A constructive emotion that focuses on something existent and validly knowable, something with good qualities, or an actual potential, and considers it either existent or true, or considers a fact about it as true. Some translators render the term as faith."
believing a fact to be true based on reason|See: belief in a fact based on reason

benevolence|The mental factor of wishing to benefit others, wishing others well. Often translated by others as altruism."

bewilderment|A naive state of mind of not know what is happening.
Bhagavan|See: Vanquishing Master Surpassing All


bhumi-mind|A level of mind of an arya bodhisattva with either a seeing or an accustoming pathway mind. Some translators render the term as bodhisattva stage or simply as stage or ground."


binding factors, four|See: four binding factors


Blessed One|See: Vanquishing Master Surpassing All
blessings|See: inspiration

bliss|See: blissful awareness
blissful awareness|A state of mind, either tainted or untainted, characterized by varying levels of intensity of happiness. Some of the untainted ones can be utilized in anuttarayoga tantra practice as the type of awareness with which to focus on voidness, and as an aid for dissolving the energy-winds in the central channel in order to gain access to clear light awareness.



Blissfully Gone One|An epithet of a Buddha - one who has reached the blissful goal of enlightenment through methods that produce happiness along the way to reaching that goal.

block, mental|See: mental block

bodhi|See: purified state
bodhichitta|Usually used in the meaning of relative bodhichitta: A mind or heart focused first on the benefit of all limited beings and then on one's own individual not-yet-happening enlightenment, validly imputable on the basis of the Buddha-nature factors of one's mental continuum, with the intention to attain that enlightenment and to benefit others by means of that attainment. Alternative Tibetan: byang-sems.
bodhichitta aim|The type of aim, goal, or focus that a bodhichitta mind has. Used as a synonym for bodhichitta.
bodhichitta, aspiring|See: aspiring bodhichitta
bodhichitta, conventional|See: conventional bodhichitta
bodhichitta, deepest|See: deepest bodhichitta
bodhichitta, engaged|See: engaged bodhichitta
bodhichitta motivation|The kind of motivation that bodhichitta is. Used as a synonym for bodhichitta.
bodhichitta, pledged aspiring|See: pledged state of aspiring bodhichitta
bodhichitta, pledged state of aspiring|See: pledged state of aspiring bodhichitta
bodhichitta, relative|See: conventional bodhichitta
bodhichitta, ultimate|See: deepest bodhichitta
bodhichitta, unlabored|See: unlabored bodhichitta
bodhisattva|Someone who has developed unlabored bodhichitta.
bodhisattva arhats of definite lineage|Bodhisattvas who have been definite about their lineage as bodhisattvas from before attaining arhatship and thus who have attained arhatship as bodhisattvas and not as shravakas or pratyekabuddhas before developing bodhichitta.

bodhisattva bhumis|See: bhumi-mind
bodhisattva vows|The set of restraints from committing certain actions (eighteen root downfalls and forty-six faulty actions) that, if committed, would be detrimental to achieving enlightenment and benefiting all others.

Body Encompassing Everything|See: Corpus Encompassing Everything
body mandala|A network of Buddha-figures arranged inside the body of a Buddha-figure.
Body of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything|See: Corpus of Deep Awareness' Encompassing Everything
Body of Deep Awareness' Enlightening Influence|See: Corpus of Deep Awareness' Enlightening Influence
Body of Essential Nature|See: Corpus of Essential Nature
Body of Forms|See: Corpus of Forms
Body of Full Use|See: Corpus of Full Use
Body of Great Bliss|See: Corpus of Great Bliss
Body of Manifest Enlightenment|See: Corpus of Manifest Enlightenment
body, rainbow|See: rainbow body
body, subtle|See: subtle body
body, subtlest|See: subtlest body
body, vajra|See: vajra-body
Bon|The pre-Buddhist spiritual tradition of Tibet.
bonding practice|A type of behavior or a state of mind, which, when practiced, maintains a close connection with either a certain tantra or a certain spiritual master. Also called: closely bonding practice, close bond.
bonding practices, auxiliary|See: auxiliary bonding practices
bonding substances|Substances, such as alcohol and meat, purified, transformed, and consecrated during a tantra ritual and offered to a Buddha-figure in order to maintain a close bond (close connection) with that figure, as one has promised to do.
Bonpo|A follower of the Bon tradition.
boon experience|In mahamudra meditation, an experience of bliss, clarity, nonconceptuality, and bareness that arises as a bonus result of the attainment of a stilled and settled state of shamatha. With this experience, the meditator still has a dualistic sense of there being the meditator on the one side and, on the other, these four as things to be meditated on or experienced.

bountiful field|A bountiful field for growing positive force, and that is shortened to bountiful field. It is usually translated as merit-field by others. Bountiful here means that it gives abundant crop.
bountiful store of positive force|See: network of positive force

break-through|The practice, and resultant stage of the practice, in dzogchen during which one breaks through the level of limited mind (sems) and both recognizes and accesses essence rigpa, thereby attaining a seeing pathway of mind (path of seeing) and becoming an arya.
break-through stage|See: break-through

Buddha|A fully enlightened being; someone who has totally eliminated, forever, from his or her mental continuum both the emotional and cognitive obscurations.
Buddha-activity|See: enlightening influence
Buddha-Bodies, Five|See: Five Corpuses of a Buddha
Buddha-Bodies, Four|See: Four Corpuses of a Buddha
Buddha-Bodies, Three|See: Three Corpuses of a Buddha
Buddha-Bodies, Two|See: Two Corpuses of a Buddha
Buddha-Body|See: Corpus of a Buddha

Buddha-field|A non-samsaric realm in which the circumstances are the most conducive for uninterrupted intense spiritual practice for gaining Buddhahood. It is a field in the sense of being a place in which one can grow or develop a tremendous amount of positive force (merit). It is synonymous with a pure-land.
Buddha-figure|An emanated form of a Buddha, often with multiple faces, arms, and legs, which tantric practitioners visualize themselves as. This is done in order to create a close bond with the figure so as to be able to attain enlightenment, in the form of that figure, through such practice.
Buddha Gem, apparent|See: apparent Buddha Gem
Buddha Gem, deepest|See: deepest Buddha Gem
Buddha Gem, nominal|See: nominal Buddha Gem


Buddha-nature|Literally: Buddha caste-trait, Buddha family-trait. A factor imputable on the stained mind of a limited being (sentient being) that transforms into or allows for the attainment of enlightenment.




Buddhism professor|A teacher, either lay or monastic, Western or Asian, who imparts information about Buddhism gained from scriptural knowledge and/or scholarly research.


building-up pathway mind|The level of mind with which shravakas, pratyekabuddhas, or bodhisattvas build up, among other good qualities, the joined pair of a stilled and settled state of mind (shamatha) and an exceptionally perceptive state of mind (vipashyana) focused conceptually on voidness -- or, in general, on the sixteen aspects of the four noble truths. It only pertains to shravakas and pratyekabuddhas once they have attained an unlabored determination to be free, or to bodhisattvas once, in addition, they have attained unlabored bodhichitta. Others often render this term as path of accumulation."

calm abiding|See: stilled and settled state of mind


carefulness|See: caring attitude

caring attitude|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that takes seriously the situations of others and oneself, and the effects of one's actions on others and on oneself, and which consequently causes one to build up as a habit constructive attitudes and behavior and safeguards against leaning toward tainted or destructive attitudes and behavior. Also translated as carefulness."
caring heart|See: caring attitude
caring love|See: love


category|A phenomenon shared in common by the individuals on which it is imputed. Some translators render the term as universal or generality. For a fuller definition, see: conceptual category.
causal conditions|All the causes that have the power to produce a specific result.

causal links that actualize|In the twelve links of dependent arising, the three links of craving, an obtainer, and further existence, which activate the karmic aftermath of throwing karma in the moments preceding death so that the karmic results will actualize. Thus, they serve as the simultaneously acting conditions for the aggregates of a next rebirth.
causal links that throw|In the twelve links of dependent arising, the two and a half links of unawareness, affecting impulses, and causal loaded consciousness, which describe the process through which throwing karma is built up and its karmic aftermath is planted on a mental continuum as the cause for a next rebirth.
causal motivating aim|What someone intends or aims to do just before starting to do something and which causes the person to do it.
causal taking of safe direction|A taking of safe direction (refuge) in which the sources of that safe direction are the persons or phenomena that act as causes for one's our own attainments of the Three Gems, namely the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha already attained by others. Synonymous with mere taking of safe direction."
"
cause|A nonstatic phenomenon able to bring about the production or arising of something.
cause, acting|See: acting cause
cause and effect|See: behavioral cause and effect
cause and effect, behavioral|See: behavioral cause and effect
cause, congruent|See: congruent cause
cause, direct|See: direct cause
cause, driving|See: driving cause
cause, equal status|See: equal status cause
cause, material|See: obtaining cause
cause, obtaining|See: obtaining cause
cause, ripening|See: ripening cause
cause, similar family|See: similar family cause
cause, simultaneously acting|See: simultaneously acting cause




ceremonial round of offering a ritual feast|A tantra ritual, part of a puja, in which specially consecrated offerings, usually including a torma,  are made to one's spiritual master inseparable from a Buddha-figure. In anuttarayoga tantra, the offerings include consecrated alcohol and meat. Often refered to by the Tibetan tsog."





characteristics, inherent|See: inherent characteristics

charya tantra|Tibetan Buddhist schools, the second class of tantra practice, which equally emphasizes external behavior and internal methods

cherishing concerned love|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) with which, not only does one wish others to be happy and to have the causes for happiness, but with which one values the welfare of others highly and would feel sad if anything bad happened to them.
cherishing others|The attitude with which one considers others as the most precious and important ones; and has affection for and takes care of mainly others.
Chittamatra|A Mahayana school of Indian Buddhism that does not assert external phenomena, but which does assert the true existence of dependent phenomena. One of the four Indian Buddhist tenet systems studied by all traditions of Tibetan Buddhism; the Mind-Only School.


clarity|As a defining characteristic of mind, the ability, mental activity, or event of making cognitive objects arise -- or giving rise to cognitive objects -- so that they can be cognized. According to the Gelug tradition, a mental hologram of the cognitive object need not even arise in the cognition, since the object may be implicitly cognized. Clarity is not some sort of light in one's head that has varying intensity and illuminates objects that are already present. Nor does it have anything to do with an object of cognition being in focus or being understood. Moreover, giving rise to a cognitive object has no implication of passivity or lack of responsibility on the one hand, or conscious will on the other. As an event, clarity just naturally happens every moment of every mental continuum.
clarity and appearances, unified pair of|See: unified pair of clarity and appearances


cleansing of attitudes|See: attitude-training
clearheaded belief in a fact|A constructive emotion that is clear about a fact and, like a water purifier, clears the mind of disturbing emotions and attitudes about the object.
clearheadedly believing a fact to be true|See: clearheaded belief in a fact
clear light absorption on voidness|Total absorption, with clear light awareness, on voidness (emptiness).
clear light awareness|The subtlest level of mental activity (mind), which continues with no beginning and no end, without any break, even during death and even into Buddhahood. It is individual and constitutes the mental continuum of each being. It is naturally free of conceptual cognition, the appearance-making of true existence, and grasping for true existence, since it is more subtle than the grosser levels of mental activity with which these occur. It has nothing to do with light."

clear light, cognitive|See: cognitive clear light
clear light mental activity|See: clear light awareness
clear light mind|See: clear light awareness
clear light mind, actual|See: actual clear light mind
clear light mind, model|See: model clear light mind
clear light, object|See: object clear light
clear light, subject|See: cognitive clear light



close bond|See: bonding practice
closed-mindedness|A mental factor of being naive about cause and effect or about reality, and being stubbornly closed to any suggestions from someone else. Sometimes used as a translation for gti-mug, moha,naivety. See: naivety.
closely bonding practice|See: bonding practice
close placements of mindfulness, four|See: four close placements of mindfulness
cloth mandala|A two-dimensional representation, painted on cloth, which is like an architectural blueprint of the three-dimensional palace, environment, and Buddha-figures of a symbolic world system, and used for conferring a tantric empowerment.
clutching ghost|One of the three worse rebirth states, characterized by the suffering of being unable to satisfy basic needs, such as hunger and thirst, and caused primarily by miserliness. Translated by most others as hungry ghost, which is a literal rendering of the Chinese translation for the term, adopted by the Chinese in reference to the spirits of departed ancestors that suffered when not presented with regular offerings of food.
co-arising|Arising simultaneously with each moment of experience, for example a blissful awareness itself or a blissful awareness of voidness, attained with complete stage practice of anuttarayogatantra.
cognition|(1) The act of cognizing or knowing something, but without necessarily knowing what it is or what it means. It may be either valid or invalid, conceptual or nonconceptual . This is the most general term for knowing something. (2) The package of a primary consciousness, its accompanying mental factors (subsidiary awarenesses), and the cognitive object shared by all of them. According to some systems, a cognition also includes reflexive awareness.
cognition, bare|See: bare cognition
cognition, conceptual|See: conceptual cognition
cognition, deceptive|See: deceptive cognition
cognition, direct|See: direct cognition
cognition, distorted|See: distorted cognition
cognition, explicit|See: explicit apprehension
cognition, implicit|See: implicit apprehension
cognition, inattentive|See: nondetermining cognition
cognition, indecisive|See: indecisive wavering
cognition, indirect|See: indirect cognition
cognition, inferential|See: inferential cognition
cognition, invalid|See: invalid cognition
cognition, nonconceptual|See: nonconceptual cognition
cognition, nondetermining|See: nondetermining cognition

cognition, presumptive|See: presumptive cognition
cognition, straightforward|See: straightforward cognition
cognition, subsequent|See: subsequent cognition
cognition, valid|See: valid cognition
cognitive appearance|See: appearance
cognitive arising|A cognitive appearance that has arisen on a mental continuum.
cognitive clear light|Clear light awareness that cognizes voidness as its object.
cognitive engagement|A manner of cognizing an object.

cognitively taking an object|Cognizing an object - taking a validly knowable phenomenon as an object of cognition in the sense of cognizing it with either a valid or invalid way of knowing.
cognitively taking an object, way of|See: way of cognitively taking an object
cognitive obscurations|Fleeting stains that temporarily cover or accompany mental activity (more precisely, clear light mental activity), thereby preventing the mental activity from simultaneously cognizing the two truths about all phenomena. Also translated as obscurations about all knowables and obscurations preventing omniscience."
cognitive open space|Rigpa (pure awareness) from the point of view of its essential nature as that which underlies and allows for the arising of appearances and the cognizing of them, with the latter being more prominent. Synonymous with essence rigpa and the cognitive sphere.
cognitive sensor|The dominating condition that determines the type of cognition a way of being aware of something is. In the case of the five types of sensory cognition, it is the photosensitive cells of the eyes, the sound-sensitive cells of the ears, the smell-sensitive cells of the nose, the taste-sensitive cells of the tongue, and the physical-sensation-sensitive cells of the body. In the case of mental cognition, it is the immediately preceding moment of cognition. Some translators render the term as sense power."


cognitive space|See: cognitive open space
cognitive sphere|Rigpa (pure awareness) from the point of view of its essential nature as that which underlies and allows for the arising of appearances and the cognizing of them, with the latter being more prominent. Synonymous with essence rigpa and the cognitive open space.
cognitive stimulator|See: stimulators of cognition
cognitive stimulators that are (all) phenomena|All validly knowable phenomena, all of which may be validly cognized by mental consciousness.
cognitive stimulators that are sights|Forms of physical phenomena that may be cognized by either visual or mental consciousness.
cognize|See: cognition
collection mental synthesis|A whole imputed on spatial, sensorial, and/or temporal parts.
collection of wisdom|See: network of deep awareness
collection synthesis|See: collection mental synthesis
collection universal|See: collection mental synthesis


commanding results|Synonymous with dominating results.
commitment|A spiritual practice that one promises to do. The mental factor with which one makes such a promise. The promise may be made either formally with a ritual or informally, and either verbally or nonverbally. In the case of commitment toward a spiritual master, the mental factor with which one promises to relate to that teacher in a healthy manner, in accord with the traditional scriptural description. The term does not have the connotation of a sense of duty or an obligation.
common denominator|See: common locus
common locus|A common locus of two sets of phenomena is an item that is a member of both sets. Sometimes translated as common denominator."

commonsense object|An external sensory object, extending over the sensibilia (sense data) of several senses and over time; what an ordinary person, when cognizing one moment of the sensibilia of one sense, would impute and consider as an object with his or her common sense. See also: conventional commonsense object.
commotion, ordinary|See: ordinary commotion
compassion|The wish for someone to be free from suffering and from the causes for suffering.
compassionate sympathy|See: compassion
compassion, great|See: great compassion


complete stage|(1) The second stage of anuttarayoga tantra practice, in which everything is now complete for engaging in the practices that act as the immediate causes for reaching enlightenment. These practices entail working with the chakras, channels, and winds of the subtle body. (2) In some non-Gelug texts, nonconceptual meditation on the voidness of the visualizations generated during the first stage of anuttarayoga tantra practice. This meditation on a nondenumerable ultimate phenomenon is done simultaneously with the visualizations, on the same stage of practice, and makes the practice of visualization complete. Many translators render this term as completion stage."
completing karma|A mental urge or impulse having a relatively weak accompanying motivation and therefore having the strength to ripen, as its result, into only the circumstances that will complete the conditions of a future rebirth.
completion stage|See: complete stage


comprehensible phenomena|(1) Phenomena that can be apprehended, which means correctly and decisively cognized. (2) Phenomena that can be validly cognized and understood. Synonymous with validly knowable phenomena (shes-bya).

comprehensive result|See: dominating result

compulsive existence|Existence under the control of karma and disturbing emotions and attitudes. Synonym for uncontrollably recurring existence, samsara.

concentration|See: mental fixation
concentration, absorbed|See: absorbed concentration
concept|A general term for a universal, a category, or a mental label. A concept of something need not be verbal. For example, one has a concept of what a pretty face looks like, what one's mother looks like, what a good soup tastes like, what a properly tuned guitar sounds like, what a valid line of reasoning is, what one plus one equals, and so on.
conception|(1) The moment when the consciousness of a bardo being enters its next rebirth. In the case of rebirth as a human or an animal, the moment in which it enters the sperm and egg of its next parents. (2) See: concept.
conception existence|The period of time in the mental continuum of an individual limited being during which they experience conception. It lasts only one moment. Some translators render the term as birth existence."
conception, link of|See: link of conception
conceptual|Together with a concept.
conceptual category|(1) A general term for both audio categories and meaning/object categories. Some translators render the term as universal or generality. (2)  A set to which individual items sharing a common defining characteristic belong. It is mentally constructed (mentally fabricated) by a mental synthesis of individual items that are instances of it,  or by a mental synthesis of the spatial, sensorial, and/or temporal parts on which it is imputed (labeled). Sometimes translated as mental synthesis or just synthesis."
"
conceptual cognition|The cognition of an object through the medium of a metaphysical entity, namely a universal, a category, or a mental label. Conceptual cognition imputes (mentally labels) a metaphysical entity on the object that the mental aspect it assumes resembles, and mixes and confuses the two.

conceptual isolates|See: conceptually isolated item
conceptualization|The process whereby one cognizes objects conceptually.

conceptualized object|The object about which a conceptual cognition gives rise to a universal, a category, or a mental label through which to think of it. Literally, the object on which a concept clings. Also called: implied object or conceptually implied object.
conceptually cling|In the context of a conceptual cognition, a category's implying an actual object that corresponds to it, as if the category were attached to that conceptually implied object. Also translated as conceptually imply."
conceptually implied object|See: conceptualized object
conceptually imply|See: conceptually cling
conceptually isolated item|The type of nothing-other-than that arises in conceptual cognition and which represents the actual involved objects of the conceptual cognition. They are static phenomena, equivalent to conceptual representations. (1) According to Gelug, they are fully transparent static phenomena that are different from semitransparent conceptual categories. Equivalent to items conceptually isolated by themselves and items conceptually isolated by categories. Also called distinguishers or isolates.(2) Accordant non-Gelug, they are equivalent to semitransparent conceptual categories.
conceptually isolated meaning|In Gelug, equivalent to the defining characteristic mark of a validly knowable phenomenon, which can only be distinguished in terms of a conceptually isolated item.
conceptual representation|The static conceptually isolated items that are the type of nothing-other-than that arises in conceptual cognition. (1) According to Gelug, they represent the actual involved object of the conceptual cognition, for instance of a table, and are fully transparent so that, through them, one directly cognizes the fully transparent mental aspect (the mental hologram of a table) and, through that, an external phenomenon (the table) as the involved object. (2) According to non-Gelug, they are the categories, such as a commonsense table, that are the appearing objects of conceptual cognition.

conceptual thought|See: conceptual cognition
concern|See: caring attitude


concrete|Solid, like cement -- a nontechnical term used to describe something with truly established findable existence.
concretely real|A nontechnical term for an impossible way of existing --  things existing solidly, like cement -- when it is considered to be what and how things actually exist.
concrete me"|A nontechnical term for a truly existent "me, which would be the me to be refuted. See: solid me."
condition|A nonstatic phenomenon that helps shape the conventional identity of something that is produced or arises from causes.
condition, causal|See: causal conditions
condition, dominating|See: dominating condition
conditioned phenomenon|See: affected phenomenon
condition, focal|See: focal condition
condition, immediately preceding|See: immediately preceding condition
condition, objective|See: focal condition
condition, overlord|See: dominating condition


confident belief|See: belief in a fact based on reason


confusion|A nontechnical term used in place of unawareness (ignorance) to simplify a discussion of the topic, but without any connotation of disorganization, disorientation, or dementia.
confusion, associated with|See: tainted
confusion, deceptive|See: deceptive confusion
confusion, dissociated from|See: untainted
congruent|The relationship between ways of being aware of something in the same cognition, in which two or more of these ways share five things in common. Compare: congruent affecting variables.
congruent affecting variable|Ways of being aware of something that share five things in common with the primary consciousness and subsidiary awarenesses of the cognition in which they occur. See: five congruent features.
congruent cause|A cause that shares five things in common with its result.
congruent features, five|See: five congruent features

consciousness|A class of ways of being aware of something that cognizes merely the essential nature of its object, such as its being a sight, a sound, a mental object, etc. Consciousness may be either sensory or mental, and there are either six or eight types. The term has nothing to do with the Western concept of conscious versus unconscious.
consciousness, all-encompassing foundation|See: all-encompassing foundation consciousness
consciousness, body|See: body consciousness
consciousness, ear|See: ear consciousness
consciousness, eye|See: eye consciousness
consciousness, foundation|See: all-encompassing foundation consciousness
consciousness, mental|See: mental consciousness
consciousness, nose|See: nose consciousness
consciousness, primary|See: primary consciousness
consciousness, specific|See: specific awareness
consciousness that takes objects and objects taken by consciousness|Within a cognition, the consciousness and cognitive object.
consciousness, tongue|See: tongue consciousness
consideration|See: attention
consideration, correct|See: paying attention in a concordant manner
consideration, incorrect|See: paying attention in a discordant manner
constancy, mental|See: mental stability
constancy of mind|See: mental stability


constructive|States of mind, or physical, verbal, or mental actions motivated by them, which  ripen into happiness to be experienced by the person on whose mental continuum they occur. Since the term carries no connotation of moral judgment, the translation virtuous is misleading for this term.



contact|See: contacting awareness
contacting awareness|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that differentiates that the object of a cognition is pleasant, unpleasant, or neutral, and thus serves as the foundation for experiencing it with a feeling of happiness, unhappiness, or a neutral feeling.
contacting awareness, link of|See: link of contacting awareness
contaminated aggregates|See: tainted aggregates
contemporaneous motivating aim|The motivating aim or intention that accompanies the impulse to start and to continue an action.

continuum, mental|See: mental continuum
contradictory|See: mutually exclusive
contrived|A state of mind mentally constructed through conceptual thought, such as by going through a line of reasoning. Also translated as artificial."
convention|A word or phrase, agreed upon by a society or an individual, and used in speech and thought to refer to something.

conventional bodhichitta|A mind or heart focused first on the benefit of all limited beings and then on one's own individual not-yet-happening enlightenment, imputable on the basis of the Buddha-nature factors of one's mental continuum, with the intention to attain that enlightenment and to benefit others by means of that attainment.
conventional commonsense object|Literally: conventional objects that one actually experiences when one cognizes them. An object of ordinary experience to which a word or concept refers, and which endures over time and extends over the sensibilia of one or more senses.

conventional object of experience|See: conventional commonsense object
conventional objects that we actually experience when we cognize them|See: conventional commonsense object
conventional true phenomenon|See: superficial true phenomenon
conventional truth|See: superficial truth
conviction, firm|See: firm conviction

Corpus Encompassing Everything|The omniscient mind of a Buddha
Corpuses of a Buddha, Five|See: Five Corpuses of a Buddha
Corpuses of a Buddha, Four|See: Four Corpuses of a Buddha
Corpuses of a Buddha, Three|See: Three Corpuses of a Buddha
Corpuses of a Buddha, Two|See: Two Corpuses of a Buddha
Corpus of a Buddha|A network of enlightening features or aspects of a Buddha, such as those of a Buddha's body, speech, or mind, which are attained with enlightenment and which help to lead others to enlightenment.
Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything|The deep awareness aspect of a Buddha's mind, which is equally aware of the two truths simultaneously, without any break. Also called: Body of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything, Deep Awareness Dharmakaya. Some translators render this term as Wisdom Dharmakaya."

Corpus of Deep Awareness' Enlightening Influence|In some dzogchen systems, the spontaneous, effortless positive influence that a Buddha's omniscient mind exerts on others. Also called: Body of Deep Awareness' Enlightening Influence. Some translators render the term as Wisdom Activity Body."
Corpus of Emanations|The network of grosser forms, which are emanations of a Buddha's Corpus of Full Use, and in which a Buddha appears in order to teach ordinary beings with the karma to be able to meet with them. Also translated sometimes as Emanation Body."
Corpus of Enlightening Forms|See: Corpus of Forms
Corpus of Essential Nature|(1) In the Gelug non-Kalachakra system, the voidness of a Buddha's omniscient mind and its state of being parted from the two sets of obscurations. (2) In the Gelug Kalachakra system, the blissful awareness aspect of a Buddha's omniscient mind. (3) In the Non-Gelug systems, the inseparability of all the Corpuses of a Buddha - equivalent to the inseparability of the two truths. Also called: Body of Essential Nature, Nature Body.

Corpus of Forms|A network of forms in which a Buddha appears in order to benefit others. It includes both the subtle forms of a Corpus of Full Use and the grosser forms of a Corpus of Emanations, Also called: Corpus of Enlightening Forms, Form Body, Body of Forms.
Corpus of Full Use|(1) According to sutra, the network of subtle forms, which make full use of the Mahayana teachings, and in which a Buddha appears in order to teach arya bodhisattvas. (2) According to non-Kalachakra anuttarayoga tantra, the network of all the speech of a Buddha. (3) According to Kalachakra, the network of both the subtle forms and the speech of a Buddha. Also called Body of Full Use. Some translators render this term as Enjoyment Body."
Corpus of Great Bliss|In the dzogchen system, the blissful awareness aspect of a Buddha's omniscient mind.

Corpus of Manifest Enlightenment|According to some dzogchen systems, the appearance-making aspect of the deep awareness of a Buddha's pure appearance. In other words, the appearance-making aspect of a Buddha's omniscient mind.


correct consideration|See: paying attention in a concordant manner



craving|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of a strong longing desire to experience something in the future that one may or may not be experiencing at present. The Sanskrit term means, literally, thirst."
craving because of fear|One of the three types of craving specified particularly in terms of the time of death. Also called: craving to be separated from what is fearful. (1) A strong longing desire to be parted from pain and unhappiness. (2) Holding on to objects of the past.
craving in relation to further existence|One of the three types of craving specified particularly in terms of the time of death. (1) A strong longing desire for a neutral feeling, which one is experiencing, to continue surviving and not degenerate. (2) A strong longing desire for one's own body composed of five aggregates to continue surviving as a basis for craving in relation to what is desirable and craving because of fear. (3) Holding on to objects of the future.
craving in relation to what is desirable|One of the three types of craving specified particularly in terms of the time of death. (1) A strong longing desire not to be parted from the ordinary forms of happiness that one is currently experiencing. (2) Holding on to objects of the present, which one is attached to keeping.
craving, link of|See: link of craving

creative drops, subtle|See: creative energy-drops
creative energy-drops|Subtle forms of pure essence, found in the subtle energy-channels of the subtle body and which, through anuttarayoga complete stage practice, can function as the seed for generating of a blissful awareness.
crimes, five heinous|See: five heinous crimes




cyclic existence|See: samsara







dawn|A verb used for the arising of a cognitive appearance on a mental continuum, in analogy with the sun rising at dawn, except that the cognitive appearance is not already existing somewhere hidden in the mind in some unconscious manner and then comes up to consciousness when it dawns. Also translated as to arise."

death existence|The period of time in the mental continuum of an individual limited being during which they experience death. Unless one successfully does advanced anuttarayoga tantra meditations at this time, this period lasts only one moment.
Debate Partner, Master|See: Master Debate Partner


deceptive|Being mistaken or confusing with respect to the appearance of something.
deceptive appearance|A cognitive object that appears to exist in a manner different from the way in which it actually exists.
deceptive cognition|A cognition that takes a phenomenon's mode of existence that it makes appear -- namely, an appearance of its seemingly true existence -- to be the phenomenon's actual mode of existence. The deceptive cognition may be either accurate or distorted with respect to the appearance it makes of the superficial truth of what the phenomenon conventionally is.

decisive awareness|See: ascertainment
decisive cognition|See: ascertainment
decisive explications|Precise indications of the meaning of the works in The Basket of Sutras by specifying the individual and general definitions of things. One of the twelve scriptural categories.
decisively determine|To know with certainty what something is, as opposed to what it is not, or how something exists, as opposed to how it does not exist. Also called: determine, ascertain.
dedicated heart|See: bodhichitta
dedication|See: dedication prayer
dedication prayer|A prayer for the attainment of a spiritual goal or of the circumstances conducive for reaching that goal, in which the person making the prayer directs the positive force (merit) from a constructive action that he or she has done toward ripening into that attainment.

deep awareness|(1) In the context of the five types of deep awareness, a type of principal awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. It is deep in the sense that it is a fundamental way in which the mind works and has always been there, primordially, with no beginning and no end. (2) When contrasted with discriminating awareness (Tib. shes-rab) in the non-Gelug usage of the term, the principal awareness that nonconceptually cognizes the deepest truth of something (its inseparable voidness and appearance), beyond all words and concepts. (3) In the context of the ten Mahayana far-reaching attitudes, when contrasted with discriminating awareness, principal awareness that nonconceptually cognizes the two truths of something. (4) In the context of an arya's nonconceptual cognition of voidness, in the Gelug usage, either the principal awareness that explicitly and nonconceptually cognizes voidness (deepest truth) during total absorption or the principal awareness that implicitly and nonconceptually cognizes voidness during subsequent attainment.
deep awareness, accomplishing|See: accomplishing deep awareness
deep awareness alaya|In the Karma Kagyu system, a synonym for mind-itself: the pure aspect of mind that is an aspect of Buddha-nature.
deep awareness Dharmakaya|See: Corpus of Deep Awareness' Encompassing Everything
deep awareness, five types of|See: five types of deep awareness
deep awareness of reality|One of the five types of deep awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The deep awareness of the superficial truth of something -- namely, awareness of what it is. When developed on the spiritual path, this deep awareness may also be of the deepest truth of something -- namely, its voidness. Also called: deep awareness of the sphere of reality.
deep awareness of the equality of things|See: equalizing deep awareness
deep awareness of the individuality of things|See: individualizing deep awareness
deep awareness of the sphere of reality|See: deep awareness of reality
deep awareness, reflexive|See: reflexive deep awareness
deep awareness, self-arising|See: self-arising deep awareness
deep awareness that is like a mirror|See: mirror-like deep awareness
deep awareness to accomplish things|See: accomplishing deep awareness

deepest bodhichitta|The deep awareness that has nonconceptual cognition of voidness.
deepest Buddha Gem|A Buddha's Dharmakaya as a source of safe direction (refuge).
deepest Dharma Gem|"The true stoppings and true pathway minds on the mental continuum of an arya, whether a layperson or a monastic, as a source of safe direction (refuge).
"

deepest level|The level of some phenomenon that is veiled or concealed by something more superficial about that phenomenon. Sometimes translated as ultimate level or deepest ultimate level."
deepest level Precious Gems|The level of the Three Rare and Supreme Gems that are concealed by the apparent level gems.

deepest Sangha Gem|"The true stoppings and true pathway minds on the mental continuum of an arya, whether a layperson or monastic, as a source of safe direction (refuge).
"
deepest true phenomenon|In the Hinayana tenet systems, a true phenomenon that is veiled or concealed by a conventional (superficial, surface, relative, apparent) true phenomenon.
deepest truth|In the Mahayana tenet systems, a true fact about a phenomenon that is veiled or concealed by a more superficial true fact about the same phenomenon. Some translators render this term as ultimate truth."

defilement|See: disturbing emotion or attitude

defining characteristics|See: defining characteristic mark


definitive teaching|A  passage in a sutra text that discusses the most profound view of voidness, and to which all other passages in all other sutra texts eventually lead or point. Such passages do not need to be explained as indicating anything more profound.



deity, forceful|See: forceful deity
deluded awareness|A primary consciousness that is aimed at the alayavijnana in the Chittamatra system, or at the alaya for habits in the dzogchen system, and grasps at it to be the me to be refuted.
deluded outlook|One of a set of five disturbing attitudes that view their objects in a certain way, for example as me or mine. They seek and regard their objects as things to latch on to, without they themselves scrutinizing, analyzing, or investigating them. They are accompanied by either an interpolation or a repudiation, but they themselves do not interpolate or repudiate anything. Also called in full: a disturbing, deluded outlook on life. Equivalent to the coined term disturbing attitude. See: disturbing emotion or attitude.
deluded outlook toward a transitory network|(1) According to Vasubandhu and Asanga, the disturbing attitude that regards some transitory network from one's own samsara-perpetuating five aggregates as me or as mine. (2) According to Tsongkhapa, the disturbing attitude that focuses on the conventional me and regards it as a truly findable me identical with the aggregates, or as me, the possessor, controller, or inhabitant of the aggregates.
delusion|See: disturbing emotion or attitude
demonic force|Something that harms limited beings or causes interference and obstacles to constructive actions.
denumerable ultimate phenomenon|Voidnesses that are validly cognized conceptually. They are denumerable in the sense that they can be counted among what appears to minds validly cognizing phenomena through mentally labeling them with words and concepts.

dependent arising|The reliance of something on something other than itself for establishing its existence. (1) The reliance of all samsaric phenomena on unawareness for establishing their existence; (2) the reliance of all functional, nonstatic phenomena on causes and conditions for establishing their existence; (3) the reliance of both static and nonstatic phenomena on their parts for establishing their existence; (4) the reliance of all phenomena on mental labeling for establishing their existence. Also translated as dependent origination."
dependent arising tradition|The dependent arising tradition transmitted in Drugpa Kagyu.
dependent origination|See: dependent arising
dependent phenomenon|A validly knowable object that arises dependently on causes and conditions. All nonstatic phenomena. Often translated literally as other-powered phenomenon."
derivative, mental|See: mental derivative
desirable sensory objects, five types of|See: five types of desirable sensory objects
desire|See: longing desire
desire, longing|See: longing desire
desire realm|See: plane of sensory desires
destructive|States of mind, or physical, verbal, or mental actions motivated by them, which  ripen into unhappiness or the suffering of problems or pain, to be experienced by the person on whose mental continuum they occur. Since the term carries no connotation of moral judgment, the translation nonvirtuous is misleading for this term.


detachment|The constructive mental factor of bored disgust with and thus lack of longing desire for compulsive existence and objects of compulsive existence. Also translated as nonattachment."
detection, gross|See: gross detection

determination to be free|See: renunciation
determine|See: decisively determine
deva|See: divine being
devastate|To totally weaken the effectiveness of something, such as the positive force of a constructive act, such that it ripens into something far less and more distant in the future, but without completely eliminating its potential to ripen.



devoid|Totally lacking something, in the sense that something never has in the past, never does in the present, and never will in the future possess a certain characteristic, whether that characteristic is a possibly existing one or an impossible one.
devoid form|A form of physical phenomenon that is devoid of atoms and is the natural play of the clear light mind or of pure awareness (rigpa). Discussed in both Kalachakra and dzogchen, advanced practice enables devoid forms to become the cause for the Form Bodies of a Buddha.

devoid, totally|See: totally devoid



devotion, guru|See: guru devotion

dharma|(1) Preventive measures which, if one puts into practice or achieves, prevent the experience of future suffering. (2) Buddha's teachings. (3) Any phenomenon or thing."

Dharma Gem, apparent|See: apparent Dharma Gem
Dharma Gem, deepest|See: deepest Dharma Gem
Dharma Gem, nominal|See: nominal Dharma Gem

Dharma instructor|A teacher, either lay or monastic, Western or Asian, who explains the Buddhist teachings from his or her own experiential insight and understanding.
Dharmakaya|See: Corpus Encompassing Everything
Dharma-lite|A version of the Buddhist teachings without the presentation of past and futures lives and in which the motivating aim is usually just to improve one's samsaric existence of this life.
Dharma-protector|A class of forceful beings, tamed by Buddha or a spiritual lineage master such as Guru Rinpoche, and made to take an oath to protect the Dharma and its practitioners. They may be either ordinary worldly beings (non-aryas) or highly realized aryas. In some cases, they are emanations of a Buddha, appearing in the form of a Dharma-protector.
Dharma, real thing"|See: real-thing Dharma
Dharma, undeviating|See: undeviating Dharma
Dharma, unmistaken|See: unmistaken Dharma



dichotomy|Two mutually exclusive sets form a dichotomy if all existent phenomena must be a member of either one or the other mutually exclusive set.
direct cause|The phenomenon that actually produces its result, without need for any intermediary -- for example, a visible object is the direct cause for the seeing of it.
direct cognition|According to the non-Gelug presentation, the type of cognition that a present moment of sensory consciousness has of the present moment of a mental aspect (mental hologram) of the immediately preceding moment of an external sense object. Compare: indirect cognition.

direction, safe|See: safe direction

discerning analysis|See: subtle discernment
discerning meditation|A method for habituating oneself to an insight, understanding, or state of mind, with which one focuses on an object and generates the desired insight, understanding, or state of mind about it, through using the mental factors of gross detection (investigation) and subtle discernment (scrutiny). The method may also entail applying a line reasoning that one has already understood and become convinced of its validity. Many translators render the term as analytical meditation."
discernment, subtle|See: subtle discernment

discipline, ethical|See: ethical self-discipline
discipline, rules of|See: rules of discipline
discontent|Discontent has the flavor of it not being enough, so you want to try something else  (I was discontented with my job, so I found another one.)

discordant appearance-making|See: dualistic appearance-making
discordant appearances|See: dualistic appearances

discourse|An oral teaching on a spiritual topic, often concerning tantra.
discriminate|(1) To differentiate decisively between two things -- for example, between what is correct and incorrect, (2) to single out  something and come to a decisive conclusion about it, for example to incorrectly discriminate the shravaka teachings as being essential for only shravakas, and worthless for bodhisattvas.
discriminating awareness|The mental factor that decisively discriminates between what is correct and what is incorrect, or between what is helpful and what is harmful, or between what is appropriate or what is inappropriate, or between what is reality and what is not reality. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude.
discriminating awareness, far-reaching|See: far-reaching discriminating awareness


discrimination|See: discriminating awareness




dissatisfaction|dissatisfaction implies that you didn't like it, so you could try it again. (I was dissatisfied with my results on the test, so I took it again)
dissociated from confusion|See: untainted
dissolves into its own place|See: releases into its own place
distant lineage|The lineage of a teaching that began with Buddha himself.


distinguish|See: distinguishing
distinguished equanimity|See: uncommon Mahayana equanimity
distinguishers|See: conceptually isolated item
distinguishing|One of the five ever-functioning subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors) that takes an uncommon characteristic feature of the appearing object of a nonconceptual cognition or an outstanding feature of the appearing object of a conceptual cognition, and ascribes a conventional significance to it, different from that of everything else that appears in the background within that cognition. It does not necessarily ascribe a name or mental label to its object, nor does it compare it with previously cognized objects. Some translators render the term as recognition."

distorted antagonistic thinking|The action of thinking with a distorted outlook and, in addition, wishing to repudiate, with hostility, anyone that disagrees with one's view. Also called: thinking with a distorted, antagonistic attitude.
distorted cognition|A way of being aware of something that takes its object incorrectly. Conceptual distorted cognition is deceived with respect to its conceptualized object; nonconceptual distorted cognition is deceived with respect to its involved object.
distorted outlook|The disturbing attitude that regards an actual cause, an actual effect, an actual functioning, or an existent phenomenon as not being actual or existent. According to Tsongkhapa, it may also regard a false cause, a false effect, a false functioning, or a nonexistent phenomenon as true or existent. Also translated as distorted view, other translators render it as wrong view or false view."
distorted view|See: distorted outlook

disturbed state of mind|See: disturbing emotion or attitude
disturbing attitude|Equivalent to a deluded outlook.
disturbing deluded outlook on life|See: deluded outlook
disturbing emotion|See: disturbing emotion or attitude
disturbing emotion or attitude|A subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that, when it arises, causes oneself to lose peace of mind and incapacitates oneself so that one loses self-control. An indication that one is experiencing a disturbing emotion or attitude is that it makes oneself and/or others feel uncomfortable. Some translators render this term as afflictive emotions or emotional afflictions."
disturbing emotions and attitudes, automatically arising|See: automatically arising disturbing emotions and attitudes
disturbing emotions and attitudes, doctrinally based|See: doctrinally based disturbed emotions and attitudes
disturbing emotions without an outlook on life|Among the disturbing emotions and attitudes, those that do not regard and understand their objects in a certain way, for instance as me or mine. Abbreviated as disturbing emotions, in contrast to disturbing attitudes, which is used for a disturbing deluded outlook on life.
dividing consciousness|"A consciousness that makes dualistic appearances, dividing a moment of experience into an appearance of independently existing consciousness (subject) and object. It is a Kagyu/Nyingma explanation.

The Tibetan is rnam-shes, the same as the usual word for consciousness. It is defined like this only in some very special places."
divine being|A limited (sentient) being in the rebirth state that, out of the six states of rebirth, has the least amount of suffering. This class of being includes some that are on the plane of sensory desires, and all beings on the plane of ethereal forms and the plane of formless beings. Also called a god."
divine ear, extrasensory|See: extrasensory divine ear
divine eye, extrasensory|See: extrasensory divine eye
divine realm|A place where divine beings (gods) dwell. Also called a heaven."
doctrinally based disturbed emotions and attitudes|Disturbing emotions and attitudes that arise based on having been taught and having accepted a non-Buddhist Indian tenet system or a less sophisticated Indian Buddhist tenet system.

doctrinally based unawareness|The mental factor of either not knowing or knowing invertedly either behavioral cause and effect or the manner in which the self and all phenomena exist, and which arises on a person's mental continuum based on that person having been taught an incorrect tenet system. Also called: doctrinally based ignorance.
dominating condition|The nonstatic phenomena that produce the essential nature of something, such as the eye sensors for the visual consciousness and congruent mental factors of a visual cognition. This condition is called dominating – literally, the overlord condition – because it rules what the essential nature of its result will be.
dominating result|(1) The type of environment or society in which one  is born or enters and the way it treats one, or (2) objects, such as one's possessions, and what happens to them. Such results may ripen from destructive, tainted constructive, or unspecified actions and are called dominating results because they extend over and dominate everything that one experiences in a particular rebirth. Also translated as comprehensive result, overriding result or overlord result, it is synonymous with commanding result."
dormant factor|Literally, something that is asleep to the taste of the mind. Affecting variables, associated with mental continuums, which are lying down and not rushing to manifest mind (consciousness). They include subliminal awareness, tendencies, and habits.
doubt|See: indecisive wavering
downfall, root|See: root downfall
dread|The strong wish not to experience something or for something not to happen. If overlaid with grasping for truly established existence, it becomes fear. Sometimes translated as fear."

Drigung Kagyu|One of the eight minor Kagyu traditions of Tibetan Buddhism, deriving from direct disciples of Gampopa's disciple Pagmo-drupa -- in this case, Drigung Jigten-sumgon.

driving cause|Disturbing emotions and attitudes that generate other subsequent disturbing emotions and attitudes in the same plane of samsaric existence.

drops, jasmine flower|See: jasmine flower drops
Drugpa Kagyu|One of the eight minor Kagyu traditions of Tibetan Buddhism, deriving from direct disciples of Gampopa's disciple Pagmo-drupa -- in this case, Lingraypa.
dual appearance-making|See: dualistic appearance-making
dual appearances|See: dualistic appearances
dualistic appearance-making|(1) In Gelug Prasangika, the mental activity of giving rise to an appearance of a manner of existence that does not correspond to the actual manner in which anything exists. (2) In non-Gelug Madhayamaka, the mental activity of giving rise, within a cognition, to an appearance of a consciousness and its object as each having truly established existence, independently of each other. (3) In Chittamatra, the mental activity of giving rise to an appearance, within a cognition, of a consciousness and its object as deriving from different natal sources. Also called dual appearance-making and discordant appearance-making."
dualistic appearances|The appearances that dualistic appearance-making gives rise to. (1) In Gelug Prasangika, an appearance of a manner of existence that does not correspond to the actual manner in which anything exists. (2) In non-Gelug Madhyamaka, within a cognition, an appearance of a consciousness and its object as each having truly established existence, independently of each other. (3) In Chittamatra, within a cognition, an appearance of a consciousness and its object as deriving from different natal sources.  Also called dual appearances and discordant appearances."

dullness, mental|See: mental dullness
dumbfoundedness|In the dzogchen system, a nominal disturbing attitude, equivalent to automatically arising unawareness regarding phenomena, which obscures rigpa's (pure awareness's) knowing its own nature. Some translators render it as bedazzlement or stupidity, but it has nothing to do with intelligence.

dzogchen|A Mahayana system of practice, found in the Nyingma, Bon, Karma Kagyu, Drugpa Kagyu, and Drigung Kagyu traditions, that entails accessing rigpa, one's own pure awareness, and realizing that it is complete with all good qualities. Translated as the great completeness."




effulgent rigpa|Pure awareness (rigpa) from the point of view of its aspect of spontaneously establishing appearances. Synonymous with the term appearance-making basis rigpa."




eight sets of realizations|also translated as: eight phenomena.

eight transitory things in life|Praise or criticism, good or bad news, gains or losses, things going well or poorly -- or, more specifically, the emotional ups and downs of overexcitement and depression in response to these eight. Also called the eight worldly dharmas."


eight worldly concerns|See: eight transitory things in life
eight worldly dharmas|See: eight transitory things in life

elevation|See: inspiration

eliminations of something else|See: exclusions of something else


emanation, miraculous|See: miraculous emanations
embodied being|A being with a limited body. Any being other than a Buddha. Synonymous with limited being, sentient being."
emergence, definite|See: definite emergence

emotional affliction|See: disturbing emotion or attitude

emotional obscurations|Fleeting stains that temporarily cover or accompany mental activity (more precisely, clear light mental activity), thereby preventing the mental activity from cognizing phenomena without accompanying disturbing emotions or attitudes. They include the disturbing emotions and attitudes, as well as their tendencies (seeds), and prevent the attainment of liberation from samsara, Also translated as obscurations that are the disturbing emotions and attitudesand obscurations preventing liberation."


emotion, disturbing|See: disturbing emotion or attitude



empowerment|A tantric ritual that activates and empowers Buddha-nature factors to grow so that, through repeated, sustained tantric practice, they will eventually transform into the Three Corpuses (Bodies) of a Buddha. An empowerment also plants new seeds, or potentials, that will likewise grow in the same manner. The term is often translated as initiation."
empowerment, discriminating deep awareness|See: discriminating deep awareness empowerment
empowerment, fourth|See: fourth empowerment
empowerment, secret|See: secret empowerment
empowerment, vajra deep awareness|See: vajra deep awareness empowerment
empowerment, vase|See: vase empowerment
empowerment, word|See: word empowerment
emptiness|See: voidness



energy-channel, central|See: central energy-channel
energy-channel, left|See: left energy-channel
energy-channel, right|See: right energy-channel
energy, karmic|See: karmic energy

energy-wind|Also called: energy-wind breaths
energy-wind breaths|See: energy-wind
energy-wind, subtle|See: subtle energy-winds
engage|To involve onself with something, to enter into the practice of something.
engaged bodhichitta|A mind of bodhichitta which, when focused on one's own individual not-yet-happening enlightenment, imputable on the basis of the Buddha-nature factors of one's mental continuum, is committed to attaining that enlightenment by having taken bodhisattva vows and which then enters into the type of behavior that will bring one to enlightenment.

engagement, cognitive|See: cognitive engagement

enigmatic|Also translated as: secret, hidden


enlightening deeds|According to Mahayana, a set of twelve actions or deeds in the life of a Buddha, with which a Buddha demonstrates to all limited beings the way to achieve enlightenment.
enlightening influence|The unceasing, unending, effortless activity of a Buddha, which helps bring all limited beings to higher rebirth, liberation, and enlightenment. Such activity does not require a Buddha actually doing anything: a Buddha's attainment itself exerts a positive influence on others to pacify disturbance, stimulate the growth of good qualities, bring disorder under control, and forcefully end any harm. Also translated as: Buddha-activity."














entity|A truly existent thing, either objective or metaphysical, that exists as a findable thing on its own, established as that thing by its own power from its own side.
entity, metaphysical|See: metaphysical entities
entity, objective|See: objective entities
envy|See: jealousy
epic presentations|Presentations of the vast and profound aspects of such topics as the six far-reaching attitudes (six perfections) and ten arya bodhisattva levels of bhumi-mind (ten bhumis) of The Basket of the Mahayana or Bodhisattva Sutras. One of the twelve scriptural categories.

equalizing and exchanging our attitudes about self and others|See: equalizing self and others
equalizing and exchanging self and others|A method for developing a bodhichitta aim, consisting of (1) developing mere equanimity, (2) developing uncommon Mahayana equanimity, as a way to regard all others equally in the same way as one regards oneself, (3) thinking of the disadvantages of a self-cherishing attitude, (4) thinking of the advantages of cherishing others, (5) giving and taking, with attitudes of love and compassion, as a way of exchanging one's attitudes about self and others, (6) exceptional resolve, and (7) developing a bodhichitta aim.

equalizing deep awareness|One of the five types of deep awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The deep awareness that is aware of several items as belonging equally to the same category, or as fitting into the same pattern. Also called: deep awareness of the equality of things.
equalizing self and others|Developing an equal attitude toward all beings, with the same regard as one has toward oneself.
equal status cause|Causes for which the results are later moments in the same category of phenomena as they are -- either in the same ethical category or on the same plane of existence.
equanimity|(1) The mental factor (subsidiary awareness) of having an equal attitude toward everyone. (2) In Theravada, when conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, the tenth of the ten far-reaching attitudes -- the attitude with which one does not expect anything in return for one's help, being indifferent to pleasure and pain, and to any benefit or harm one might receive.

equanimity, distinguished|See: uncommon equanimity
equanimity, especially distinguished|See: uncommon equanimity
equanimity, mere|See: mere equanimity


equanimity, uncommon Mahayana|See: uncommon equanimity
equipoise, meditative|See: total absorption

especially distinguished equanimity|See: uncommon equanimity
essence mahamudra|A pathway of mahamudra practice concerning the nature of the mind in which specially qualified disciples receive the inspiration of the realizations all the lineage masters through receiving a vajra deep awareness empowerment and thereby achieve realization of mind-itself, equivalent to a seeing pathway mind. As those for whom it happens all at once, they achieve enlightenment simultaneously with this realization. Also known as the singular sufficient white panacea."
essence rigpa|Pure awareness (rigpa) from the point of view of it being primally pure and serving as the open space within which effulgent rigpa functions.
essential nature|The general type of phenomenon that something is -- for instance, a sight, a sound, and so on.


essential nature, same|See: same essential nature
established, truly|See: truly established



ethical discipline|See: ethical self-discipline
ethically neutral|See: unspecified phenomenon
ethically unspecified|See: unspecified phenomenon
ethical narratives|Rules, codified by Buddha for those who are ordained, concerning which actions constitute a breach of their vows. One of the twelve scriptural categories.
ethical self-discipline|(1) In Theravada, the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) to avoid doing any harm to others, by keeping one's vows, free from anger or ill-will even if others harm one. (2) In Mahayana, the mental urge to safeguard the actions of one's body, speech, and mind, which comes from having turned one's mind away from any wish to cause harm to others and from the disturbing and destructive mental factors that had motivated one to harm others. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude.


even-minded|A tranquil state of mind that stays in the middle with regard to being either happy or unhappy, in all circumstances, such as when meeting with or parting from friends. Literally, a state of standing in the middle."

even-tempered|The mental factor of not becoming either too involved or indifferent toward others, even when helping them.
ever-functioning mental factor|See: ever-functioning subsidiary awareness
ever-functioning subsidiary awareness|According to Asanga, a set of five subsidiary awarenesses that accompany every moment of cognition: feeling a level of happiness, distinguishing, an urge, contacting awareness, and paying attention or taking to mind.


evolving family-traits|(1) In the Chittamatra system, the tendencies (seeds) that, newly gained by listening, contemplating and meditating on Buddha's teachings, are imputable on the basis of the stained minds of each limited being and which serve as factors allowing that being to attain arya pathway minds. (2) In the Svatantrika-Madhyamaka system, the factors, imputable on the basis of the stained mind of each limited being, that are fit to become the essential nature of a deep awareness Dharmakaya. (3) In the Prasangika-Madhyamaka system, the factors imputable on the basis of the stained mind of each limited being that are fit to become the essential natures of a Corpus of Forms and a deep awareness Dharmakaya of a Buddha.
evolving traits|See: evolving family-traits
excellent signs|See: thirty-two excellent signs
exceptionally perceptive state of mind|A state of mind that, in addition to being stilled and settled (shamatha), is accompanied by an additional sense of fitness -- the subsidiary awareness of feeling totally fit to discern and understand fully the subtle details of anything. Vipashyana is not necessarily focused on voidness or on the four noble truths, although most commonly in sutra it is. Other translators render the term as special insight."
"


exceptional resolve|The full determination with which one takes the responsibility to lead all limited beings to liberation and enlightenment. Sometimes translated as pure wish."
exceptional sincerity|Exceptional sincerity has, in addition to the factors comprising sincerity, two more factors: 3) nonattachment (ma-chags-pa), 4) going forward in a special way (khyad-par-du 'gro-ba).

exchanging one's attitudes about self and others.|See: exchanging self and others
exchanging self and others|Instead of self-cherishing, cherishing others, and instead of ignoring the needs of others, ignoring one's own selfish needs.
exclude|to eliminate
exclusions|See: exclusions of something else
exclusions, mental|See: mental exclusions of something else
exclusions, nonimplicative negation|See: nonimplicative negation exclusions of something else
exclusions, object|See: individually characterized object exclusions of something else
exclusions of something else|Phenomena specified in terms of the conceptual cognition that cognizes the phenomenon explicitly precluding an object to be negated. Synonymous with negation phenomena, they include both implicative and nonimplicative negation phenomena. (1) According to Gelug, they may be either static or nonstatic. (2) According to non-Gelug, they are all static phenomena.



existence established as true|See: true existence
existence established by self-nature|Existence of something established or proven by the fact that the referent object of the imputation of it can be found upon searching for it. For example, the existence of a table established or proven by the fact that when one searches for the object that the mental label table refers to, one can find the object, a table. Also translated as self-established existence, it is often translated by others as inherent existence."
existence, inherent|See: existence established by self-nature
existence, true|See: true existence
existent|Validly knowable.

existent phenomenon|See: existents
existents|Validly knowable phenomena.




explications, decisive|See: decisive explications
explicit apprehension|In the Gelug system, apprehension of a cognitive object in which a cognitive appearance (mental hologram) of the involved object of the cognition arises. Compare: implicit apprehension.
explicit cognition|See: explicit apprehension

explicit suggestive meaning|One of the six alternative meanings. When an expression in a root tantra text has two dissimilar meanings, the literal, evident, or face value meaning of the expression. It suggests or leads one on to the second meaning (the implicit suggested meaning), which is dissimilar to what is actually said on face value.
expositions on themes of practice|See: sutra




external object|See: external phenomenon
external phenomenon|A nonstatic phenomenon that arises from a natal source different from the natal source of the consciousness that cognizes it -- namely, from a natal source that is not connected with the mental continuum of the individual who cognizes it.

extraphysical emanations|Physical bodies having abilities that are beyond the usual capacity of the body -- such as the ability to run great distances at an incredible speed, to fly, to increase or decrease in size, to multiply, to walk on water, to pass beneath the earth, and so on --  which are produced (emanated) from karma, recitation of mantra, the power of specially consecrated substances, or the power of an actual state of the first level of mental stability (the first dhyana).
extraphysical powers|See: extraphysical emanations

extrasensory divine eye|Cognition that is able to see in the sense of know, future rebirths. One of the five extrasensory eyes gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental stability (the first dhyana).

extrasensory eye of deep awareness|A Buddha's omniscient awareness that is able to see the two truths about all phenomena. One of the five types of extrasensory eyes, possessed only by Buddhas.
extrasensory eye of discriminating awareness|Cognition that is able to see voidness nonconceptually. One of the five extrasensory eyes gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental stability (the first dhyana)..
extrasensory eye of the Dharma|One of the five extrasensory eyes gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental stability (the first dhyana). (1) According to the Gelug explanation, cognition that is able to understand the mental capacities of others, in order to be able to teach them appropriately. (2) According to the Karma Kagyu explanation, a Buddha's omniscient awareness that possesses the ten forces that enable a Buddha to lead all beings to enlightenment.
extrasensory flesh eye|Cognition that is able to see great distances without obstruction, to see through solid objects such as walls, to see in all directions at the same time, and so on. One of the five extrasensory eyes gained as a byproduct of the attainment of an actual state of the first level of mental stability (the first dhyana).
extrasensory perception|See: advanced awareness
extremely obscure phenomenon|A validly knowable phenomenon that can be apprehended through authoritative texts or speech, such as the enlightening words of the Buddha, or that can be apprehended through the words of persons who are valid sources of information.

extreme outlook|The disturbing attitude that regards one's five samsara-perpetuating aggregates in either an eternalist or nihilistic way. (1) According to Vasubandhu, an extreme outlook that views the samsara-producing aggregate factors themselves as either lasting eternally or ending totally at death, with no continuity in future lives. (2) According to Tsongkhapa, a disturbing, deluded discriminating awareness that focuses on the conventional me and considers it either as having a truly existent identity permanently or as not having continuity in future lives.

eye of deep awareness, extrasensory|See: extrasensory eye of deep awareness
eye of discriminating awareness, extrasensory|See: extrasensory eye of discriminating awareness
eye of the Dharma, extrasensory|See: extrasensory eye of the Dharma


fabrication, parted from mental|See: state parted from mental fabrication
fabulous accounts|Descriptions of such marvelous, wondrous things as the wisdom, extra-physical powers and saintly deeds of the Buddhas, pratyekabuddhas (self-realizers), and shravakas (listeners). One of the twelve scriptural categories.

faith|See: believing a fact to be true
false view|See: deluded outlook



far-reaching attitude|A mental factor that brings one to the far shore of samsara, either to liberation or to enlightenment. There are either six or ten far-reaching attitudes. Also called perfection. Theravada and Mahayana give slightly different lists of these. According to Mahayana, the six are the far-reaching attitudes of (1) generosity, (2) ethical self-discipline, (3) patience, (4) joyful perseverance, (5) mental stability, and (6) discriminating awareness (wisdom). The Mahayana list of ten adds the far-reaching attitudes of (7) skill in means, (8) aspirational prayer, (9) strengthening, and (10) deep awareness.

far-reaching discriminating awareness|The discriminating awareness of voidness that is conjoined with a bodhichitta aim. Most translators render it as perfection of wisdom. Compare: discriminating awareness.


faulty actions|A set of forty-six actions that one vows to avoid and which, if committed, would be detrimental to one's practice of either one of the six far-reaching attitudes or to one's benefiting others. Also called: secondary bodhisattva vows.

feature, distinguishing|See: feature, distinguishing

feeling|See: feeling a level of happiness
feeling aggregate|See: aggregate of feelings of levels of happiness
feeling a level of happiness|One of the five ever-functioning subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors). The subsidiary awareness that accompanies each moment of sensory or mental cognition of a limited being before attaining liberation and with which that being experiences the ripenings of its own karma in the form of something within the spectrum of extreme unhappiness, through neutral, to extreme happiness. Also called feeling."
feeling a level of happiness, link of|See: link of feeling a level of happiness


filigree|A piece of jewelry made of fine, intricately intertwined wires. A word used in the titles of many Buddhist texts to indicate that the subject matter is presented in a manner resembling a filigree, in which the various topics are intricately intertwined, resulting in a beautiful, elegant presentation of the material. Usually translated by others as ornament."


fire-puja|A tantric ritual, performed mostly upon completion of a mantra-recitation retreat of a Buddha-figure for which one has received an empowerment, during which one tosses into a fire a large number of specific substances, accompanied by elaborate visualizations. It is mostly performed in order to purify any mistakes one has made during the retreat.
firm conviction|(1) According to Asanga, the mental factor (subsidiary awareness) that focuses on a fact that one has validly ascertained to be like this and not like that, and which makes one's belief that a fact is true so firm that others' arguments or opinions will not dissuade one. (2) According to Vasubandhu, the term means regard: the mental factor that takes its object to have some level of good qualities – on the spectrum from no good qualities to all good qualities – and may be either accurate or distorted.
fitness, sense of|See: sense of fitness
five aggregate factors|The five networks that constitute all the nonstatic phenomena that could make up each moment of the mental continuum of each limited being: the aggregates of (1) forms of physical phenomena, (2) feelings of levels of happiness, (3) distinguishing, (4) other affecting variables, and (5) primary consciousnesses.

five aggregates|See: five aggregate factors
five bodhisattva pathway minds|Also called: five paths
Five Buddha-Bodies|See: Five Corpuses of a Buddha
five Buddha-wisdoms|See: five types of deep awareness
five congruent features|Five things shared in common by the primary consciousness and subsidiary awarenesses within a cognition. (1) According to Vasubandhu, they share the same reliance, object, mental aspect, time, and natal sources having the same slant. (2) According to Asanga, natal source, focal aspect, essential nature, time, and plane.
Five Corpuses of a Buddha|(I) In some presentations, (1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), (3) Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything (Jnanadharmakaya), (4) Corpus of Essential Nature of a Buddha (Svabhavakaya), and Vajra Corpus (Vajrakaya) of a Buddha. (II) In other presentations, (1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), (3) Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything (Jnanadharmakaya), (4) Corpus of Essential Nature (Svabhavakaya), and Corpus of Great Bliss (Mahasukhakaya) of a Buddha. (III) In other presentations, (1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), (3) Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything (Jnanadharmakaya), (4) Corpus of Essential Nature (Svabhavakaya), and (5) Corpus of Deep Awareness' Enlightening Influence of a Buddha. (IV) In yet other systems, (1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), (3) Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything (Jnanadharmakaya), (4) Vajra Corpus (Vajrakaya), and (5) Corpus of Manifest Enlightenment (Abhisambhodhikaya) of a Buddha.



five major fields of knowledge|The major topics of study in the ancient Indian Buddhist monasteries: (1) art and craftsmanship, (2) medicine, (3) languages and grammar, (4) logic, and (5) inner or exceptional self-knowledge
five obscurations|A set of five mental factors that prevent the attainment of the three higher trainings, in ethical self-discipline, absorbed concentration, and discriminating awareness. According to Nagarjuna's Letter to a Friend, (1) flightiness of mind and regret, (2) foggy-mindedness, (3) indecisive wavering, (4) intentions toward sensory objects, and (5) malice. According to the Kalachakra Tantra, (1) regret, (2) foggy-mindedness, (3) sleepiness, (4) flightiness of mind, and (5) indecisive wavering. Also called: five obstacles.
five obstacles|See: five obscurations

five types of deep awareness|Five types of principal awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The five are (1) mirror-like, (2) equalizing, (3) individualizing, and (4) accomplishing  deep awareness, and (5) deep awareness of reality. Some translators render this term as five Buddha-wisdoms.  Compare: deep awareness (1).

fixating meditation|See: stabilizing meditation

flat|One's Dharma practice is flat when it is going nowhere, when it is not taking one anywhere. There is nothing lively in it anymore. Flat is usually used for sparkling water (soda water) or beer, when there are no more bubbles.
fleeting stain|An emotional or cognitive obscuration that temporarily obscures the realization of Buddha-nature.
flesh eye, extrasensory|See: extrasensory flesh eye
flightiness, mental|See: flightiness of mind
flightiness of mind|The mental factor with which the mind wanders to an object of attraction, due to desire for it or attachment, and which faults the mental abiding of mindfulness's mental hold on an object of focus. Sometimes translated as mental agitation."
focal condition|An external phenomenon that presents an aspect of itself to be an object of cognition, and thus serves as a condition giving rise to a sensory cognition of it.
focal object|An external object on which a cognition focuses and which serves as the focal condition of the cognition. Focal objects exist prior to the cognitions of them and have their own continuums different from those of the cognitions of them.
focal support|A findable, truly existent referent thing, propping up the object of a cognition. Compare: referent thing.

focus, sharp|See: sharp focus
foe-destroyer|See: arhat
foggy-mindedness|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of a heavy feeling of body and mind that makes the mind unclear, unserviceable, and incapable either of giving rise to a cognitive appearance of its object or of apprehending the object correctly.


forceful|Using extremely strong actions or methods, such as yelling at someone or hitting someone, in order to make the person stop doing something harmful. Forceful methods are used only when all other methods to make the person stop have failed or are impossible in the situation. Some translators render the term as wrathful, but this has an inappropriate connotation, since  wrathful, in English, is used for the Old Testament God, who, when people disobey Him, gets angry and punishes them.
forceful deity|An emanation of a Buddha in a form of great strength, usually surrounded by flames representing deep awareness, and terrifying, so as to chase away disturbing emotions, interferences, and other harm. Often translated by others as wrathful deity, although there is no connotation here of wrath as in the wrath of God. Although the Sanskrit and Tibetan terms, here, mean literally angry, this does not refer to anger as a disturbing emotion, but rather to the strong force of anger to get rid of something detrimental to spiritual well-being and progress.
force, karmic|See: karmic force
force, positive|See: positive karmic force


form aggregate|See: aggregate of forms of physical phenomena
formal meditation|See: stabilizing meditation
formless realm|See: plane of formless beings
form realm|See: plane of ethereal forms

forms of physical phenomena|Nonstatic phenomena that can either (1) transform into another form of physical phenomenon when two or more of them come into contact with each other, such as water and earth which can transform into mud, or (2) be known as what they are by analyzing their directional parts, such as the sight of a vase seen in a dream. Forms of physical phenomena include the nonstatic phenomena of forms and eye sensors, sounds and ear sensors, smells and nose sensors, tastes and tongue sensors, phyiscal sensations and body sensors, and forms of physical phenomena included only among cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena. Equivalent to the aggregate of forms of physical phenomena.
forms of physical phenomena arising from gaining control over the elements|Forms of physical phenomena included only among the cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena and which are actually emanated by the power of absorbed concentration.
forms of physical phenomena existing in actual situations|Forms of physical phenomena included only among the cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena and which are spaces that are in between objects and either too large or too small to be seen, such as the space in between astronomical bodies or in between atoms.
forms of physical phenomena having the functional nature of mind|The type of subtle phenomena that the body of an arhat in a pure land is: although still included among cognitive stimulators that are forms of physical phenomena, they are visible only to the eye consciousness of arhats in pure lands. Although they are not ways of being aware of anything, their functional nature is similar to that of forms of physical phenomena that can be known only by mental consciousness. Synonymous with mental bodies."
forms of physical phenomena included (only) among the cognitive stimulators that are (all) phenomena|Forms of physical phenomena that are not knowable by sensory consciousness, but are only knowable by mental consciousness. These include (1) those that make up other things by amassing together, (2) those existing in actual situations, (3) those arising from clearly taking them on, (4) totally imaginary forms, and (5) those arising from gaining control over the elements.
forms of physical phenomena that can become objects of experience of the eyes|Equivalent to sights. See: sights.
forms of physical phenomena that make up other things by amassing together|Forms of physical phenomena included only among the cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena and which are the invisible objects, such as atoms and subatomic particles, that make up visible objects.
forms of physical phenomena, totally imaginary|See: totally imaginary forms of physical phenomena
forms of physical phenomenon arising from clearly taking them on|Forms of physical phenomena included only among the cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena and which are acquired on a mental continuum, such as the nonrevealing forms of vows and of karmic actions.
foundation consciousness|See: all-encompassing foundation consciousness

four axioms|The four axioms for examining a Dharma teaching in order to accept its validity: (1) dependency, (2) functionality, (3) establishment by reason, and (4) the nature of things.
four binding factors|Factors which, when they accompany someone's acting in breach of a vow, bind that person to the full karmic result, in the sense of guaranteeing that the full karmic result will follow.
Four Buddha-Bodies|See: Four Corpuses of a Buddha
four close mindfulnesses|See: four close placements of mindfulness
four close placements of mindfulness|Meditation practices that focus on (a) the body, (b) feelings of levels of happiness, (c) mind, and (d) phenomena, with the subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors) of mindfulness (mental glue) and attention to them with a certain understanding. (1) In Theravada, one is attentive to (a) the breath as affecting the body, (b) feelings of levels of happiness and unhappiness as affecting the mind, (c) disturbing emotions as affecting the thoughts, and (d) the nature of the previous three as being nonstatic and lacking an impossible soul. (2) In Mahayana, one is attentive to (a) the body as unclean and true suffering, (b) feelings of levels of happiness as in the nature of suffering, and clinging to them as a true cause of suffering, (c) the six kinds of primary consciousness as naturally free of all stains, so as to understand true stoppings, and (d) all mental factors in terms of which to get rid of and which to cultivate, so as to understand true pathway minds.
Four Corpuses of a Buddha|(1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), (3) Corpus of Deep Awareness Encompassing Everything (Jnanadharmakaya), and (4) Corpus of Essential Nature of a Buddha.

four hallmarks of the Dharma|Four points which, if contained in a system of teachings, indicate that the system is a Buddhist one: (1) all affected (conditioned) phenomena are nonstatic (impermanent), (2) all tainted phenomena are problematic (suffering), (3) all phenomena are devoid and lacking an impossible soul, while (4) a nirvana release is a pacification and something constructive. Also called four sealing points for labeling an outlook as being based on enlightening words."
four joys|See: four gradations of joyful awareness




four placements of confidence|Don’t place your confidence on the person, place it on his or her teachings; don’t place your confidence on his or her words, place it on their meanings; don’t place your confidence on their interpretable meanings, place it on their definitive meanings; (to understand them) don’t place your confidence on your dividing consciousness, place it on your deep awareness.
four placements of mindfulness|See: four close placements of mindfulness
four sealing points for labeling an outlook as being based on enlightening words|See: four hallmarks of the Dharma
four sets of applied realizations|Also translated as: four yogas


fourth empowerment|Also called: word empowerment (tshig-dbang)







fresh and clean|Arising anew in each moment without being stained by any mental constructs -- descriptive of pure awareness (rig-pa) in the dzogchen systems.

front-generation|The part of a self-initiation in which one generates in front of oneself the supported and supporting mandalas from which one will receive the full empowerment.




functional nature|The nature of a phenomenon defined in terms of the function that the phenomenon performs.
functional phenomenon|(1) A validly knowable, existent object that performs a function -- in other words, it produces a result -- namely, a nonstatic phenomenon. (2) In the Vaibhashika system, all validly knowable, existent phenomenon, all of which at least perform the function of acting as an object for the valid cognition of them.
further existence|See: karmic impulse that actualizes a further existence
further existence impulse|See: karmic impulse that actualizes a further existence
further existence, link of|See: link of further existence
Gelug|One of the New Translation traditions of Tibetan Buddhism, deriving from the reforms made by Tsongkhapa.

Gelugpa|A follower of the Gelug tradition of Tibetan Buddhism.
general awareness|In the Karma Kagyu system, the aspect of mental activity that gives rise to and is aware of the appearing (the arising in general) of an awareness of an object and an object that one is aware of. In a looser sense, awareness of the general features of an entire sensory or mental field that one cognizes, so that one gets an overview.
generality|See: conceptual category

generation stage|The first stage of anuttarayoga practice, during which one uses the powers of imagination to generate oneself in the form of a Buddha-figure and performs a sadhana.
generosity|(1) In Theravada, the mental factor of wishing to give material things to all beings, so that they may be happy, without investigating whether or not they are worthy to receive them. (2) In Mahayana, the mental urge that leads one to wish to give to others all that is one's own – one's body, material wealth, and the roots of one's constructive actions. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude. Also translated as giving."
geshe|(1) In the Kadam tradition, a title given to a spiritual mentor and friend, especially those that are masters of attitude-training (lojong). (2) In the Gelug tradition, a title given to those who have completed the monastic education system.


giving|See: generosity
giving and taking|With love, giving one's happiness to others, and with compassion, taking on their suffering. Often practiced with visualizations and in coordination with the breath, this is a practice done in conjunction with exchanging one's attitudes about self with others. Often called by the Tibetan term tonglen."
giving rise to|See: making arise
giving rise to appearances|See: appearance-making


go for refuge to the Three Gems|See: take safe direction from the Three Gems

go in the direction of Buddha, Dharma and Sangha|See: take safe direction from the Three Gems

golden libation|(1) An offering of a liquid, most commonly alcohol, made usually to a Dharma protector and ideally offered in a golden bowl. (2) The ritual that accompanies this offering.
good qualities|Helpful aspects or beneficial talents of a person that are corrections of inadequacies.
gorges, dangerous|See: dangerous gorges








grasping for true existence|See: grasping for truly established existence
grasping for truly established existence|(1) Both to cognize (literally, take as a cognitive object) the appearance of the world as having truly established existence, which the habits of this grasping cause the mind to fabricate and project, as well as believing this deceptive appearance to correspond to how things actually exist, (2) simply cognizing the appearance of the world as having truly established existence, without actually believing this deceptive appearance to correspond to how things actually exist. Gelug asserts both definitions, while non-Gelug asserts only the first. Abbreviated as grasping for true existence."
great approximation retreat|A three-year, three-month retreat focusing exclusively on one Buddha-figure (deity) system,  in which one recites tens of millions of mantras and makes millions of offerings in fire pujas.
great compassion|The wish for everyone to be free from suffering and from the causes for suffering.

great completeness|See: dzogchen


Greater Vehicle|See: Mahayana
great love|The wish for everyone to be happy and to have the causes for happiness.





great seal|See: mahamudra

gross detection|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that investigates something roughly, such as detecting if there are mistakes on a page. According to Asanga, one of the four changeable subsidiary awarenesses. Also translated as investigation."
gross impermanence|The final destruction or disintegration of a nonstatic phenomenon.



guideline instructions|Beneficial practical advice concerning spiritual practice.
guideline teachings|Honorific for guideline instructions. See: guideline instructions.


guru-devotion|See: relating to a spiritual mentor in a healthy manner




habit, karmic constant|See: karmic constant habit



hallmarks of the Dharma, four|See: four hallmarks of the Dharma
hallowed|Pure and worthy of the highest respect; sacred.
happening, no-longer|See: no-longer-happening
happening, not-yet|See: not-yet-happening
happening, passed|See: no-longer-happening
happening, present|See: present-happening
happiness|That feeling which, when it stops, we wish to meet with it again.
happiness, mental|See: mental happiness








hearer|See: shravaka
heart essence division|Another name for the quintessence teachings division of treasure texts, and for the texts contained in this division.
heart essence teachings|Teachings emphasizing the primal purity aspect of pure awareness.
heartwarming love|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) with which one has a feeling of closeness and warmth toward anyone one meets.
heavenly musician|See: those who sustain themselves on fragrances
heightened awareness|See: advanced awareness



hidden mandala|See: secret mandala
hidden mantra|Synonymous with mantra."
hidden offering|An offering of one's blissful awareness or of one's blissful awareness of voidness, visualized in the form of an offering goddess.
hidden path of sutra|The mahamudra  teachings concealed in the Mahayana sutras and passed down in lineage from Maitripa to Marpa to Milarepa to Gampopa.
highly accomplished|Someone who has attained a spiritual goal.
highly  realized being|See: arya
highly realized practitioner|See: arya
Hinayana|Literally, a Modest Vehicle of Mind -- levels and states of mind with a modest motivation - renunciation - and, with modest methods, lead to the modest goal of liberation. Some translators render the term as Lesser Vehicle."


holding a deluded outlook as supreme|(1) According to Asanga, the disturbing attitude that regards as supreme any one of the three deluded outlooks -- a deluded outlook of a transitory network, an extreme outlook, or a distorted outlook -- and the samsara-perpetuating aggregates based on which the deluded outlook is produced. (2) According to Vasubandhu, the disturbing attitude that regards the samsara-perpetuating aggregates, based on which any of the three above-mentioned deluded outlooks is produced, with the discordant attention that they are totally clean by nature or a source of true happiness.
holding deluded morality or conduct as supreme|The disturbing attitude that regards as purified, liberated, and definitely delivered some deluded morality, some deluded conduct, and the samsara-perpetuating aggregate factors that give rise to the deluded morality and conduct.
hold, mental|See: mental hold



horizontal mental synthesis|A kind mental synthesis that extends over many instances of the same type of phenomenon, such as many tables.
hostility|A subcategory of anger: anger directed primarily, although not exclusively, at limited beings. One of the three poisonous emotions and  attitudes. See: anger.
householder|Someone who is neither a monk nor a nun.
how things are|Also called: thusness.




identitylessness|See: lack of an impossible soul"
identitylessness of all phenomena|See: lack of an impossible soul of all phenomena
identitylessness of a person|See: lack of an impossible soul of a person


ignorance|See: unawareness

illustrative accounts|Teachings of Buddha given with examples for ease of comprehension by the listener. One of the twelve scriptural categories.



immeasurably magnificent palace|A palace visualized in tantra practice as part of the supporting mandala. Each architectural feature of the palace represents one or another realization gained along the tantra path, and inside the palace reside one or more Buddha-figures.
immediate causes|The causes that are very close in time to bringing about a result.
immediately preceding condition|The immediately preceding moment of awareness, which produces the appearance-making and cognizing (clarity and awareness) of the next moment of awareness as its result.
immovables, three|See: three immovables
Immutable Vajra Body|See: Immutable Vajra Corpus
Immutable Vajra Corpus|In some Kagyu mahamudra systems, synonymous with Vajra Corpus in the meaning of the unchanging nature of the other four Corpuses of a Buddha.

impermanence|See: nonstaticness
impermanent|See: nonstatic phenomenon
impermanent phenomenon|See: nonstatic phenomenon
imperturbability|The constructive mental factor of not wishing to cause harm in response to limited beings (sentient beings), one's own suffering, or situations entailing suffering that may arise from either of the two or which may simply be the situations in which the suffering occurs. Sometimes translated as non-anger."

implicative negation phenomenon|An exclusion of something else in which, after the sounds of the words that exclude the object to be negated have negated that object, they leave behind in their wake, explicitly or implicitly, something else. Some translators render the term as affirming negation."

"
implicit apprehension|In the Gelug system, apprehension of a cognitive object in which a cognitive appearance (mental hologram) of the involved object itself does not arise; only a cognitive appearance of the basis for imputation of the involved object arises. Compare: explicit apprehension.
implicit suggested meaning|One of the six alternative meanings. When an expression in a root tantra text has two dissimilar meanings, the meaning that is dissimilar to the literal, evident, or face value meaning of the expression. It is the meaning suggested by the literal (explicit suggestive) meaning and to which one is led by that literal meaning.
implied object|See: conceptualized object
imply, conceptually|See: conceptually cling

impossible mode of existence|An invalid manner of establishing the existence something.
impossible soul"|(1) With respect to the five aggregate factors of an individual being, something findable inside the aggregates that is static, a partless monad, separable from the body and mind, and self-sufficiently knowable. (2) With respect to all validly knowable phenomena, an impossible mode of existence that establishes the existence of a phenomenon by the power of something findable inside that phenomenon."
impossible soul, lack of|See: lack of an impossible soul"
impossible soul of all phenomenon|An impossible mode of existence that establishes the existence of a phenomenon by the power of something findable inside that phenomenon.
impossible soul of all phenomenon, lack of|See: lack of an impossible soul of all phenomena
impossible soul of a person|Something totally nonexistent, findable inside the five aggregate factors of an individual being that is static, a partless monad, separable from the body and mind, and self-sufficiently knowable.
impossible soul of a person, lack of|See: lack of an impossible soul of a person



impulse, karmic|See: karma
impulse, mental|See: karma
impulses, affecting|See: link of affecting impulses


impure appearance|An appearance of something as a nonenlightened mind makes it appear, namely in only a mundane form and with true existence.
imputably knowable phenomenon|A validly knowable phenomenon that, when actually cognized, does rely on actual cognition of or by something else, specifically the object's basis for labeling.
imputation|See: mental labeling
impute|See: mental labeling
imputedly existent phenomenon|Equivalent to imputably knowable phenomenon."

inattentive cognition|See: nondetermining cognition
inbetween existence|See: bardo
inbetween state|See: bardo


incorrect consideration|See: paying attention in a discordant manner
increase|Also translated as stimulating others' good qualities"

indecisive cognition|See: indecisive wavering
indecisiveness|See: indecisive wavering
indecisive wavering|The mental factor (subsidiary awareness) that entertains two opinions about what is true – in other words, wavering between accepting or rejecting what is true. One of the six root disturbing emotions and attitudes. Sometimes translated as doubt."

indirect cognition|According to the non-Gelug presentation, the type of cognition that a present moment of sensory consciousness has of the immediately preceding moment of an external sense object, which no longer exists. Compare: direct cognition.
individual|A member of a set or category of phenomena.
individual being|See: person

individual defining characteristic mark|Something findable on the side of an object that establishes the identity or features of that object and which serves as the basis for that object being labeled by the names, words, and concepts for it, as well as for its qualities.

individualizing deep awareness|One of the five types of deep awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The deep awareness that singles out an object and is aware of it as a unique, individual item. Also called: deep awareness of the individuality of things.

individually characterized object exclusions of something else|In reference to an existent phenomenon this, negation phenomena such as nothing other than this and not that. (1) According to Gelug, they are nonstatic phenomena implicitly apprehended when a valid conceptual or nonconceptual cognition explicitly apprehends its involved object as this. (2) According to non-Gelug, a static fact about this that is validly knowable only conceptually, separately from valid cognition of this."


inferential cognition|A valid conceptual way of cognizing an obscure object through reliance on a correct line of reasoning as its basis.

influence, enlightening|See: enlightening influence
influencing nature|One of the threefold natures of pure awareness (rigpa), referring to the enlightening influence it has on others.
in focus|The appearance of something as being sharp and clear, not blurry.
inherent|The English word inherent means something inside an object that is there by means of the nature of that object, It is used in Buddhism to mean something inside an object, by nature of that object, which, by its own power, establishes that the object exists in general and exists specifically as this or that."

inherent existence|See: existence established by self-nature

initiation|See: empowerment
innate|See: simultaneously arising

inner mandala|A world-system represented by parts of the human body and used as an object of offering.
inner offering|An offering made of the flesh of various animals and various bodily fluids and wastes, representing either the five tainted aggregates and five bodily elements or the ten energy-winds, and which are specially elevated and transformed into pure nectar.




inseparable|Two facts about the same attribute of an object are inseparable if, when one is the case, so is the other. The two facts may inseparably both be the case either naturally or made to be so through the power of meditation.
insight|A nontechnical term for an understanding of a deeper level of meaning of something that one did not understand so deeply before or not at all before.
inspiration|(1) A transformation that someone or something confers, literally by means of a brightening, into a state of heightened power and ability resembling the position or status of the person or thing that confers it. (2) In the meaning of elevation, transformation of one's body, speech, and mind, or offering substances, into pure aspects, done during a tantric ritual. Some translators render the term as blessing."






instinct|See: karmic constant habit


instructions, guideline|See: guideline instructions
instructions, personal|See: personal instructions
instructor, Dharma|See: Dharma instructor
intellect|The mental activity that gives rise to conceptual cognition -- most commonly, to verbal conceptual thought.


intellectually derived|Descriptive of meditation with verbal thoughts based on conceptual schemes.

intelligence|The ability to discriminate between what is correct and what is incorrect, and between what is helpful and what is harmful.
intent|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) to obtain any object, to achieve any goal, or to do something with the object or goal once obtained or achieved, but based on prior deliberation and thus a stronger mental factor than intention .
intention|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) to obtain any object, to achieve any goal, or to do something with the object or goal once obtained or achieved.







interpolation|The projection or superimposition, onto an object, of a quality or a conventional or ultimate identity that it doesn't have. For instance, to superimpose true existence onto the conventionally existent me.  Literally, the term means sticking feathers on to something. Some translators render it as exaggeration, but it is not the exaggeration of something present. Rather, it is the adding of something that is not there, as if it were present.
interpretable teaching|A  passage in a sutra text that discusses any topic other than the most profound view of voidness, and which leads one on or points the way to the most profound view of voidness. Such passages require explanation, so that one does not confuse them as indicating the most profound view.


invalid cognition|(1) According to Gelug Sautrantika, Gelug Chittamatra, and Gelug Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, a cognition that is not fresh, or one that is fallacious, or one that is both not fresh and fallacious. (2) According to Gelug Prasangika and all tenet systems according to non-Gelug, a fallacious cognition.
invalid phenomenon|A phenomenon that cannot be validly known now. It may be either an existent phenomenon (such as a no-longer happening or a not-yet-happening one) or a nonexistent phenomenon.
investigation|See: gross detection
involved bodhichitta|See: engaged bodhichitta
involved object|The main object with which a particular cognition involves itself or engages. Equivalent to the object existing as cognitively taklen.

isolates|See: conceptually isolated item
items conceptually isolated by categories|In Gelug, a synonym for a conceptually isolated item, namely one that distinguishes a specific phenomenon in terms of its conceptual identity.
items conceptually isolated by themselves|In Gelug, a synonym for a conceptually isolated item, namely one that distinguishes a specific phenomenon in and of itself.



jasmine flower drops|Drops of white bodhichitta; drops of subtle creative energy.
jealousy|A disturbing emotion that focuses on other peoples' accomplishments – such as their good qualities, possessions, or success – and is the inability to bear their accomplishments, due to excessive attachment to one's own gain or to the respect one receives. Also translated as envy."
jenang|See: subsequent permission


Jnana-dharmakaya|See: deep awareness Dharmakaya
jnanamudra|See: sealing partner for deep awareness
joined inseparability|The relationship between two items that do not naturally occur simultaneously and inseparably, but are made to do so through the power of meditation. Once the attainments of both are joined, then whenever one is the case or is occurring, so is the other.
joined pair|A pair of items, joined inseparably, in which the initial attainment of one of the items occurs before the initial attainment of the other.
joy|See: joyful awareness

joyful perseverance|(1) In Mahayana, the mental urge that leads one to have zestful vigor for being constructive, without becoming lazy. With this mental factors, one takes joy in being constructive. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude. (2) For Theravada, see: perseverance."
joyful perseverance, armor-like|See: armor-like joyful perseverance


Kadam|One of the New Translation Period traditions of Tibetan Buddhism, deriving from Atisha's visit to Tibet. After its branches were merged and reformed, it continued as the Gelug tradition.
Kadampa|A follower of the Kadam tradition of Tibetan Buddhism.
Kadampa Geshe|A spiritual master and friend from the Kadam tradition of Tibetan Buddhism, especially one who is an extremely humble, down-to-earth master of attitude-training.
Kagyu|One of the New Translation Period traditions of Tibetan Buddhism. It has two branches, Shangpa Kagyu deriving from Kyungpo Neljor and Dagpo Kagyu deriving from the line Naropa, Marpa, Milarepa, and Gampopa.

Kagyupa|A follower of one of the Kagyu tradition of Tibetan Buddhism.
Kagyur|See: Kangyur
Kalachakra tantra root downfall|A transgression of one of the version of the root tantric vows that is specific to the practice of Kalachakra.

Kama|The god of desire in Hindu mythology.
Kangyur|The collection of the Tibetan translations of the enlightening words of the Buddha.
Kanjur|See: Kangyur

Kargyu|See: Kagyu
karma|(1) In all Tibetan Buddhist systems except Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika, equivalent to a subcategory of the mental factor (subsidiary awareness), an urge. It is the mental factor that brings the mind in the direction of a specific physical, verbal, or mental action. (2) In the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika, with respect to mental karmic actions, it is the mental factor of the urge that brings the mind in the direction of that action. With respect to physical or verbal karmic actions, it is (a) the revealing form of the physical impulse of the physical action or the sound of the words of the verbal action, plus (b) the nonrevealing form of the subtle invisible vibration of the action, which continues during and after the action. Some translators render the term karma as action. (3) A general term used loosely for behavioral cause and effect. Also called: karmic impulse.
Karma Kagyu|One of the four major Dagpo Kagyu traditions of Tibetan Buddhsim deriving from direct disciples of Gampopa, in this case the First Karmapa.

karmic action|A physical, verbal, or mental action brought on by and sustained by a karmic impulse.

karmic aftermath|A general, nontechnical term for everything left over on someone's mental continuum as a consequence of having committed a karmic action. It includes karmic potentials, a network of karmic force, karmic tendencies, and karmic constant habits. According to the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika tenet systems, also included, for physical and verbal actions, is a second phase of subtle karmic energy.

karmic constant habit|A type of karmic aftermath, imputable on one's mental continuum as an unspecified (ethically neutral) noncongruent affecting variable after having committed a karmic action, and which ripens into a result every moment until a true stopping of it has been achieved. Some translators render it as habit or instinct."
karmic energy|A general term for both positive and negative karmic energy. A constructive or destructive phenomenon that is the first phase of the karmic force of a karmic action.(1) In all Tibetan Buddhist systems except Vaibhashika and the Gelug Prasangika presentation, it is equivalent to the karmic action itself, from the point of view of what will ripen into a result intermittently.  (2) In the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika systems, this is the case only regarding mental karmic actions. With regard to physical and verbal karmic actions, it is equivalent to the karma of the action -- both its revealing and nonrevealing forms.
karmic force|A general term for both positive and negative karmic force -- the type of karmic aftermath that is either a constructive or destructive phenomenon and which will ripen into a result intermittently. (1) In all Tibetan Buddhist systems except Vaibhashika and the Gelug Prasangika presentation, it has two phases (a) the karmic energy, referring to the karmic action itself, and (b) the karmic potential, which is the karmic force that has taken on the essential nature of a karmic tendency (karmic seed). (2) In the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika system, this is the case only regarding  mental karmic actions. With regard to physical and verbal karmic actions, the karma of the action -- both its revealing and nonrevealing forms, as well as the karmic force that has taken on the essential nature of a karmic tendency.
karmic force, negative|See: negative karmic force
karmic force, positive|See: positive karmic force
karmic force that has taken on the essential nature of a karmic tendency|A synonym for karmic potential."
karmic habit|A synonym for karmic latency."
karmic impulse|See: karma
karmic impulse for further existence|A karmic impulse that activates the karmic aftermath of throwing karma just before one dies, thus enabling the aftermath to ripen into a next rebirth. Abbreviated as further existence."

karmic latency|A general term for all karmic aftermath -- namely, karmic potentials, karmic tendencies, and karmic constant habits.
karmic legacy|A general term for all karmic aftermath that ripen into a result intermittently -- namely, karmic potentials and karmic tendencies.

karmic potential|A general term for either positive or negative karmic potential. The phase of a karmic force that is a type of either constructive or destructive karmic aftermath, imputable as a noncongruent affecting variable on one's mental continuum after having committed a karmic action and which ripens into a result intermittently. (1) In all Tibetan Buddhist systems except Vaibhashika and the Gelug Prasangika presentation, it follows immediately after the karmic action ceases.  (2) In the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika systems, this is the case only with mental karmic actions. In the case of physical and verbal karmic actions, it is the phase of karmic force that follows immediately after the nonrevealing form of the action ceases.
karmic tendency|A type of karmic aftermath that is ethically neutral (unspecified as being either constructive or destructive), which is imputable on one's mental continuum after having committed a karmic action, and which ripens into a result only intermittently. Literally, a karmic seed."
kaya|See: Corpus of a Buddha
key points|The most important main points of a topic.

kind mental synthesis|The type of phenomenon that a specific individual item is an instance of, such as a table imputed on a specific instance of something having legs and a flat surface. This is equivalent to the conventional identity of something.
kindness|A beneficial action that is of help to others.
kindness, remembering|See: remembering kindness
kindness, repaying|See: repaying kindness
kind synthesis|See: kind mental synthesis
kind universal|See: kind mental synthesis
klesha|See: disturbing emotion or attitude

knowing, seven ways of|See: seven ways of knowing




label|A name applied to the knowable objects that the name signifies – whether or not those objects are validly knowable. Compare: name.
labeling|See: mental labeling
labeling, mental|See: mental labeling
label, mental|See: label
labored|A state of mind, such as bodhichitta, generated by working oneself up to it, with deliberate effort, through a series of steps, each of which entails a line of reasoning.

lack of a hope|The voidness or total lack of truly existent results of any phenomenon; literally, the lack of any truly existent results that one could hope for from a phenomenon.
lack of an action’s affecting variables|The voidness or total lack of true existence of the three affecting variables (three circles) involved with any action: an act to be done, an agent and an action that occurs.

lack of an impossible soul"|(1) With respect to the five aggregate factors of an individual being, the total absence (voidness) of something findable inside the aggregates that is static, a partless monad, separable from the body and mind, and self-sufficiently knowable. (2) With respect to all validly knowable phenomena, the total absence (voidness) of an impossible mode of existence that establishes the existence of a phenomenon by the power of something findable inside that phenomenon. Often translated by others as "selflessness or identitylessness."
lack of an impossible soul of all phenomena|The total absence (voidness) of an impossible mode of existence that establishes the existence of a phenomenon by the power of something findable inside that phenomenon. Often translated by others as selflessness of all phenomena or identitylessness of all phenomena."
lack of an impossible soul of a person|The total absence (voidness) of something findable inside the five aggregate factors of an individual being that is static, a partless monad, separable from the body and mind, and self-sufficiently knowable. Often translated by others as selflessness of a person or identitylessness of a person."
lack of a sign|The voidness or total lack of truly existent causes for any phenomenon; literally, the lack of any sign of truly existent causes from which a phenomenon arose.


lack of naivety|The discriminating awareness that is aware of the individual details concerning behavioral cause and effect or concerning reality, and which acts as the opponent for naivety about them.


lack of true identity|See: lack of an impossible soul"



lamrim|See: lam-rim
lam-rim|Graded path; graded stages of the path; graded stage of motivation; graded stages of pathway minds. A course of training in the Mahayana sutra teachings through which one makes progress by developing graded stages of motivation, which act as pathway minds leading to enlightenment.



latency|See: karmic latency
latency, karmic|See: karmic latency






leap-ahead|The practice, and resultant stage of the practice, in dzogchen during which one leaps ahead from the attainment of break-through, and during which effulgent rigpa gives rises to and cognizes itself as a rainbow body. During this stage, effulgent rigpa becomes increasingly more prominent, while essence rigpa is also prominently maintained. This stage is equivalent to an accustoming pathway of mind (path of meditation).
leap-ahead stage|See: leap-ahead


legacy|See: karmic legacy
legacy, karmic|See: karmic legacy

Lesser Vehicle|See: Hinayana

level, basis|See: basis level
level, pathway|See: pathway level
level, resultant|The level of a fully enlightened Buddha, attained as the result of Mahayana practice.
libation, golden|See: golden libation
liberated being|See: arhat

liberates itself in its own place|See: automatically releases itself in its own place
liberation|The state of an arhat; the state in which one has attained a true stopping of true suffering and the true origins of suffering, and thus a true stopping of samsara; the state in which one has attained a true stopping of the emotional obscurations.




light diffusion|also translated as: increase, red appearance
light-diffusion|One of the three subtle appearance-making minds.
limited awareness|See: sem
limited being|A being still having limited awareness. Any being other than a Buddha. Often rendered as sentient being."

lineage, distant|See: distant lineage
lineage, near|See: near lineage


link of affecting impulses|The second of the twelve links of dependent arising. A karmic impulse that will affect future lives; synonymous with throwing karma. Some translators render the term as the link of karmic formations."
link of aging and dying|The twelfth of the twelve links of dependent arsing. In a particular rebirth, the period starting immediately after the moment of conception and ending with the moment of death.
link of an obtainer|The ninth link in the twelve links of dependent arising. The set of four obtainer disturbing emotions and disturbing attitudes, any one of which, together with craving, activates throwing karma at the time of death and thus brings about the obtaining of a future samsaric rebirth. For the list of the four, see: obtainer. Most other translators render the term as link of grasping."
link of becoming|See: link of further existence
link of conception|The eleventh of the twelve links of dependent arising, equivalent to the first moment of the link of nameable mental faculties with or without gross form. The moment when the consciousness of a bardo being enters its next rebirth. In the case of rebirth as a human or an animal, the moment in which it enters the sperm and egg of its next parents.
link of contacting awareness|The sixth of the twelve links of dependent arising. The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of contacting awareness during the period of time in the development of a foetus when the distinguishing aggregate and such other affecting variables as contacting awareness are functioning, but the feeling aggregate is not yet functioning. During this period, one experiences contacting awareness of objects as pleasant, unpleasant, or neutral, but does not feel happy, unhappy, or neutral in response to this.
link of craving|The eighth of the twelve links of dependent arising, one of the mental factors that activate the karmic aftermath of throwing karma at the time of death. The three types of craving that occur at the time of death: (1) craving in relation to what is desirable, (2) craving because of fear, (3) craving in relation to further existence.
link of feeling a level of happiness|The seventh of the twelve links of dependent arising. The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of feeling a level of happiness starting at the time in the development of a foetus, and continuing for the rest of that lifetime, during which the person experiences happiness in response to pleasant contacting awareness, unhappiness in response to  unpleasant contacting awareness, and a neutral feeling in response to neutral contacting awareness.
link of further existence|The tenth of the twelve links of dependent arising. A karmic impulse, brought on by craving and an obtainer disturbing emotion or attitude, that activates the karmic aftermath of throwing karma just before one dies, thus enabling that throwing karma to ripen into the bardo existence, conception existence, predeath existence, and death existence of a next rebirth.
link of grasping|See: link of an obtainer
link of loaded consciousness|The third of the twelve links of dependent arising. A mental continuum containing the karmic aftermath of throwing karma, both during the lifetime in which the karmic action producing it has occurred. and during the future lifetime produced by that throwing karma.
link of loaded consciousness at the time of the cause|The first phase of the third of the twelve links of dependent arising, the link of loaded consciousness. A mental continuum containing the karmic aftermath of throwing karma during the lifetime in which the karmic action producing it has occurred. The first part of the third link of dependent arising, the link of loaded consciousness.
link of loaded consciousness at the time of the result|The second phase of the third of the twelve links of dependent arising, the link of loaded consciousness. A mental continuum containing the karmic aftermath of throwing karma during the future lifetime produced as a result of that throwing karma.
link of nameable mental faculties with or without gross form|The fourth of the twelve links of dependent arising. The four mental aggregates -- consciousness, feeling a level of happiness, distinguishing, and other affecting variables -- some of which are merely potentials -- together with the aggregate of forms of physical phenomena during a rebirth on the plane of sensory desires or the plane of ethereal forms, or without this aggregate during a rebirth on the plane of formless beings, during the period of time in the development of a foetus from the moment of conception up until the moment just before the cognitive faculties of seeing, hearing, and so on are differentiated.
link of stimulators of cognition|The fifth of the twelve links of dependent arising. The stimulators of cognition during the period of time in the development of a fetus from when the six different stimulators of cognition are differentiated up until but just before the aggregate of distinguishing is differentiated.
link of unawareness|The first of the twelve links of dependent arising. Both doctrinally based and automatically arising forms of not knowing how persons exist. Some translators render the term as the link of ignorance."
listener|See: shravaka
listening|At the time when the Buddhist teachings were only available in oral form, hearing the recitation of the teachings. Nowadays, also reading the teachings. By means of listening to the teachings, one learns about them.

loaded consciousness|See: link of loaded consciousness
loaded consciousness at the time of the cause, link of|See: link of loaded consciousness at the time of the cause
loaded consciousness at the time of the result, link of|See: link of loaded consciousness at the time of the result
loaded consciousness, link of|See: link of loaded consciousness


lojong|See: attitude-training

longdey|See: open space division
longing desire|The disturbing emotion that exaggerates the good qualities of an object that one does not possess and wishes to obtain it.
love|(1) The wish for someone to be happy and to have the causes for happiness. (2) In Theravada, when conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, the ninth of the ten far-reaching attitudes -- the attitude to work to bring about the welfare and happiness of others, even when doing so requires self-sacrifice.
love, caring|See: love
love, cherishing concerned|See: cherishing concerned love
love, great|See: great love
love, heartwarming|See: heartwarming love
loving-kindness|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) with which one not only wishes others to be happy and to have the causes for happiness, but with which one also acts towards others in a helpful manner.
lucidity|A quality of a well-concentrated mind with which the mind remains fresh in each moment.
Madhyamaka|A Mahayana school of Indian Buddhism that does not assert the true existence of anything. One of the four Indian Buddhist tenet systems studied by all traditions of Tibetan Buddhism.
Madhyamika|A follower of the Madhyamaka school of Indian Buddhism.




mahamudra|Literally, the great seal, a Mahayana meditation practice that focuses on the nature of the mind.
mahamudra, essence|See: essence mahamudra
mahamudra, mantra|See: mantra mahamudra
mahamudra, pathway|See: pathway mahamudra
mahamudra, sutra|See: sutra mahamudra



Mahayana|Literally, a Vast Vehicle of Mind - levels or states of mind that, with a vast motivation of bodhichitta, employ vast methods for reach the vast goal of enlightenment. Some translators render the term as Greater Vehicle."
Mahayana master|A spiritual mentor in whose presence disciples take bodhisattva vows. In a broader sense, a spiritual mentor whose teachings on compassion and bodhichitta lead disciples to develop aspiring and engaged bodhichittas, and then to take bodhisattva vows.
mahayoga|Within the Nyingma classification scheme of nine vehicles of mind, the class of tantra leading to dzogchen practice but with the main emphasis and detail on generation stage practice.





making arise|The mental activity of appearance-making, which causes a cognitive appearance (mental hologram) to occur as an object of cognition in a moment of a mental continuum. Also translated as: giving rise to."
mandala|In general, a round symbol used to represent a meaning. Most often used to represent a world system.
mandala, body|See: body mandala
mandala, cloth|See: cloth mandala
mandala, inner|See: inner mandala
mandala, mind|See: mind mandala





mandala, outer|See: outer mandala
mandala, powdered sand|See: powdered sand mandala
mandala, secret or hidden|See: secret mandala
mandala, speech|See: speech mandala
mandala, supported|See: supported mandala
mandala, supporting|See: supporting mandala
mandala, three-dimensional|See: three-dimensional mandala
manifest cognition|A cognition in which the consciousness gives rise to a mental hologram of a cognitive object and, in which, the cognitive object appears, through that hologram, both to the person and to the consciousness of the manifest cognition. Both the person and the manifest consciousness cognitively take it _ both cognize or know" it.

See also: subliminal cognition."
man-made result|A result that arises as the direct result of the effort of a limited being, but which does not ripen from karma.
man-made result that develops|See: man-made result that is produced
man-made result that is an attainment|The reaching of a goal as the result of someone's effort, but which does not ripen from that person's karma.
man-made result that is produced|Something material, such as a vase, a bruise, or a profit, that arises from someone's effort or actions, but which does not ripen from that person's karma.
mantra|"Sets of syllables and, often, additional Sanskrit words and phrases, all of which represent enlightening speech and which, when repeated, protect the mind from destructive states. While repeating the mantras of a Buddha-figure, one imagines having the abilities to communicate perfectly to everyone the complete means for eliminating suffering and reaching enlightenment. Mantras shape the breath, and consequently the subtle energy-winds, enabling one to bring the winds under control for use in meditation practice.  
"
mantra-gathering|A tantric ritual for giving disciples confidence in the accuracy of a mantra, in which the vowels and consonants of the Sanskrit alphabet are written with colored powder in a grid on the surface of a metal mirror and the tantric master reads out, one by one, the grid location of the consonant and vowel for each syllable of the main mantra.  After each specification of the consonant and vowel of a syllable, an assistant takes some colored powder from the mirror and uses it to write the syllable on the surface of another metal mirror.
mantra mahamudra|Meditations on the nature of the mind with regard to the subtlest mind, clear light.


Master Debate Partner|The title held by a highly educated attendant of an incarnate lama (tulku) that attends all the lessons that the lama receives and afterwards debates with the lama to ensure that he or she has understood the lesson correctly. In the case of His Holiness the Dalai Lama, there are seven master debate partners, one from each of the colleges of Drepung, Sera, and Ganden Monasteries. Sometimes also translated as Assistant Tutor."
material cause|See: obtaining cause



meaning category|The conceptual category into which fit all significances (meanings) of an audio category.
meaning, explicit suggestive|See: explicit suggestive meaning
meaning, implicit suggested|See: implicit suggested meaning
meaning/object category|The conceptual category into which fit all items to which an audio category refers. These items are also what the audio category signifies (means).
meaning universal|See: meaning category
means, appropriate|See: appropriate means



meditation|The repeated practice of generating and focusing on a beneficial state of mind in order to build it up as a habit.

meditation, discerning|See: discerning meditation
meditation, stabilizing|See: stabilizing meditation
meditation trainer|A teacher who instructs one in the mechanics of meditation, such as the correct posture.
meditative equipoise|See: total absorption

melodic verses|One of the twelve scriptural categories. (1) Verses that Buddha uttered during the course of and at the conclusion of his sutras. (2) According to some explanations, scriptures of interpretable meaning.

menngag-dey|See: quintessence teachings division

mental abiding|The aspect of a cognition that describes the degree to which attention remains on the focal object. Also translated as mental placement, it is established by the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of mental fixation.


mental aspect|A nonstatic mental hologram, asserted by all Indian Buddhist tenet systems other than Vaibhashika, that is a likeness of an object of cognition, and which both conceptual and nonconceptual mental activity produces in order to cognize the object; the mental shape of the appearing object of a cognition. (1) According to Gelug, except in the case of Chittamatra and Yogachara Svatantrika, they are fully transparent so that through them, one directly cognizes external objects. (2) According to non-Gelug, they are opaque and thus allow only indirect cognition of external objects.

mental body|The type of body that arhats in pure lands have. See: forms of physical phenomena having the functional nature of mind.




mental consciousness|A primary consciousness that can take any existent phenomenon as its object and which relies on merely the previous moment of cognition as its dominating condition and not on any physical sensors.
mental constancy|See: mental stability
mental construct|See: mental fabrication
mental continuum|The stream of continuity of mental activity (mind, awareness) of an individual being, which has no beginning, which continues even into Buddhahood, and, according to Mahayana, has no end. According to the Hinayana tenets, it comes to an end when an arhat or Buddha dies at the end of the lifetime in which the person attains liberation or enlightenment. Also called a mind-stream."
mental derivative|(A) In Gelug, except in the case of Chittamatra and Yogachara Svatantrika: (1) In sensory nonconceptual cognition, a fully transparent appearing object, which is a mental aspect, similar to a mental hologram of an external objective entity, through which that external entity is directly cognized also as an appearing object of the cognition. (2) In conceptual cognition, a static conceptual category that is mentally constructed from all individual objective entities that fit into it and thus is a semitransparent, static, metaphysical entity. It is the appearing object through which a fully transparent mental representation of a specific objective entity is cognized.  (B) In non-Gelug, except in the case of Chittamatra: (1) In sensory nonconceptual cognition, the opaque, directly cognized appearing object, which is a mental aspect similar to a mental hologram of an external objective entity that the cognition indirectly cognizes as its focal object, but not as an additional appearing object. (2) In conceptual cognition, a conceptually isolated item, an opaque metaphysical entity that stands for the mentally synthesized commonsense object and category in the cognition and which is the appearing object of the cognition.
mental dullness|A mental factor (subsidiary awareness) faulting the appearance-making of mindfulness's mental hold on an object of focus. Some translators render the term as sinking."
mental exclusions|See: mental exclusions of something else
mental exclusions of something else|Static implicative negation phenomena, including audio categories, meaning/object categories, and conceptually isolated items.
mental fabrication|An appearance of truly established existence that mental activity in a conceptual cognition produces and projects due to the habits of grasping for truly established existence.
mental factor|See: subsidiary awareness
mental faculties, nameable, with or without gross form|See: nameable mental faculties with or without gross form
mental fixation|The mental factor (subsidiary awareness) of maintaining mental placement on any object of cognition taken by any type of cognition, including sensory cognition. Also called mentally fixating and concentration, it accompanies all cognitions and varies in intensity from very weak to very strong. When perfected, it becomes absorbed concentration."
mental flightiness|See: flightiness of mind
mental glue|See: mental hold

mental hold|The aspect of a cognition that describes the level of strength of maintenance of attention on the focal object, without letting go of it. Also translated as mental glue, it is established by the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of mindfulness and has two aspects: mental abiding and appearance-making.

mental impulse|See: karma
mental label|See: label
mental labeling|To impute (project, superimpose), with conceptual cognition, an audio category (such as the word or name table) or a meaning/object category (such as a table as an individual object) onto a basis (such as four legs and a flat board on top of them). Also translated as imputation."
mentally constructed synthesis|See: mental synthesis
mentally fixating|See: mental fixation

mental placement|See: mental abiding

mental quiescence|See: stilled and settled state of mind
mental reflection|See: mental derivative
mental representation|Something that appears in a conceptual cognition. (1) In Gelug, a static, fully transparent conceptually isolated item through which the cognition cognizes the external object that the hologram resembles; equivalent to a mental aspect. (2) In non-Gelug, a static, partially transparent mentally synthesized commonsense object and category through which the cognition cognizes a conceptually isolated item (a mental aspect) that stands for a commonsense object.
mental semblance|See: mental aspect

mental stability|Single-pointed placement of the mind on any constructive focal object, without any mental wandering -- a stable state of mind that is not only free of flightiness and dullness, but is also not distracted by any disturbing emotion of the plane of sensory desires. In Mahayana, when conjoined with bodhichitta, a far-reaching attitude. Some translators render the term as concentration."
mental synthesis|The imputation of a conceptual category in which the bases for imputation are the individual sensibilia of a commonsense object, the parts of any of the sensibilia of a commonsense object, the moments in the continuum of a commonsense object, or items sharing a common defining characteristic. Synonymous with conceptual category and category."
mental synthesis, collection|See: collection mental synthesis
mental synthesis, kind|See: kind mental synthesis
mental synthesis, object|See: object mental synthesis
mental urge|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that causes the mental activity to face an object or to go in its direction. In general, it moves a mental continuum to cognitively take an object. It is equivalent to mental karma and, according to Sautrantika, Chittamatra, Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, and the non-Gelug Prasangika-Madhyamaka schools, it is equivalent to physical and verbal karmas as well.
mental wandering|A subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that causes the mind to lose concentration and to go on and on, uncontrollably from one object to another, due to any reason.
mentor, spiritual|See: spiritual mentor
mere|Only this, without anything more.
mere equanimity|An equal attitude toward everyone that is devoid of attachment to loved ones, repulsion from enemies, and indifference toward strangers, developed in common in both Hinayana and Mahayana.
merely aspiring bodhichitta|See: merely aspiring state of aspiring bodhichitta
merely aspiring state of aspiring bodhichitta|The initial state of aspiring bodhichitta, with which one focuses on one's own future enlightenment and merely has the intention to attain it and to benefit all beings by means of it. Also called: the mere state of aspiring bodhichitta.
mere taking of safe direction|Synonymous with causal taking of safe direction."
merit|See: positive karmic force

me, solid|See: solid me"


metaphysical entities|In the Sautrantika and Chittamatra tenet systems, those phenomena, the existence of which is established by their being merely imputed by conceptual cognition and which are superficial (relative, conventional) true phenomena. According to Sautrantika, they include all static phenomena; according to Chittamatra, they include all static phenomena other than voidnesses, true stoppings, and nirvanas. (1) In the Gelug system, they are the appearing objects of only conceptual cognitions, although they are not the actual cognitive appearances in those cognitions. They may be validly cognized not only by valid conceptual cognition, but also implicitly by valid nonconceptual cognition. (2) In the non-Gelug systems, they can only be validly cognized by valid conceptual cognition. Also translated as generally characterized phenomena."
metered verses|Two-to-six-lined verses composed by Buddha. One of the twelve scriptural categories.
method of actualization|See: sadhana

mind|The cognitive activity of merely giving rise to an appearance or mental hologram of something knowable and cognitively engaging with it.
mind division|The division of treasure texts, deriving from the Indian texts translated into Tibetan by Vairochana, that emphasizes pure awareness as the basis for all. Often referred to by the transliterated Tibetan semdey."
mind, exceptionally perceptive state of|See: exceptionally perceptive state of mind
mindfulness|(1) The subsidiary awareness (mental factor), similar to a mental glue, that keeps a mental hold on a cognitive object, so that it is not lost. (2) The recollection of something, with which the mind keeps a mental hold on a mental hologram that resembles and represents something previously cognized. The term is often rendered as memory or remembering, but has nothing to do with the recording or storage of mental information.


mind-itself|In the Kagyu and Nyingma systems, the deepest nature of the mind.


mind, noncontriving|See: noncontriving mind
mind-only|One of the four Indian Buddhist tenet systems, which asserts that forms of physical phenomena do not exist externally, coming from different natal sources than those of the minds that cognize them. Externally existing physical phenomena do not act as a natal source of the mental appearances (mental holograms) of them that arise in the cognition of them. The source of these mental appearances is only the mind -- or, more specifically, only the karmic tendency (karmic seed) for cognition of them, which is imputed on a mental continuum. The karmic tendency is the natal source" of all aspects of the cognition of forms of physical phenomena: both the mental appearance as well as the consciousness and accompanying mental factors. Moreover, the mind (namely, the mental continuum on which the karmic tendency for cognition of these forms is imputable) has truly established existence. 
See: Chittamatra"
mind, primordial|See: primordial mind

mind, serenely stilled and settled|See: stilled and settled state of mind
mind, stilled and settled state of|See: stilled and settled state of mind
mind-stream|See: mental continuum
mind, subtle|See: subtle mind
mind, subtlest|See: clear light awareness
mind-training|See: attitude-training

miraculous emanations|(1) In mahamudra and dzogchen texts, a descriptive synonym for the mental aspects (mental appearances, mental holograms) that are produced by the clarity aspect of the mind and which are directly cognized by conceptual or nonconceptual cognition. (2) A synonym for extraphysical emanations.
miraculous powers|See: extraphysical emanations
mirror-like deep awareness|One of the five types of deep awareness that all beings have as an aspect of Buddha-nature. The deep awareness that takes in all the information about an object of cognition. Also called: deep awareness that is like a mirror.

miserable phenomena|One of the four aspects of true sufferings. The five aggregate factors from the point of view of their being under the control of the true origins (true causes) of suffering and thus are subject to one or more of the three types of suffering without any break.
mixed with confusion|See: tainted

model clear light mind|A subtle  level of consciousness that has a blissful conceptual cognition of voidness, which is attained when the subtle energy-winds are partly dissolved in the central energy-channel. Also translated as approximating clear light mind."

Modest Vehicle|See: Hinayana
Modest Vehicle of Mind|See: Hinayana

moldings|(on walls or ceilings)
moment|The smallest unit of time.
monad|An undifferentiated, partless whole, either the size of an atom or the size of the universe, asserted by non-Buddhist schools of Indian philosophy as descriptive of the atman, the soul of a person.

monastic community|See: Sangha
monastic sangha|See: Sangha
moral self-dignity|As defined by Asanga, the sense to refrain from negative behavior because of caring how one's actions reflect on oneself.
moral self-dignity, no|See: no moral self-dignity
moral self-dignity, no sense of|See: no moral self-dignity
mother-awareness|The recognition of all beings as having at some time been one's mother. The first of the seven-part cause and effect quintessence teaching for developing bodhichitta.

motivating aim|Synonymous with intention. See: intention.
motivating aim, causal|See: causal motivating aim
motivating aim, contemporaneous|See: contemporaneous motivating aim
motivating mental framework|"A state of mind that accompanies a karmic urge or impulse and which is a cluster of three mental factors (subsidiary awarenesses): distinguishing an object on which to focus the action, the motivating aim of what one intends to do with or to that object, and a motivating emotion or attitude.
"
motivation|When used in Western languages, a state of mind that entails two mental factors (subsidiary awarenesses): a motivating aim and a motivating emotion. A motivating aim is the mental factor of an intention – the intention to reach a certain goal for a certain purpose. A motivating emotion is the mental factor of the positive or negative emotion, such as love and compassion, or jealousy and greed, which accompanies the intention and moves one to attain that goal.







mundane|Related to the mental continuum of a non-arya -- someone who has not yet attained nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths. Also translated as perishably based and worldly."

musician, heavenly|See: those who sustain themselves on fragrances
mutually exclusive|Two sets are mutually exclusive if they do not share any common locus -- neither contains a member that also belongs to the other. Also translated as contradictory."

naivety|A subcategory of unawareness. The unawareness of behavioral cause and effect or of reality that accompanies only destructive states of mind or behavior. One of the three poisonous emotions.
name|A combination of sounds that are assigned a meaning.

nameable mental faculties with or without gross form, link of|See: nameable mental faculties with or without gross form
name and form|See: link of nameable mental faculties with or without gross form
narratives, ancient|See: ancient narratives
narratives, ethical|See: ethical narratives
natal source|That which gives rise to something, such as a womb for a baby or an oven for a loaf of bread.
natural inseparability|The relationship between two items, in which when one is the case or is occurring, then automatically so is the other.
naturally abiding family-traits|(1) In the Chittamatra system, the seeds that, without beginning, are imputable on the basis of the stained mind of each limited being and which serve as factors allowing that being to attain one of the three purified states. (2) In the Madhyamaka systems, the voidnesses imputable on the basis of the stained mind of each limited being.
naturally destructive uncommendable action|See: naturally uncommendable action
naturally inseparable aspects|See: natural inseparability


naturally uncommendable action|A negative action which, because it is destructive by nature, ripens into the experience of suffering by anyone who commits it.
natural nirvana|Equivalent to voidness (emptiness), the natural state of all phenomena being released from impossible ways of existing. Asserted only by the Mahayana tenet systems.
natural stain|See: self-established stain
nature|nature (of a person)
nature, actual|See: actual nature
Nature Body|See: Corpus of Essential Nature
nature, essential|See: essential nature
nature, functional|See: functional nature

near lineage|The lineage of a teaching that did not begin with Buddha himself, but began with an Indian or Tibetan master, usually through a pure vision.

negatingly known phenomenon|See: negation phenomenon
negation|See: negation phenomenon
negation phenomenon|An item, or a truth about an item, defined in terms of the exclusion of something else, in which an object to be negated is explicitly precluded by the conceptual cognition that cognizes the phenomenon. Also translated as: negation, nullification, refutation."
negation phenomenon, implicative|See: implicative negation phenomenon
negation phenomenon, nonimplicative|See: nonimplicative negation phenomenon
negative force|See: negative karmic force
negative karmic force|The type of karmic force associated with a destructive action and which ripens intermittently into unhappiness and the suffering of problems and pain. Also called: negative karmic potential. Some translators render it as sin. See: karmic force.
negative potential|See: negative karmic force
network|Also translated as: collection
network of deep awareness|A constructive noncongruent affecting variable imputable on the moments of conceptual or nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths or of voidness, on the mental continuum of a limited being, when followed by a bodhichitta dedication, and which functions as the obtaining cause for the Dharmakaya of a Buddha. Also called: bountiful store of deep awareness. Some translators render the term as collection of wisdom or collection of insight."
network of positive force|A constructive noncongruent affecting variable imputable on the positive force on the mental continuum of a limited being, when dedicated with bodhichitta, and which functions as the obtaining cause for the Form Corpus of a Buddha. Also called: bountiful store of positive force. Some translators render the term as collection of merit."

neutral feeling|That feeling which, when it arises, one neither wants to be parted from it, nor, when it stops, one wishes to meet it again.
New Translation|An adjective referring to (1) the period of the second transmission of the Dharma from India to Tibet, (2) one of the traditions of Tibetan Buddhism founded during this period -- namely, Kagyu, Sakya, Kadam or Gelug, (3) a text translated during this period.
New Transmission|See: New Translation

ngondro|See: preliminary practices



Nirmanakaya|See: Corpus of Emanations
nirvana|An extinguished state of release -- either an acquired one, in which all samsaric sufferings and their causes have been removed, or a naturally occurring one, in which all stains of impossible existence have always been removed. The Tibetan term means, literally, a state beyond sorrow."
nirvana, acquired|See: acquired nirvana
nirvana, natural|See: natural nirvana
nirvana, nonabiding|See: nonabiding nirvana
nirvana without residue|(1) According to the Hinayana tenet systems, the state of nirvana that shravaka or pratyekabuddha arhats, or a Buddha, attains immediately upon their death from the lifetime in which they attain nirvana with residue. No longer having a residue of tainted aggregates left, their mental continuum extinguishes, like a spent candle. (2) According to the Mahayana tenet systems other than Gelug Prasangika, the state that shravaka or pratyekabuddha arhats attain immediately upon their death from the lifetime in which they attain nirvana with residue. Although they no longer have a residue of tainted aggregates left, their mental continuums now go on in a purified form. (3) According to Gelug Prasangika, in reference to shravaka and pratyekabuddha arhats, their state during total absorption on voidness, when there is no appearance-making of truly established existence. In reference to Buddhas, their Deep Awareness Dharmakayas.
nirvana with residue|(1) According to the Hinayana tenet systems, the state of nirvana that a shravaka or pratyekabuddha arhat, or a Buddha, attains during his lifetime and which lasts only so long as the person is alive. This is so called because the person still has left a residue of tainted aggregates. (2) According to the Mahayana tenet systems other than Gelug Prasangika, the same as asserted by the Hinayana systems, but in reference only to shravaka and pratyekabuddha arhats. (3) According to Gelug Prasangika, in reference to shravaka and pratyekabuddha arhats, their state either during subsequent attainment (post-meditation) periods, when meditating on something other than voidness, or when not meditating at all. In reference to Buddhas, their Corpuses of Form.
noble one|See: arya


no-longer-happening|The past occurrence of something. According to Gelug Sautrantika, Chittamatra, and Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, a static nonimplicative negation phenomenon; according to Gelug Prasangika, a nonstatic implicative negation phenomenon. Also translated as passed-happening."

nominal Buddha Gem|A painting or statue of a Buddha, representing a Buddha that is an actual source of safe direction and serving as a basis for showing respect to an actual Buddha Gem.
nominal Dharma Gem|Printed Dharma texts, representing the Dharma that is an actual source of safe direction and serving as a basis for showing respect to the actual Dharma Gem.

nominal gem|Representations of the Three Rare and Supreme Gems, which themselves are not actual sources of safe direction, but which serve as a basis for showing respect to them.
nominal Sangha Gem|"Four or more people from any of the four groups of the monastic sangha (full or novice monks or nuns), representing the Sangha that is an actual source of safe direction and serving as a basis for showing respect to the actual Sangha Gem. 
"


nonabiding nirvana|(1) According to the Hinayana tenet systems, the static unchanging state of full enlightenment attained by a Buddha and lasting only so long as he is alive. In this state, a Buddha does not abide in either the extreme of continued samsaric suffering or in the extreme of the passivity of a Hinayana arhat's nirvana without residue. (2) According to the Mahayana tenet systems, including Gelug Prasangika, the static unchanging state of full enlightenment attained by a Buddha and lasting forever, in which a Buddha does not abide in either the extreme of continued samsaric suffering or in the extreme of the passivity of a Hinayana arhat's nirvana without residue.

nonaffirming negation|See: nonimplicative negation phenomenon
non-anger|See: imperturbability
nonattachment|See: detachment
non-Buddhist extremist|A follower of a non-Buddhist Indian school of philosophy that asserts either an eternalist position of an unchanging static soul (atman) of a person or a nihilist position that denies the continuity of a person after death and/or the workings of karmic cause and effect.
nonconceptuailty|A state of mind that cognizes an object without the filter of a concept, idea, category, or universal.

nonconceptual cognition|Cognition of an object, without that cognition being through the medium of a universal, a category, or a mental label.


noncongruent|The relationship between nonstatic components of a cognition, in which two or more of them do not share five things in common. See: five congruent features. See also: noncongruent affecting variables.
noncongruent affecting variable|One of the three types of nonstatic phenomena -- those nonstatic phenomena that do not share five things in common with the primary consciousness and subsidiary awarenesses of the cognition in which they occur, and which are neither forms of physical phenomena nor ways of being aware of something. Sometimes translated as nonstatic abstractions. See: five congruent features.

nondenumerable ultimate phenomenon|Voidnesses that are validly cognized nonconceptually. They are nondenumerable in the sense that they cannot be counted among what appears to minds validly cognizing phenomena through mentally labeling them with words and concepts, thus they are voidnesses that are beyond words and beyond concepts."
nondetermining cognition|A cognition of an object, in which (a) the involved object is an objective entity, (b) a mental aspect (mental hologram) of the involved object arises, but (c) there is no ascertainment (certainty, decisiveness) of what the involved object is or that the cognition of it has occurred. Also called: inattentive cognition.



nondual|(1) In Gelug Prasangika, the absence (the voidness) of a manner of existence that does not correspond to the actual manner in which everything exists. (2) In non-Gelug Madhyamaka, within a cognition, the absence (the voidness) of a consciousness and its object as each having truly established existence, independently of each other. (3) In Chittamatra, within a cognition, the absence (the voidness) of a consciousness and its object as deriving from different natal sources.
nondual tantra|A division of anuttarayoga tantra, specified only in the non-Gelug schools, in which there is equal emphasis on practices for generating the physical bodies of a Buddha and practices for generating the mind of a Buddha.
nonexistent phenomenon|See: nonexistents
nonexistents|Things that cannot be validly known.
nonfallacious|Not incorrect.
nonfunctional phenomenon|(1) An validly knowable, existent  object that does not perform a function -- in other words, it does not produce a result -- namely, a static phenomenon. (2) A nonexistent object, such as an impossible way of existing.

nonimplicative negation exclusions of something else|Synonymous with nonimplicative negation phenomena, and thus include voidnesses, spaces, and other absences.
nonimplicative negation phenomenon|An exclusion of something else in which, after the sounds of the words that exclude the object to be negated have negated that object, they do not leave behind in their wake, explicitly or implicitly, something else. Some translators render the term as a nonaffirming negation."

"

nonobstructive unspecified phenomenon|A phenomenon that Buddha did not specify as being either constructive or destructive, and which does not hinder the attainment of liberation.

nonrevealing form|A subtle form of physical phenomenon, asserted only by the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika schools, that is caused by a strong constructive or destructive motivation, but which does not show (reveal) that motivation. Such a phenomenon is part of a mental continuum, but is not felt on that continuum; it does not degenerate from moment to moment; it can only be an object of mental cognition; and it must be either constructive or destructive. Examples are vows and one aspect of karmic impulses.

nonstatic|See: nonstatic phenomenon
nonstatic abstraction|See: noncongruent affecting variable
nonstaticness|The noncongruent affecting variable of changing from moment to moment, under the influence of causes and circumstances. Sometimes translated as impermanence."

nonstatic phenomenon|Phenomena that are affected and supported by causes and circumstances and, consequently, change from moment to moment, and which produce effects. Their streams of continuity may have a beginning and an end, a beginning and no end, no beginning but an end, or no beginning and no end. Some translators render the term as impermanent phenomena. They include forms of physical phenomena, ways of being aware of something, and noncongruent affecting variables, which are neither of the two.
nonupsetting|A way of being aware of something that shares five congruent features with an arya's total absorption on voidness.
nonvirtuous|See: destructive
normal awareness|In the Karma Kagyu system, a synonym for clear light mind, which is normal in the sense that it is the primordial, natural state that has always been the case.

no sense of ethical self-dignity|See: no moral self-dignity
no sense of moral self-dignity|See: no moral self-dignity
nothing-other-than|An implicative negation phenomenon that leaves behind in its wake what is left when one excludes or eliminates everything that is not a specific object.


not-yet-happening|The future occurrence of something. According to Gelug Sautrantika, Chittamatra, and Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, a static nonimplicative negation phenomenon; according to Gelug Prasangika, a nonstatic implicative negation phenomenon.

nullification|See: negation phenomenon

Nyingma|The Old Translation Period tradition of Tibetan Buddhism deriving from Guru Rinpoche, Padmasambhava.


Nyingmapa|A follower of the Nyingma tradition of Tibetan Buddhism.

nyingtig|See: heart essence teachings

object, appearing|See: appearing object
object category|The conceptual category into which fit all items to which an audio category refer.
object clear light|Voidness as the object cognized by clear light awareness.
object, conceptualized|See: conceptualized object
object exclusions|See: individually characterized object exclusions of something else
object, focal|See: focal object
object, involved|See: involved object
objective condition|See: focal condition
objective entities|In the Sautrantika and Chittamatra tenet systems, those phenomena, the existence of which is established by their not being merely imputed by conceptual cognition. They include all nonstatic phenomena. According to Sautrantika, they include all nonstatic phenomena and are deepest true phenomena; according to Chittamatra, they include not only all nonstatic superficial true phenomena, but also the static deepest true phenomena of voidnesses, true stoppings, and nirvanas. (1) In the Gelug tradition, the appearing objects of only valid nonconceptual cognitions, although they are what actually appears and can be validly cognized in both valid nonconceptual and conceptual cognition. (2) In the non-Gelug systems, they can only be validly cognized by valid nonconceptual cognition. Also translated as individually characterized phenomena."
object mental synthesis|"(1) The conceptual category of a commonsense object, such as a table, used when thinking of, verbalizing, imagining (visualizing), or remembering a commonsense object. (2) A specific commonsense object as a conceptual category into which fit all moments of anyone's mental or sensory cognition of any amount of parts of any of its sensibilia.  
"



object of focus, pervasive|See: pervasive object of focus

object, specific|See: specific object
objects taken and minds that take them|See: consciousness that takes objects and objects taken by consciousness
objects that indicate a safe direction|A general term for the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha.
object synthesis|See: object mental synthesis
object to be negated|For use with the German section only.
object universal|See: object mental synthesis
obscuration|A fleeting stain that temporarily covers or accompanies mental activity (more precisely, clear light mental activity), thereby preventing the mental activity from cognizing objects without suffering or other limitations. Some translators render the term as obstacle."
obscurations about all knowables|See: cognitive obscurations
obscurations, emotional|See: emotional obscurations
obscurations, five|See: five obscurations
obscurations of not knowing|Mental blocks that come from not knowing the Dharma in general or specifically not knowing about the emotional and cognitive obscurations. These mental blocks prevent the attainment of liberation and enlightenment.
obscurations preventing liberation|See: emotional obscurations
obscurations preventing omniscience|See: cognitive obscurations
obscurations that are the disturbing emotions and attitudes|See: emotional obscurations
obscure phenomenon|A validly knowable phenomenon that cannot be apprehended through the force of personal experience, but can be apprehended through the force of a line of reasoning.

obstacles, five|See: five obscurations

obstructive unspecified phenomenon|A phenomenon that Buddha did not specify as being either constructive or destructive, and which hinders the attainment of liberation.
obtainer|A set of four disturbing emotions and disturbing attitudes: (1) obtainer desire, (2) an obtainer deluded outlook, (3) holding deluded morality or conduct as supreme, and (4) asserting one's identity, and which, when occurring at the time of death, constitute the ninth link of dependent arising.
obtainer attitude|A general term coined to refer to the last three obtainers that constitute the ninth link of dependent arising: (1) an obtainer deluded outlook, (2) holding deluded morality or conduct as supreme, and (3) asserting one's identity.
obtainer deluded outlook|A set of three disturbing deluded outlooks on life that constitute the second of the four obtainers that constitute the ninth link of dependent arising: (1) a distorted outlook, (2) an extreme outlook, (3) holding a deluded outlook as supreme.
obtainer desire|The mental factor (subsidiary awareness) of longing desire specifically for some desirable sensory object on the plane of sensory desires. See: longing desire. Equivalent to the obtainer emotion, it is the first of the four obtainers that constitute the ninth link of dependent arising.
obtainer emotion|Equivalent to obtainer desire.
obtaining aggregates|Aggregate factors of a limited being that include the causes that will obtain for that being further samsaric rebirth.
obtaining cause|The cause from which a result is obtained and which transforms into the result. For example, a seed is the obtaining cause for a sprout, and a network of positive force (a collection of merit) is the obtaining cause for a Corpus of Forms (Form Body) of a Buddha. Some translators render the term as material cause, but this term does not refer to the physical elements that make up something.
obvious phenomenon|A validly knowable phenomenon that can be cognized by valid nonconceptual straightforward cognition. Also defined as a validly knowable phenomenon that be apprehended through the force of personal experience.


offering|Something presented, with respect and the intention to bring happiness and benefit, to someone else.
offering, hidden|See: hidden offering
offering, inner|See: inner offering
offering of the very nature of reality|Offering of a nonconceptual cognition of voidness with a blissful awareness or of one's nonconceptual blissful cognition of voidness together with one's appearance as an illusory body.
offering, outer|See: outer offerings
offering ritual|A tantra ceremony in which specially consecrated offerings are made to honor one's tantric master, inseparable from a Buddha-figure.
offering, secret|See: inner offering
offerings of absorbed concentration|Offerings made of various aspects of one's Dharma practice, visualized in the form of the outer offerings. Also called: offerings of samadhi.
offerings of samadhi|See: offerings of absorbed concentration
offspring, spiritual|See: spiritual offspring
Old Translation|An adjective referring to (1) the period of the first transmission of the Dharma from India to Tibet, (2) the Nyingma traditions of Tibetan Buddhism founded during this period, (3) a text translated during this period.
Old Transmission|See: Old Translation
omniscience|See: omniscient awareness
omniscient awareness|A Buddha's unceasing nonconceptual cognition simultaneously of all validly knowable phenomena and their voidnesses -- in other words, of the two truths about all knowable phenomena.


open space|See: cognitive open space
open space division|The division of treasure texts, deriving from the oral teachings of the translator Vairochana, that emphasizes the cognitive open space aspect of pure awareness as the basis for all. Often referred to by the transliterated Tibetan longdey."




oral transmission|A ceremony during which a spiritual teacher reads aloud or recites from memory, without any mistakes, a Buddhist text or mantra to disciples who listen attentively. The teacher needs to have heard, himself or herself, the words of the text or mantra recited faultlessly by his or her own teacher, who likewise heard it in this manner in an unbroken lineage tracing back to Buddha or to the author of the text. The ceremony insures the accurate transmission of the words, although neither the teacher reciting them nor the disciple hearing them need to understand their meaning.
ordinary being|A limited being who has not yet attained the state of an arya. In other words, someone who has not yet attained nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths.
ordinary commotion|The emotional ups and downs of overexcitement and depression in response to the eight transitory things in life: praise or criticism, good or bad news, gains or losses, things going well or poorly.





other-powered phenomena|See: dependent phenomenon
other-voidness|The natural, beginningless absence from the clear light level of mental activity of other levels of mental activity, which are all limited by fleeting stains.
outer mandala|A round, flat-bottomed bowl, held bottom side up, with three mounds of grain, placed one atop the other on its surface and contained within progressively smaller concentric metal rings, and crowned with an ornamental diadem. It is used as an offering to a spiritual master in request for a teaching, the conferring of a set of vows, and for the conferring of a tantric empowerment. It is also used as an offering of appreciation at the conclusion of these three occasions. It is also offered 100,000 times as a preliminary practice for building up positive force for success in the practice of tantra.
outer offerings|Offerings of specially consecrated external objects such as water, flowers, incense, and so on.

outlook|A way of regarding and understanding objects, for instance as me and mine."
outlook, extreme|See: extreme outlook
outlook of holding deluded morality or conduct as supreme|See: holding deluded morality or conduct as supreme
overlord condition|See: dominating condition
overlord result|See: dominating result
overriding result|See: dominating result
own face|The manner of existence and good qualities of pure awareness (rig-pa) as can be cognized by reflexive deep awareness.






pair, joined|See: joined pair
pair, unified|See: unified pair



paramita|See: far-reaching attitude



parted from mental fabrication|See: state parted from mental fabrication
parted from taking to mind|See: state parted from taking to mind
parting|Also translated as: separation

partner, pure awareness|See: pure awareness partner
partner, sealing|See: sealing partner

passed-happening|See: no-longer-happening
past life accounts|Accounts of the difficult ascetic practices that Buddha performed in his previous lives while engaging in the conduct of the bodhisattvas. One of the twelve scriptural categories.
path|See: pathway mind

path of accumulation|See: building-up pathway mind
path of accustoming|See: accustoming pathway mind
path of application|See: applying pathway mind
path of building up|See: building-up pathway mind
path of meditation|See: accustoming pathway mind

path of no further learning|See: pathway mind needing no further training
path of no further training|See: pathway mind needing no further training
path of preparation|See: applying pathway mind
path of seeing|See: seeing pathway mind


pathway level|In the context of basis, pathway, and resultant levels of something being specified, the level of it in the context of someone engaged in the practices for attaining enlightenment. In some usages, the level of a Mahayana arya with a seeing or accustoming pathway mind.

pathway mind|A level or state of mind that acts or functions as a pathway toward liberation or enlightenment. Some translators render this term as path, but it refers to mental states, not to a series of spiritual practices. Also called: pathway of mind.
pathway mind, accustoming|See: accustoming pathway mind
pathway mind, applying|See: applying pathway mind
pathway mind, building up|See: building-up pathway mind
pathway mind needing no further training|The level of mind of shravaka arhats, pratyekabuddha arhats, and Buddhas, with which they have attained their respective purified states (bodhi) of liberation or enlightenment, and which require no further training in order to attain that purified state. Other translators sometimes render this term as path of no learning."
pathway mind, seeing|See: seeing pathway mind
pathway mind, true|See: true pathway mind
pathway of mind|See: pathway mind



patience|(1) In Theravada, the mental factor of not becoming angry at others' shortcomings, mistakes, or cruel deeds. (2) In Mahayana, the mental urge that leads one to be unperturbed by those who do harm and by suffering, so that one never becomes angry. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, patience becomes a far-reaching attitude.

paying attention|See: attention
paying attention in a concordant manner|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that engages mental activity with a specific cognitive object and considers it in a way that accords with its actuality. Also called correct consideration."
paying attention in a discordant manner|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that engages mental activity with a specific cognitive object and considers it in a way that does not accord with its actuality, such as considering something nonstatic to be static. Also called incorrect consideration."




perception|A general, nontechnical term used for valid sensory cognition.

perfection|See: far-reaching attitude
perfection of wisdom|See: far-reaching discriminating awareness
Perfection Vehicle|See: Paramitayana

perishable based things/aims|Also called: mundane, worldly
perishably based|See: mundane
perishing|The nonstatic, affected phenomenon of the ceasing of the present-happening of something.
permanence|See: staticness
permanent|See: static phenomenon
permanent phenomena|See: static phenomenon

permission, subsequent|See: subsequent attainment


perseverance|(1) In Theravada, the mental factor to exert effort, constantly and courageously, in helping others and in being able to help. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude. (2) For Mahayana, see joyful perseverance."
perseverance, joyful|See: joyful perseverance
person|An individual being, including those from any of the six realms of samsaric existence, as well as arhats and Buddhas. A noncongruent affecting variable, synonymous with a conventional me."

personal instructions|Advice on how to practice meditation, emphasizing the quintessential points.
pervasion|The intersection of two sets of phenomena.
pervasive|"x is pervasive with y if, whenever x is the case, so is y. Used in such formulations as If x is the case, then it is pervasive that y is the case."

phase|The first part of a process, especially one in meditation, which may last a variable length of time.
phenomena, comprehensible|See: comprehensible phenomena
phenomena, comprehensible, three types of|See: three types of comprehensible phenomena
phenomena, validly knowable|See: validly knowable phenomena
phenomenon|A validly knowable object that holds its own individual self-nature.
phenomenon, affected|See: affected phenomenon
phenomenon, affirmation|See: affirmation phenomenon
phenomenon, apparent true|See: superficial true phenomenon
phenomenon, conventional true|See: superficial true phenomenon
phenomenon, deepest true|See: deepest true phenomenon
phenomenon, dependent|See: dependent phenomenon
phenomenon, extremely obscure|See: extremely obscure phenomenon
phenomenon, functional|See: functional phenomenon
phenomenon, generally characterized|See: metaphysical entities
phenomenon, imputedly existent|See: imputably knowable phenomenon
phenomenon, imputedly knowable|See: imputably knowable phenomenon
phenomenon, invalid|See: invalid phenomenon
phenomenon, negation|See: negation phenomenon
phenomenon, nonfunctional|See: nonfunctional phenomenon
phenomenon, obscure|See: obscure phenomenon
phenomenon, obvious|See: obvious phenomenon
phenomenon, other-powered|See: dependent phenomenon
phenomenon, relative true|See: superficial true phenomenon
phenomenon, self-sufficiently knowable|See: self-sufficiently knowable phenomenon
phenomenon, specifically characterized|See: objective entities
phenomenon, superficial true|See: superficial true phenomenon
phenomenon, thoroughly established|See: thoroughly established phenomena
phenomenon, totally conceptional|See: totally conceptional phenomena
phenomenon, ultimate true|See: deepest true phenomenon
phenomenon, unaffected|See: unaffected phenomenon
phenomenon, valid|See: valid phenomenon
phenomenon with a basis beyond perishing|See: supramundane

phowa|Also called: transference of consciousness.

physical cognitive sensors|Out of the six cognitive sensors, the five that are forms of physical phenomena -- namely, (1) the photosensitive cells of the eyes, (2) the sound-sensitive cells of the ears, (3) the smell-sensitive cells of the nose, (4) the taste-sensitive cells of the tongue, and (5) the physical sensation-sensitive cells of the body.


placement, mental|See: mental abiding
plane|See: three planes of samsaric existence
plane of ethereal forms|Samsaric rebirth states in which the limited beings have desire for subtle forms of physical phenomena. Usually translated by others as form realm."
plane of formless beings|Samsaric rebirth states in which the limited beings lack any gross body. Usually translated by others as formless realm."
plane of sensory desires|Samsaric rebirth states in which the limited beings have desire for sensory objects. Usually translated by others as desire realm."
planes of samsaric existence, three|See: three planes of samsaric existence



pledged aspiring bodhichitta|See: pledged state of aspiring bodhichitta
pledged state of aspiring bodhichitta|The advanced level of aspiring bodhichitta, with which one focuses on one's own not-yet-happening enlightenment, imputable on the bais of the Buddha-nature factors oon one's mental continuum, with the intention to attain that enlightenment and to benefit all beings by means of it, and then pledges never to give up this bodhichitta aim until one reaches that enlightenment. Abbreviated as: pledged aspiring bodhichitta.
positive force|See: positive karmic force
positive karmic force|The type of karmic force associated with a constructive action and which ripens intermittently into transitory happiness. Some translators render it as merit. See: karmic force.
positive potential|See: positive karmic force

post-meditation period|See: subsequent attainment

potential, karmic|See: karmic potential

powdered sand mandala|A two-dimensional representation, made of powdered colored minerals, which is like an architectural blueprint of the three-dimensional palace, environment, and Buddha-figures of a symbolic world system, and used for conferring a tantric empowerment.
powers, extraphysical|See: extraphysical emanations
powers, extrasensory|See: advanced awareness

practice, preliminary|See: preliminary practices
practitioner, highly realized|See: arya
prajnaparamita|See: far-reaching discriminating awareness




Prasangika|A subdivision of the Madhyamaka school within the Indian Buddhist tenet systems that uses absurd conclusions to bring about valid inferential cognition of something to be proven or established. Gelug adds to this definition that it also asserts that all phenomena lack existence established by an essential nature and even conventionally lack existence established by their individual defining characteristic marks.
Prasangika Madhyamaka|See: Prasangika

pratimoksha vows|The vows of either a layman or laywoman, a novice or full monk, or a provisional, novice, or full nun. The ethical self-discipline of keeping them purely provides the basis for the individual being keeping them to attain liberation from samsara.
pratyekabuddha|Literally, self-realizers or self-evolvers - practitioners of the Hinayana vehicle who, motivated by renunciation, strive to attain liberation from uncontrollably recurring rebirth (samsara) and to become an arhat (liberated being). They live during dark ages when the teachings of a Buddha are no longer available. They do not study with Buddhist spiritual teachers, because there are none at such times, and they teach others only subtly, through gestures, since people are not receptive. Living either singly (like a rhinoceros) or in small groups, they must rely on their instincts from previous lives to recall and master the Dharma. Some translators render the term as solitary Buddhas."
pratyekabuddha arhat|A pratyekabuddha that has attained liberation. See also: pratyekabuddha.



preclude|To cut off, dismiss, or reject something. To logically cut off or eliminate the possibility that something is something else
preclude, explicitly|See: explicitly preclude
preclusion|The conceptual process through which sets and countersets are formulated. It implies previous apprehension of an object to be negated, in which the apprehension itself logically and automatically excludes the object to be negated from the set of either all validly knowable phenomena other than itself or all validly knowable phenomena in total. It is not a deliberate, conscious mental act.

predeath existence|The period of time in the mental continuum of an individual limited being starting from the moment immediately after conception until the moment immediately before death.
preliminaries|See: preliminary practices
preliminary practices|Practices, such as prostration, usually repeated 100,000 times, done as a method to build up positive force and cleanse negative force so as to have more success in tantra practice. Also called ngondro."

presentations, epic|See: epic presentations
present-happening|The affirmation phenomenon of the occurrence of something.
presumption|See: presumptive cognition



previously-having-perished|The past occurrence of something, equivalent to the no-longer-happening of something. According to Gelug Sautrantika, Chittamatra, and Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, a static nonimplicative negation phenomenon; according to Gelug Prasangika, a nonstatic implicative negation phenomenon. Also translated as passed-happening."


primally pure|See: primal purity
primally pure awareness|See: primal purity

primal purity|The essential nature of rigpa (pure awareness), which refers to its being pure of all stains, without a beginning.
primary consciousness|Within a cognition of an object, the awareness of merely the essential nature of the object that the cognition focuses on. Primary consciousness has the identity-nature of being an individualizing awareness.
primordial deepest alaya|In the dzogchen system, a synonym for basis rigpa. The source of all appearances of samsara and nirvana.
primordial mind|Awareness that, with no beginning, has been untainted by the fleeting stains of either the emotional or cognitive obscurations. A synonym for clear light mind."

primordial state|The state of having, with no beginning, been untainted by the fleeting stains of either the emotional or cognitive obscurations. Descriptive of the clear light mind.

principal awareness|Within a cognition, an awareness that consists of the composite of a primary consciousness and its accompanying set of subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors). The principal awareness is the way of being aware of the object of the cognition that is prominent and which characterizes the type of cognition that it is occurring -- for example, relative bodhichitta and the deep awareness of total absorption on voidness.





prohibited uncommendable action|Ethically neutral (unspecified) actions that Buddha prohibited for certain types of practitioners, for instance monks or nuns, as detrimental to their spiritual practice.
property-possessor|A member of the set of phenomena possessing a certain property, such as voidness as its actual nature.



protector, Dharma|See: Dharma-protector

provisional source of safe direction|The aryas with incomplete sets of true stoppings and true pathway minds on their mental continuums.
puja|See: offering ritual

pure appearance|An appearance of something as an enlightened mind makes it appear, namely in the form of a Buddha-figure or mandala and devoid of any of the four extremes of impossible existence.
pure awareness|In the dozgchen system, the subtlest level of awareness, which is totally untainted by any of the fleeting stains of mental obscurations. It is devoid of all grosser levels of awareness and yet permeates all of them, and it spontaneously establishes pure appearances. Often left untranslated as rigpa."





pure, primally|See: primal purity
pure wish|See: exceptional resolve



purified state|The state of a shravaka arhat, pratyekabuddha arhat, or a Buddha, in which the mental continuum of the person attaining this state has been purified of either the emotional obscurations or both the emotional and the cognitive obscurations.

purity, primal|See: primal purity


qualities, good|See: good qualities


quasi-divine beings|See: would-be divine
quintessence teachings|Teachings, either oral or written, that present the essential, most profound points of a more extensive topic.
quintessence teachings division|The division of treasure texts, deriving from texts buried by either Guru Rinpoche or Vimalamitra, that emphasizes pure awareness being primally pure. Often referred to by the transliterated Tibetan menngag-dey. Equivalent to the heart essence division."






real|A nontechnical term for what actually exists.
real, concretely|See: concretely real
reality|A nontechnical term for what actually exists.
reality, true|See: true reality
realization|A stable, correct understanding of some point in the Dharma, such as voidness, which brings about a lasting attainment and change in the person who has it. Compare: attainment.
realization and liberation, simultaneous|See: simultaneous realization and liberation

realization, subsequent|See: subsequent attainment
realize|To understand correctly, in a stable manner, some point in the Dharma, such as voidness, such that it brings about a lasting attainment and change in the person who has gained it.
realize voidness|To gain a stable, correct understanding of voidness, either conceptually or nonconceptually, such that it brings about a lasting attainment and change in the person who has it.

realm of desirable objects|See: plane of sensory desires
realm of desirable sense objects|See: abhidharma
realm of ethereal forms|See: plane of ethereal forms
realm of formless beings|See: plane of formless beings
realms of existence, six|See: six realms of existence
real-thing Dharma|A full presentation of the Dharma, in the traditional manner, in terms of beginningless uncontrollably recurring rebirth.


rebirth states, better|See: better rebirth states
rebirth states, three better|See: three better rebirth sates
rebirth states, three worse|See: three worse rebirth states
rebirth states, worse|See: worse rebirth states
recitation practice|In tantra, the meditation practice with which one recites a ritual meditation text describing the self-visualization process and a complex series of further practices based on that self-generation, such as reciting mantras and making offerings.

recognition|The mental factor (subsidiary awareness) of distinguishing an object as being something specific, such as when studying the Dharma, oneself as being a sick person, one's spiritual teacher as being a doctor, and the Dharma as being medicine.
recognitions, three|See: three recognitions
recognizable|See: identifiable

recurring existence|See: samsara
recurring samsara|See: samsara

referent aim, without a|See: without a referent aim
referent object|The validly knowable phenomena that the names and concepts for them, imputed on a basis for labeling, refer to.
referent thing|The actual thing referred to by a name or concept, corresponding to the names or concepts for something, and which is findable, establishing its own existence by its own power, on the side of the referent object of the name or concept. In Gelug, according to Prasangika it is nonexistent and according to lower tenet systems it is existent.

reflection|See: mental derivative
reflection, mental|See: mental derivative
reflexive|Turned in on itself.
reflexive appearance|An appearance of a cognitive object that arises automatically from a person's clear light mind itself. Such an appearance may be either impure (with an appearance of truly established existence) or pure (without such an appearance).
reflexive awareness|(1) The cognitive faculty within a cognition, asserted in the Sautrantika and Chittamatra tenet systems, that takes as its cognitive object the consciousness within the cognition that it is part of. It also cognizes the validity or invalidity of the cognition that it is part of, and accounts for the ability to recall the cognition. (2) In the non-Gelug schools, this cognitive faculty becomes reflexive deep awareness -- that part of an arya's nonconceptual cognition of voidness that cognizes the two truths of that nonconceptual cognition.
reflexive deep awareness|(1) In Kagyu and Sakya, that aspect of an arya's nonconceptual cognition of voidness that cognizes its own two-truth nature. (2) In Nyingma, that aspect of pure awareness (rigpa) that cognizes its own two truths or its own threefold nature. Synonymous with self-arising deep awareness.


refuge|See: safe direction
refuge, go for r. to the Three Gems|See: take safe direction from the Three Gems
refuge preceptor|A spiritual mentor who has kept one of the sets of pratimoksha vows purely for a certain number of years and in whose presence spiritual seekers formally take refuge (put a safe direction in their lives), thus committing themselves to the Buddhist path.
refuge, take|See: take safe direction
refutation|See: negation phenomenon

regard|See: firm conviction
regret|"The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of not wishing to repeat doing something, either proper or improper, that one did or that someone else made one do.
"


relating to a spiritual mentor in a healthy manner|Entrusting oneself, through mind and actions, to a fully qualified spiritual mentor. Also called: relying on a spiritual mentor, entrusting oneself to a spiritual mentor, whole-hearted commitment to a spiritual mentor. Often translated as: guru-devotion.
relative bodhichitta|See: conventional bodhichitta
relative true phenomenon|See: superficial true phenomenon
relative truth|See: superficial truth

release itself in its own place|See: automatically releases itself in its own place
release, orgasmic|See: orgasmic release

reliance|See: something that supports something else
reliquary monument|See: stupa
remembering kindness|Remembering the kindness of motherly love, remembering all the beneficial things that all beings have shown us when they were our mothers. The second of the six part cause and effect quintessence teaching for developing bodhichitta.
renunciation|(1) The definite determination to be free of samsara and to gain liberation, and with which one is willing to give up true suffering and true causes. Also translated as determination to be free. (2) In Theravada, the mental factor to give up all attachment to worldly possessions, social status, and even one's body. When conjoined with a bodhichitta aim, it becomes a far-reaching attitude.
renunciation, short-lived all-excited|See: short-lived all-excited renunciation
repaying kindness|Appreciating the beneficial things that all beings have shown us when they were our mothers and wishing to benefit them in return. The third of the seven part cause and effect quintessence teaching for developing bodhichitta.

representation (1, 2)|(1) Something (for example, a vajra) used to stand for something else (for example, method), but the meaning of which is not obvious and needs explanation. (2) For its usage in cognition theory, see: mental representation.
representation, mental|See: mental representation
repudiation|A conceptual denial of something that is true or is present.


resolution|One of the ten far-reaching attitudes in the Theravada tradition. An attitude of determination with which a bodhisattva never abandons what he or she needs to do in order to benefit others.
resolve, exceptional|See: exceptional resolve

respect|See: appreciation
respite|A temporary rest or a break from a state of no leisure for Dharma practice, such as the worst states of rebirth. Some translators render the term as a freedom or a liberty."
responsive awareness|See: responsiveness
responsiveness|The influencing nature of pure awareness (rigpa) - namely, that it responds to others effortlessly and spontaneously with compassionate communication. See: responsive awareness.




resultant level|In the context of basis, pathway, and resultant levels of something being specified, the level of something, for instance Buddha-nature, in the state of a Buddha when it is fully purified.
resultant links of what has been thrown|In the twelve links of dependent arising, the three and a half links of resultant loaded consciousness, nameable mental faculties with or without gross form, stimulators of cognition, and contacting awareness, which occur during the development of an embryo in the womb in the life that is thrown by the activated karmic aftermath of throwing karma.
resultant links of what is actualized|In the twelve links of dependent arising, the two links of conception and aging and dying in a future rebirth thrown by the activated karmic aftermath of throwing karma.


resultant taking of safe direction|A taking of safe direction (refuge) that takes as its sources of safe direction the Triple Gem that one will attain oneself in the future, based on actualizing one's own Buddha-nature. Synonymous with special taking of safe direction."
"
result, commanding|See: dominating result
result, comprehensive|See: dominating result
result, dominating|See: dominating result
result, man-made|See: man-made result
result, overlord|See: dominating result
result, overriding.|See: dominating result
result, ripened|See: ripened result
result that corresponds to its cause|A result that in some way resembles its cause, either in the wish to repeat its causal action or in the experience of something happening back to one that resembles what one did.
result that corresponds to its cause in one's behavior|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of liking or wishing to do an action, in a particular moment, similar to what one has done in the past. Also translated as result that is similar to its cause in one's behavior and result that is similar to its cause in one's instinctive behavior."
result that corresponds to its cause in one's experience|The experience of a situation in which something similar to one's previous action happens back to oneself. Also translated as result that is similar to its cause on one's experience."
result that is a state of being parted|A static state that is attained by means of effort, but which is neither produced by nor ripens from that effort.
result that is similar to its cause in one's experience|See: result that corresponds to its cause in one's experience
result that is similar to its cause on one's behavior|See: result that corresponds to its cause in one's behavior
result that is similar to its cause on one's instinctive behavior|See: result that corresponds to its cause in one's behavior


retreat, serviceability|See: serviceability retreat

revealing form|A form of physical phenomenon, asserted in the Vaibhashika and Gelug Prasangika schools, that shows (reveals) the motivation behind it, and which may be a constructive, destructive or unspecified phenomenon. Examples are the shape of one's body when performing an action, the sound of the words when one speaks, the expression on someone's face, and so on. In general, such a phenomenon may be either one of the five sensory objects or one of the five sensory cognitive sensors.
revelatory accounts|One of the twelve scriptural categories. (1) Buddha's revelations of what has happened in the past or prophesies of what will occur in the future. (2) According to some explanations, scriptures of definitive meaning.


riddance|A static state in which an emotional obscuration or a cognitive obscuration has been removed forever from a mental continuum. Equivalent to a true stopping (true cessation). Translated by others as abandonment."


rigpa|See: pure awareness
rigpa, appearance-making basis rigpa|See: appearance-making basis rigpa
rigpa, basis|See: basis rigpa
rigpa, effulgent|See: effulgent rigpa
rigpa, essence|See: essence rigpa
rigpa of all-embracing spontaneous presence|Pure awareness (rigpa) from the point of view of its resultant level as the Dharmakaya of a Buddha.


ripen|(1) A karmic cause developing or growing to the point at which it can bear fruit, which means produce its result. This is ripening in its definitional sense. (2) A karmic causal factor on a mental continuum exhausting and finishing its presence there as it produces its fruit.
ripened result|A nonobstructive unspecified item conjoined with the mental continuum of a limited being, such as the body, consciousness, and feelings of happiness and unhappiness, and which comes from a ripening cause that was also conjoined with his or her mental continuum.
ripening|The process whereby a karmic cause gives rise to its result. See: ripen.
ripening cause|A destructive or tainted constructive phenomenon that, unless one has rid one's mental continuum forever of craving, has the power to produce the nonobstructive unspecified items contained in the five aggregate factors of future rebirth states, such as the body, the types of consciousness, and the feelings.
ritual bountiful feast|A specially consecrated torma offered to one's tantric master, inseparable from the Buddha-figure, during a tantra ceremonial round of offering.
ritual ceremony|Also called puja. See: offering ritual.
ritual, expiation|See: expiation ritual
ritual, offering|See: offering ritual
ritual trainer|A teacher who instructs one in how to perform Buddhist rituals.
root bodhisattva vows|The eighteen primary bodhisattva vows which, if kept purely, act as a root for attaining enlightenment, and which, if fully transgressed, act as a root for rebirth in one of the worse rebirth states.


root downfall|A transgression of a root bodhisattva or root tantric vow, which, if it is a full transgression, acts as a root for falling to rebirth in one of the worse rebirth states.
root downfall, Kalachakra tantra|See: Kalachakra tantra root downfall
root guru|The spiritual teacher that inspires one the most, such that his or her inspiration serves as the root giving sustenance to one's spiritual growth.
roots of constructive force|See: roots of positive force
roots of positive force|The network of positive force (collection of merit), described from the point of view of it serving as the root for one to grow into a Buddha.
roots of virtue|See: roots of positive force
root tantric vows|The fourteen primary tantric vows which, if kept purely, act as a root for attaining enlightenment, and which, if fully transgressed, act as a root for rebirth in one of the worse rebirth states.




rules of discipline|(1) The scriptural texts that discuss the ethical discipline and vows for the monastic community of monks and nuns. (2) The subject matter discussed in the above texts.
Rupakaya|See: Corpus of Forms
sadhana|Literally, a method of actualization, namely a meditation method for actualizing oneself as a Buddha-figure for which one has received empowerment. Performing a sadhana entails recitation of a ritual meditation text describing the self-visualization process and a complex series of further practices based on that self-generation, such as reciting mantras and making offerings. Synonymous with self-generation and antecedent practice for realization."
safe direction|A direction that one puts in one's life that will protect one from true suffering and its true causes, and, when one reaches the goal of this direction, allows one to avoid true suffering and its true causes forever. Some translators render this as refuge."
safe direction, provisional source of|See: provisional source of safe direction
safe direction, take|See: take safe direction
safe direction: take safe direction from the Three Gems|See: abiding nature
safe direction, ultimate source of|See: ultimate source of safe direction

Sakya|One of the New Translation traditions of Tibetan Buddhism, deriving from the five masters who were descendants of Kon Konchog-gyelpo.

Sakyapa|A follower of the Sakya tradition of Tibetan Buddhism.

samadhi|See: absorbed concentration
Sambhogakaya|See: Corpus of Full Use
same essential nature|The relationship between two facts about the same attribute of a phenomenon. In a sense, the two facts are referring to the same phenomenon from two points of view. The two facts may be naturally inseparable, such as the two truths about the phenomenon, or they may constitute a joined inseparability arising from the power of meditation, such as a blissful awareness and an awareness of voidness. Some translators render the term as one by nature."

samsara|Uncontrollably recurring rebirth under the power of disturbing emotions and attitudes and of karma. Some translators render it as cyclic existence."

Sangha|The literal meaning of the Sanskrit term is a community; the literal meaning of the Tibetan translation is those intent on a constructive goal. Four or more people from any of the four groups of the monastic community: full or novice monks or nuns - the four need not necessarily be all from one group or one from each group - and who have unlabored renunciation and are intent on ridding themselves of disturbing emotions and attitudes and thus attaining liberation.
Sangha Gem, apparent|See: apparent Sangha Gem
Sangha Gem, deepest|See: deepest Sangha Gem
Sangha Gem, nominal|See: nominal Sangha Gem
Sarma|See: New Translation
Sarvastivada|One of the eighteen divisions of the Hinayana tradition of Buddhism and within which Vaibhashika and Sautrantika are subdivisions.

Sautrantika|A Hinayana school of Indian Buddhism that asserts the true existence of both reflexive awareness and external phenomena; a subdivision of the Sarvastivada school of Hinayana. One of the four Indian Buddhist tenet systems studied by all traditions of Tibetan Buddhism.
Sautrantika-Svatantrika|According to Gelug, a subdivision of the Svatantrika Madhyamaka tenet system that does not assert reflexive awareness, but does assert external phenomena as having existence established by their individual defining characteristic marks.




scriptural categories, twelve|See: twelve scriptural categories
scriptural pronouncement|See: scriptural teaching



scrutiny|See: subtle discernment



sealing points for labeling an outlook as being based on enlightening words, four|See: four hallmarks of the Dharma
secondary bodhisattva vows|See: faulty actions
secondary tantric vows|See: thick actions

secret mandala|The offering of a blissful awareness, or of a nonconceptual blissful awareness of voidness with a clear-light mind. Also called: hidden mandala.
secret offering|See: hidden offering



seeing pathway mind|The level of mind of arya sharavakas, arya pratyekabuddhas, and arya bodhisattvas with which they first attain a joined pair of shamatha and vipashyana focused nonconceptually on voidness -- or, in general, on the sixteen aspects of the four noble truths -- and with which they rid themselves of one or both sets of doctrinally based obscurations. Often translated as path of seeing."
self-arising deep awareness|In Nyingma, the aspect of pure awareness (rigpa) that automatically arises with awareness of its own two truths or its own threefold nature. Synonymous with reflexive deep awareness.
self-aware|See: self-awareness
self-awareness|An attitude focused on one's conventional me and that distinguishes and knows correctly the mental factors, such as the motivation, disturbing emotions, level of feeling of happiness, and so on, that are presently manifest on one's mental continuum.

self-cherishing|The attitude with which one considers oneself as the most important being and has affection for and takes care of only oneself.

self-conscious|Being so concerned about oneself and what others think of oneself and that one doesn't make any mistakes, that one becomes awkward and cannot act naturally. Often teenagers are like this. They have pimples on their faces and are so self-conscious about them that they think everyone is looking at them.
self-consciousness|See: self-conscious
self-dignity|See: moral self-dignity
self-dignity, ethical|See: moral self-dignity
self-dignity, moral|See: moral self-dignity
self-discipline|See: ethical self-discipline
self-discipline, ethical|See: ethical self-discipline
self-established existence|See: existence established by self-nature
self-established stain|Something, the existence of which is established by its own power, independently of anything else, and which obscures the realization of Buddha-nature on one's mental continuum. This refers to an impossible manner of existence of the mind, and does not exist at all.
self-establishing nature|See: self-nature
self-evolver|See: pratyekabuddha
self-generation|Synonymous with sadhana.  A meditation method in which one visualizes and imagines oneself to be a Buddha-figure for which one has received empowerment. See: sadhana.


self-initiation|A tantric meditation practice in which one visualizes receiving the entire empowerment (initiation) ritual for a Buddha-figure, performed in order to renew one's tantric vows. It may only be performed if one has done the serviceability retreat of that particular Buddha-figure and the fire-puja afterwards.


selflessness|See: lack of an impossible soul"
selflessness of all phenomena|See: lack of an impossible soul of all phenomena
selflessness of a person|See: lack of an impossible soul of a person

self-nature|Something on the side of an object or phenomenon that (1) establishes the existence, in general, of the object or phenomenon and (2) establishes, as well, what the object or phenomenon is. A self-nature may do this either by its own power alone, or by its own power in conjunction with mental labeling. The term may also be translated as self-establishing nature."
self-preoccupation|An attitude of thinking only about oneself, as if one were the only one in the world, and not thinking about anyone else; narcissism.
self-preoccupied|See: self-preoccupation
self-realizer|See: pratyekabuddha
self-sufficiently knowable|A validly knowable phenomenon that, when actually cognized, does not rely on actual cognition of or by something else, for instance actual cognition of the object's basis for labeling.
self-sufficiently knowable phenomenon|A validly knowable phenomenon that, when actually cognized, does not rely on actual cognition of or by something else, for instance actual cognition of the object's basis for labeling.
self-voidness|The absence of any phenomenon existing, by self-nature, in an impossible manner.
sem|All levels of awareness (levels of mind) that are tainted with the fleeting stains of the emotional and cognitive obscurations. All levels of awareness other than rigpa. Translated as limited awareness."
semblance, mental|See: mental aspect
semdey|See: mind division


sense of fitness|The subsidiary awareness (mental factor) of feeling totally fit to do something, and which is both exhilarating and blissful, physically and mentally, but in a nondisturbing way.
sense of physical and mental fitness|See: sense of fitness

sensibilia|Sense data; forms of physical phenomenon that, in one moment, occupy an extended location and are cognized by one of the five types of sense consciousness; the data or information concerning one moment of the sight, sound, smell, taste, or physical sensation of an object having physical qualities.



sensor|See: cognitive sensor

sentient being|See: limited being


serenely stilled and settled state of mind|See: stilled and settled state of mind
serviceability retreat|An intensive tantric meditation practice, done over many meditation sessions, during which one performs the sadhana and recites the mantra of a Buddha-figure ten thousand, one hundred thousand, or many hundreds of thousands of times, depending on the number of syllables in the mantra. When completed and finished off with the appropriate fire puja, this intensive practice makes the mind fit to be used (fit to be put into service) for more advanced tantric practices with that Buddha-figure.
set theory|Set theory has to do with the logical pervasions between two or more sets -- mutually exclusive, totally congruent, overlapping, etc. A set is a collection or a group of many items, like the set of all nonstatic phenomena.




seven-part cause and effect method|See: seven-part cause and effect quintessence teaching for developing bodhichitta
seven-part cause and effect quintessence teaching for developing bodhichitta|One of the two methods for developing a bodhichitta aim. Based on the development of equanimity, (1) mother-awareness, (2) remembering kindness, (3) repaying kindness, (4) love, (5) compassion, (6) exceptional resolve, (7) a bodhichitta aim. The first six, developed consecutively, function as the causes for the seventh as the result.

Shakyamuni|The Able One of the Shakya Clan, the Sage of the Shakya Clan, an epithet of Buddha
shamatha|See: stilled and settled state of mind



shared meaning, teaching of|See: teaching of shared meaning

sharing five congruent factors|Subsidiary awarenesses (mental factors) that share five things in common with the primary consciousness of the cognition in which they occur. (1) According to Vasubandhu: reliance, object, mental aspect, time, and natal source. (2) According to Asanga: natal source, focal aspect, essential nature, time, and plane and bhumi-level of mind.


short-lived all-excited renunciation|The enthusiastic and fanatic giving up of everything worldly, often based on blind faith that an external source will save us.


shravaka|Literally, listeners to Buddha's teachings - practitioners of the Hinayana vehicle who, motivated by renunciation, strive to attain liberation from uncontrollably recurring rebirth (samsara) and to become an arhat (liberated being) of either the shravaka or pratyekabuddha class. They practice, based on having listened to Buddha's teachings. Some translators render the term as hearer."
shravaka arhat|A shravaka that has attained liberation. See also: shravaka.





sights|Nonstatic phenomena that can be explicitly cognized by eye consciousness -- namely, colors and shapes. Equivalent to forms of physical phenomena that can become objects of experience of the eyes. One of the eleven types of forms of physical phenomena.

similar family cause|A cause that is in the same family or category of phenomenon as is the result. For example, a model of a vase is the similar family cause for a vase that one is now making.

simultaneously acting condition|An item that must exist prior to the arising of something and which assists in making the arising happen, but which does not transform into what arises, for instance water for a sprout.
simultaneously arising|Two items simultaneously arise if, when one of them arises or happens, the other does also, at the same time. The two items may arise simultaneously either naturally or through the power of meditation. Also called: innate.

simultaneously arising cause|A cause that arises simultaneously with its results, such as the elements that make up a material object.



sin|See: negative karmic force
sincerity|Sincerity has two factors included in it: (1) lack of hypocrisy (g.yo-med) – not hiding our own faults,  (2) lack of pretension (sgyu-med) – not pretending to have qualities that we do not have.


single-pointed|Concentration settled on an object or settled in a state of mind (such as compassion) and free of all flightiness of mind an mental dullness.


singular sufficient white panacea|Also called: all-curing single white epanacea, single white remedy, self-sufficient white remedy
six realms of existence|Literally, the six families of wandering beings. The six types of samsaric rebirth: (1) hell-beings (trapped beings in the joyless realms), (2) clutching ghosts (hungry ghosts), (3) animals (creeping creatures), (4) humans, (5) would-be divine beings (anti-gods), and (6) divine beings (gods).
Six-Session Yoga|In Gelug, a practice, recited six times daily, required of those who have received an anuttarayoga empowerment, through which they keep the nineteen closely bonding practices for the five Buddha-families.


sixty-two wrong views|A set of sixty-two incorrect positions regarding the past, present and future of the self, the universe, and so on, propounded by the eighteen non-Buddhist extremeists and refuted in Buddhism. Sometimes translated by others as the sixty-two bad views.

skillful means|See: skill in means
skill in means|"The special discriminating awareness concerning the most effective and appropriate internal methods for actualizing the Buddha's teachings and the most effective and appropriate external methods for making limited beings ripe for attaining liberation and enlightenment. In Mahayana, when conjoined with a bodhichitta, the seventh of the ten far-reaching attitudes.
"






solidly existing me"|See: solid "me"
solid me"|A "me that exists as a concrete, autonomous entity, as if it had a line around it or were encapsulated in plastic. A general, nontechnical term for the false me (the me to be refuted), which has never existed at all.
solitary Buddha|See: pratyekabuddha
something possessing the actual nature|See: property-possessor
something that is supported by something else|Something that rests upon or is contained within something else, for instance the people in relation to the house in which they live. Also translated as what is supported or simply as supported."
something that supports something else|Something that serves as the foundation or container for something else, for instance a house in relation to the people living inside it. Also translated as what supports or simply as support."
soul|According to non-Buddhist Indian tenet systems, something findable, either with or without being a conscious phenomenon, inside the body of a person, and which is static, a partless monad, separable from the body, and self-sufficiently knowable.
soul, impossible|See: impossible soul"
sound|An object explicitly cognized by ear consciousness.
sound universal|See: audio category
source, natal|See: natal source
source of safe direction, provisional|See: provisional source of safe direction
source of safe direction, ultimate|See: ultimate source of safe direction





special insight|See: exceptionally perceptive state of mind
special taking of safe direction|Synonym for resultant taking of safe direction."

special verses|Praises that Buddha uttered with joy for the sake of the long life of his teachings, and not for the sake of specific individuals. One of the twelve scriptural categories.

specific awareness|In the Karma Kagyu system, the aspect of mental activity that is aware of the specific type of awareness of an object that has arisen and the specific object that it is aware of. In a looser sense, awareness of the details that have arisen and one is aware of in a cognition.
specific-awareness alaya|In the Karma Kagyu system, a synonym for alayavijnana. See: all-encompassing foundation for all.
specific consciousness|See: specific awareness

speech, enlightening|See: Buddha's enlightening speech



sphere, open|See: open sphere

spiritual mentor|A Buddhist teacher who has had stable realizations, who embodies the teachings in the sense of having integrated them into his or her life, and who confers vows on disciples.


spiritual teacher|A general term for the four levels of Buddhist teachers: a Buddhism professor, a Dharma instructor, a meditation trainer or ritual trainer, and a spiritual mentor.

spontaneously establishing appearances|The functional nature of rigpa (pure awareness), which is that it automatically, without any effort, gives rise to pure appearances.
stability, emotional|See: emotional stability
stability, mental|See: mental stability
stabilizing meditation|A method for habituating oneself to an insight, understanding, or state of mind in which one focuses on an object with that desired insight, understanding, or state of mind and with full conviction in its validity, but without the mental factors of gross detection (investigation) or subtle discernment (scrutiny). Also translated sometimes as fixating meditation."
stable elder|A senior member of the ordained Sangha who is stable in his vows. It has nothing to do with age from birth, but how long someone has been a monk.
stable realization|In mahamudra meditation, the state of mind in which the meditator has nonconceptual bare cognition of there being no dualism of meditator and meditation.
stain|Something that obscures the Buddha-nature factors, preventing them from being fully realized.

stain, fleeting|See: fleeting stain
stain, natural|See: self-established stain
stain, self-established|See: self-established stain
starkness|The quality of something standing out sharply and dramatically in its appearance, without anything adorning it (like a rock mountain in a desert, totally devoid of any vegetation); the quality of being barren.

state of mind, disturbed|See: disturbing emotion or attitude
state parted from mental fabrication|The state of mind that is parted from conceptual constructs.
state parted from taking to mind|The state of mind that is parted from conceptual constructs -- in other words, equivalent to the state parted from mental fabrication.
state, primordial|See: primordial state


static|See: static phenomenon
static abstraction|See: static phenomenon
staticness|The noncongruent affecting variable of not changing from moment to moment. Sometimes translated as permanence."
static phenomenon|Phenomena that are unaffected by causes and circumstances and, consequently, do not change from moment to moment and do not produce any effects. Somewhat similar to unchanging facts, they are imputed about some validly knowable phenomenon and only exist and can be validly known so long as the basis for their imputation lasts. Sometimes translated as static abstractions. Some translators render the term as permanent phenomena."
sticky attachment|The disturbing emotion that exaggerates the good qualities of an object that one possesses, that clings to it like glue, and does not wish to let go.
stilled and settled state of mind|A state of mind, attained through meditation, in which the mind is stilled of all mental flightiness and mental dullness, is settled down on an object and remains there, and is accompanied by an exhilarating sense of fitness. Also called a serenely stilled and settled state of mind, shamatha. Some translators render the term as calm abiding or mental quiescence."

stimulating others' good qualities|Also translated as increase."
stimulators of cognition|The focal conditions and dominating conditions that give rise to the six types of cognition -- namely, the cognitive objects and cognitive sensors of each of the six cognitive faculties. In the case of the five sensory faculties, the objects and sensors are forms of physical phenomena, such as sights and photosensitive cells. In the case of the mental faculty, the objects may be any validly knowable phenomenon, while the sensors are the immediately preceding moments of mental cognition. Usually counted as the twelve stimulators of cognition, but in the list of the twelve links of dependent arising, referred to as the six stimulators of cognition, in which case the two cognitive stimulators of each cognitive faculty are counted as one.
stimulators of cognition, link of|See: link of stimulators of cognition
stimulators of cognition, twelve|See: twelve stimulators of cognition
stopping|The total elimination of something such that it never recurs.
stopping, true|See: true stopping
storehouse consciousness|See: all-encompassing foundation consciousness
straightforward cognition|In the Gelug Prasangika system, cognition of an object, which occurs without relying on a line of reasoning in the moment immediately prior to it. Straightforward cognition may be either conceptual or nonconceptual.

stream of continuity|A succession of moments of something.

strengthening|The special discriminating awareness employed for expanding one's discriminating awareness and not letting it be crushed by countering factors, such as attachment to anything. One of the ten Mahayana far-reaching attitudes (ten perfections).



stupa|A monument within which are kept the relics of a great Buddhist master. Translated as a reliquary monument.

subject clear light|See: cognitive clear light

subliminal awareness|See: subliminal cognition
subliminal cognition|"A cognition in which the consciousness gives rise to a mental hologram of a cognitive object and, in which, the cognitive object appears, through that hologram, only to the consciousness of the subliminal cognition and only that consciousness cognizes it. The cognitive object of the subliminal cognition does not appear to the person and is not cognized by the person. Nor does it appear to or is it cognized by the consciousness of the manifest cognition that is simultaneously occurring and overpowering the subliminal cognition. 
"
subsequent attainment|A state of mind having the joined pair of shamatha and vipashyana, and in which absorbed concentration is focused single-pointedly on a voidness that is like an illusion. It is attained only upon rising from total absorption on space-like voidness and may occur either while still in meditation or after arising from meditation. It may be either conceptual or nonconceptual. Sometimes translated as subsequent realization. Other translators often render the term as post-meditation."

subsequent cognition|One of the seven ways of knowing something: a nonfraudulent, but not fresh, cognition of an object. It is the second phase of a valid bare cognition or inferential cognition, and is asserted only by the Gelug Sautrantika, Chittamatra, and Svatantrika tenet systems.
subsequent permission|A tantric ritual for a specific Buddha-figure, received in order to strengthen further the Buddha-nature factors that were previously activated with a full empowerment. Usually called by its Tibetan name, jenang." 
"
subsequent realization|See: subsequent attainment
subsidiary awareness|A way of cognizing an object that accompanies a primary consciousness, sharing five things in common with that consciousness, and which qualifies or helps with the cognition of the object. Also called mental factor."
substances, that bond us closely to tantric practice|See: bonding substances


subtle body|Within the gross body of humans, the invisible system of energy-winds, energy-channels, energy-nodes (chakras), and creative energy-drops.
subtle creative energy-drops|See: creative energy-drops
subtle discernment|A subsidiary awareness (mental factor) that actively understands the fine details of the nature of something, having scrutinized them thoroughly. It does not imply verbal thinking, although it may be induced by verbally thinking. According to Asanga, one of the four changeable subsidiary awarenesses. Also translated as scrutiny, analysis. and discerning analysis."
subtle energy-winds|Subtle forms of energy that move within the subtle energy-channels of the subtle body and which are the mount (the physical basis) for consciousness, either in nonconceptual or conceptual cognition, transporting it through the subtle body. Through anuttarayoga complete stage practices, one can cause them to enter, abide, and dissolve in the central energy-channel and thereby make manifest the subtlest clear light mind.
subtle impermanence|"A nonstatic phenomenon's drawing closer each moment to its ultimate end, like a time bomb, based on the fact that the cause for the phenomenon's final disintegration or end is its coming into being, its arising.
"
subtle mind|Mental consciousness, both conceptual and nonconceptual.

subtlest body|The subtlest life-supporting energy-wind that accompanies each moment of subtlest mind.


subtlest mind|See: clear light awareness
subtle winds|See: subtle energy-winds

suffering, all-pervasive|See: all-pervasively affecting suffering
suffering, all-pervasively affecting|See: all-pervasively affecting suffering
suffering of change|The suffering of ordinary happiness, which never lasts, never satisfies, and which eventually turns into the suffering of suffering.
suffering of suffering|The suffering of gross pain or unhappiness.
Sugata|See: Blissfully Gone One


superficial true phenomenon|In the Hinayana tenet systems, a true phenomenon that veils or conceals a deeper true phenomenon. Also called: relative true phenomenon, conventional true phenomenon, apparent true phenomenon.
superficial truth|In the Mahayana tenet systems, a true fact about a phenomenon that veils or conceals a deeper true fact about the same phenomenon. Also called: relative truth, conventional truth, apparent truth, surface truth.
superimpose|See: interpolation


support|(1) An individual defining characteristic mark findable on the side of a knowable object, upon which a word or label for the object is set. (2) See: something that supports something else."
supported|See: something that is supported by something else
supported mandala|The set of Buddha-figures residing inside the immeasurably magnificent palace of a symbolic world system visualized in tantra practice.
supporting mandala|The immeasurably magnificent palace of a symbolic world system, together with the environment around it, visualized in tantra practice.
supramundane|Related to the mental continuum of an arya -- someone who has attained nonconceptual cognition of the four noble truths. Also translated as with a base beyond perishing, transworldly or transcendent."


surface truth|See: superficial truth
survival|also called: becoming
sutra|(1) Texts by Shakyamuni Buddha, both Hinayana and Mahayana, that discuss themes of practice.(2) Within the context of the Three Baskets (Tripitaka), the texts of Buddha that especially concern the training in higher concentration. (3) Within the context of Buddha's teachings divided into sutra and tantra, the division that does not entail visualization of oneself as a Buddha-figure. (3) Within the context of the twelve scriptural categories, the texts that present what Buddha had to say in a brief and condensed format. Also called: expositions on themes of practice.
sutra mahamudra|Meditations on the nature of the mind with regard to only gross and subtle minds -- in other words, sensory and mental consciousness -- and not with regard to the subtlest mind, clear light.


Svabhavakaya|See: Corpus of Essential Nature
Svatantrika|A subdivision of the Madhyamaka school within the Indian Buddhist tenet systems that refutes truly established existence by relying on lines of reasoning the members of which have existence established from their own sides. Gelug adds to this definition that it also asserts that all phenomena lack existence established by an essential nature, but nevertheless conventionally have existence established by their individual defining characteristic marks.
Svatantrika Madhyamaka|See: Svatantrika
syllables tradition, four|See: four syllables tradition


synthesis|See: mental synthesis
synthesis, collection|See: collection mental synthesis
synthesis, kind|See: kind mental synthesis
synthesis, object|See: object mental synthesis
systems of tenets|See: tenet system
tactile sensations|See: physical sensations

tainted|Something that derives from a disturbing emotion or attitude, or is related in some way with a disturbing emotion or attitude. According to Vasubandhu, they give rise to further tainted phenomena; while according to Asanga, only some do that. Also translated as mixed with confusion. Some translators render this term as contaminated."
tainted aggregates|The five aggregate factors of experience that derive from a disturbing emotion or attitude, or are related in some with a disturbing emotion or attitude. Some translators render the term as contaminated aggregates."
take refuge|See: take safe direction
take safe direction|To put a direction in one's life, which, when one goes in it, protects one from true suffering and its true causes and which, when one reaches its endpoint, allows one to avoid true suffering and its true causes forever. Some translators render this as take refuge, but it has no connotation of merely opening up and passively receiving protection.
take safe direction from the Three Gems|To turn toward the direction indicated by the Three Rare and Supreme Gems (Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha) and to put that safe direction in one's life. Some translators render this as go for refuge to the Three Gems."
take to mind|See: attention

taking care|See: caring attitude
taking of safe direction, causal|See: causal taking of safe direction
taking of safe direction, mere|See: mere taking of safe direction
taking of safe direction, resultant|See: resultant taking of safe direction
taking of safe direction, special|See: special taking of safe direction


taking to mind|See: attention


tamed behavior|Ethical behavior with which one both restrains oneself from destructive actions and engages in constructive ones.
Tangyur|The collection of the Tibetan translations of the Indian Buddhist treatises.
Tanjur|See: Tangyur
tantra|(1) An everlasting stream of continuity. On the causal level, the mental continuum, with its various aspects of Buddha-nature. On the pathway level, the continuity of practices involving Buddha-figures. On the resultant level, the continuity of the various corpuses or bodies of a Buddha. (2) The texts that discuss the above topics.
tantra mahamudra|See: mantra mahamudra
tantra, nondual|See: nondual tantra

tantric master|A spiritual mentor who confers on disciples tantric vows. According to some commentaries, a spiritual mentor who confers on disciples empowerments and subsequent permissions from any of the classes of tantra.




Tathagata|See: Thusly Gone One



teacher, spiritual|See: spiritual teacher

teaching, definitive|See: definitive teaching
teaching, interpretable|See: interpretable teaching




tendency, karmic|See: karmic tendency

tenet system|A set of principles or assertions of a particular traditional Indian school of philosophy or of astronomical calculations.

ten levels of highly realized minds|also translated as: ten bhumi minds

terma|See: treasure text

tetralemma|The relationship between two sets, A and B, is a tetralemma if there are four possibilities. There are phenomena that are members of (1) both set A and set B, (2) neither set A nor set B, (3) only set A, but not set B, or (4) only set B, but not set A.









thick actions|A set of eight actions that, at either a yoga or anuttarayoga empowerment, one vows to avoid and which, if committed, weaken meditation practice and hamper progress along the tantra path. Also called: secondary tantric vows.

thing, referent|See: referent thing
thinking with a distorted antagonistic attitude|See: distorted antagonistic thinking
thinking with a distorted view|See: distorted antagonistic thinking


thirty-two excellent signs|Also translated as: thirty-two major marks

thoroughly established phenomena|(1) In the context of the Mahayana tenet system, a synonym for deepest truths. Specifically, in the Chittamatra system, the various voidnesses, true stoppings, and nirvana. (2) In the Buddhist medical system, hereditary, congenital diseases; genetic disorders.



those who sustain themselves on fragrances|(1) A class of divine beings (gods) on the plane of sensory desires that live on fragrances and are musicians. Also translated as heavenly musicians. (2) Beings in the state of bardo existence inbetween death and rebirth onto the plane of sensory desires. Such beings live on either pleasant fragrances during fortunate eons or unpleasant odors during unfortunate eons.

Three Buddha-Bodies|See: Three Corpuses of a Buddha
three circles|Three aspects of an action that are all equally void of true existence: (1) the individual performing the action, (2) the object upon or toward which the action is committed, and (3) the action itself. Occasionally, as in the case of the action of giving, the object may refer to the object given. The existence of each of these is established dependently on the others. Sometimes translated as the three spheres of an action.
Three Corpuses of a Buddha|(1) A Corpus of Emanations (Nirmanakaya), (2) Corpus of Full Use (Sambhogakaya), and (3) Corpus Encompassing Everything (Dharmakaya) of a Buddha.




Three Gems|See: Three Rare and Supreme Gems



Three Jewels|See: Three Rare and Supreme Gems
Three Jewels of Refuge|See: Three Rare and Supreme Gems

three planes of existence|See: three planes of samsaric existence
three planes of samsaric existence|A threefold division of samsaric rebirth states: the planes of (1) sensory desires, (2) ethereal forms, and (3) formless beings. Sometimes called the three realms."


three purified states|The three states of bodhi; the three states of a shravaka arhat, a pratyekabuddha arhat, and a Buddha.
Three Rare and Supreme Gems|The Buddha, the Dharma, and the Sangha. Also called The Three Gems, The Triple Gem, The Three Jewels, and The Three Jewels of Refuge."
three realms|See: three planes of samsaric existence







threshold|Also translated as: near attainment, black appearance

Thusly Gone One|A epithet of a Buddha -- one who has gone to the goal of enlightenment through nonconceptual cognition of voidness, the very nature of reality (thusness).
thusness|See: very nature of reality
thusness offering|See: offering of the very nature of reality
time|An interval imputed or measured in the continuum of the occurrence of a sequence of cause and effect. Since time is conceptually imputable, time is a function of and therefore relative to the mind that conceptually imputes it.

tonglen|See: giving and taking


total absorption|A state of mind having the joined pair of shamatha and vipashyana, and in which absorbed concentration is focused single-pointedly on a voidness that is like space. It may be either conceptual or nonconceptual. Sometimes translated as meditative equipoise."


totally conceptional phenomena|(1) In the context of the Chittamatra tenet-system, all static phenomena other than the various types of voidness, true stoppings, and nirvana, plus all non-existent phenomena. (2) In the context of the Madhyamaka tenet-system, all non-existent phenomena, especially true existence.
totally devoid|Totally lacking something, in the sense that something never has in the past, never does in the present, and never will in the future possess a certain characteristic that is impossible for anything to possess, because that characteristic does not exist at all.
totally imaginary forms of physical phenomena|Forms of physical phenomena included only among cognitive stimulators that are all phenomena and which appear in certain mental states, such as the sensory objects appearing in dreams and the conceptually implied objects in visualizations and imaginings.
totally pervasive|Two sets, A and B, are totally pervasive if every element in set A is also a member of set B, and vice versa

trainer, meditation|See: meditation trainer
trainer, ritual|See: ritual trainer


trainings, individual, for each of the Three Gems|See: individual trainings for each of the Three Gems




traits, abiding|See: naturally abiding family-traits
traits, evolving|See: evolving family-traits


transcendent|See: supramundane
transference of consciousness|See: phowa





transmission, oral|See: oral transmission
transworldly|See: supramundane
treasure text|Texts planted by Indian or Tibetan masters, either in a physical location, such as inside a pillar of a temple, or in the minds of disciples and hidden there for safekeeping during times that were not conducive for their practice. Often referred to by the transliterated Tibetan term terma."


trilemma|The relationship between two sets, A and B, is a trilemma if there are three possibilities. There are phenomena that are members of (1) both set A and set B, (2) neither set A, nor set B, or only set A, but not set B. There are no phenomena that are members of set B that are not also members of set A. In other words, all elements of set A are also members of set B, but not all elements of set B are elements of set A.
Triple Gem|See: Three Rare and Supreme Gems
Triumphant One|An epithet of a Buddha - one who has triumphed over the emotional and cognitive obscurations. Some translators render the term as Victorious One."
true cessation|See: true stopping
true existence|(1) An impossible mode of existence mistakenly considered to be true. Existence established or proven (a) merely by the power of something on the side of an object and not in conjunction with being something imputable on a basis, according to Gelug Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, or (b) by the power of something on the side of an object, either by itself or in conjunction with being something imputable on a basis, according to Gelug Prasangika-Madhyamaka. (2) A mode of existence that is true. Existence established or proven by (a) arising from causes and conditions, according to Jetsunpa and Kunkhyen Gelug Sautrantika, or (b) the power of something on the side of an object, according to Panchen Gelug Sautrantika and Gelug Chittamatra. Also translated as truly established existence."
true findable existence|Existence established or proven by the power of something findable on the side of an object, either by itself or in conjunction with being something imputable on a basis. According to Gelug Prasangika-Madhyamaka, an impossible mode of existence mistakenly considered to be true. Also called truly and findably established existence."
true identity, lack of|See: lack of true identities

true origin|Also translated as: true causes
true pathway mind|Also called: true path
true reality|A nontechnical term used for what actually exists.
true stopping|The elimination, forever, of some degree of either an emotional or a cognitive obscuration from a mental continuum. They occur only on the mental continuum of aryas -- those with nonconceptual cognition of voidness. Often translated as true cessation."

true unimputed existence|Existence established or proven merely by the power of something on the side of an object and not in conjunction with being something imputable on a basis. According to Madhyamaka, an impossible mode of existence mistakenly considered to be true. Also called truly and unimputedly established existence."
truly and findably established existence|See: true findable existence
truly and unimputedly established existence|See: true unimputed existence

truly established existence|See: true existence
truly existing|See: true existence

truth, apparent|See: superficial truth
truth, conventional|See: superficial truth
truth, deepest|See: deepest truth
truth, relative|See: superficial truth
truths, two|See: two truths
truth, superficial|See: superficial truth
truth, surface|See: superficial truth
truth, ultimate|See: deepest truth


tsog|(1) Equivalent to ceremonial round of offering a ritual feast. (2) The food offerings presented at a ceremonial round of offering a ritual feast.





twelve links of dependent arising|The twelve-part mechanism whereby the existence of all samsaric phenomena, especially those of future rebirth, are established by reliance on unawareness: (1) unawareness, (2) affecting impulses, (3) loaded consciousness, (4) nameable mental faculties with or without gross form, (5) stimulators of cognition, (6) contacting awareness, (7) feeling a level of happiness, (8) craving, (9) an obtainer, (10) further existence, (11) conception, and (12) aging and dying.
twelve scriptural categories|The twelve classes of Buddha's scriptural (verbal) teachings divided according to a textual point of view -- namely, (1) expositions on themes of practice, (2) melodic verses, (3) revelatory accounts, (4) metered verses, (5) special verses, (6) ethical narratives, (7) illustrative accounts, (8) ancient narratives, (9) past life accounts, (10) epic presentations, (11) fabulous accounts, and (12) decisive explications.
twelve stimulators of cognition|The twelve classes of nonstatic phenomena that serve as focal and dominating conditions for the six types of cognition -- namely, (1) sights, (2) eye sensors, (3) sounds, (4) ear sensors, (5) smells, (6) nose sensors, (7) tastes, (8) tongue sensors, (9) physical sensations, (10) body sensors, (11) (all) phenomena, and (12) mnd sensors.
Two Buddha-Bodies|See: Two Corpuses of a Buddha
Two Corpuses of a Buddha|(1) A Corpus of Forms (Rupakaya) and (2) Corpus Encompassing Everything (Dharmakaya) of a Buddha.

two truths|(1) In Hinayana, two types of validly knowable phenomena into which all existent phenomena can be divided: superficially true and deepest true phenomena. (2) In Gelug Mahayana, two true facts that can be validly known about any existent phenomenon. (3) In non-Gelug Mahayana, all existent phenomena cognized with dualistic appearance-making and cognized without dualistic appearance-making.
ultimate bodhichitta|See: deepest bodhichitta
ultimate deepest level|See: ultimate level
ultimate level|The final, most profound level of something. Sometimes also translated as deepest level or ultimate deepest level."

ultimate phenomenon, denumerable|See: denumerable ultimate phenomenon
ultimate phenomenon, nondenumerable|See: nondenumerable ultimate phenomenon
ultimate source of safe direction|The Buddhas, as the only ones with full sets of true stoppings and true pathway minds on their mental continuums.
ultimate truth|See: deepest truth
ultimate vehicles of mind|According to the tenets of the Chittamatra Followers of Scripture, three vehicles of mind that lead to three different final goals -- shravaka arhatship, pratyekabuddha arhatship, and Buddhahood -- which, once one has been attained, do not allow for the person who has attained it to achieve one of the other two goals. Thus, shravaka arhats and pratyekabuddha arhats cannot attain enlightenment.
unaffected|See: unaffected phenomenon
unaffected phenomenon|A phenomenon that is not affected by causes or conditions. A synonym for static phenomenon. Often rendered by other translators as unconditioned phenomenon."

unartificial|See: uncontrived
unassociated with confusion|See: untainted
unawareness|(1) According to Vasubandhu and Asanga, not knowing. (2) According to Dharmakirti, knowing in an inverted (incorrect) manner. In both cases, unawareness is of either behavioral cause and effect, or of the lack of an impossible soul or voidness. Translators often render the term as ignorance."
unawareness, automatically arising|See: automatically arising unawareness
unawareness, doctrinally based|See: doctrinally based unawareness
unawareness, link of|See: link of unawareness




uncommendable action|An action that ripens into the experience of suffering by the person who commits it or into a hindrance to his or her spiritual practice. An action that cannot be spoken about with praise.
uncommendable action, naturally|See: naturally uncommendable action
uncommendable action, naturally destructive|See: naturally uncommendable action
uncommendable action, prohibited|See: prohibited uncommendable action
uncommon equanimity|The mental factor of an equal attitude toward everyone, with which one has no feelings of close or far in the thoughts or actions involved in benefiting and helping all limited beings and eliminating their problems. The type of equanimity developed specifically in Mahayana in the context of equalizing and exchanging one's attitudes about self and other, and not taught in common with Hinayana. Also called distinguished equanimity."
uncommon Mahayana equanimity|See: uncommon equanimity

unconditioned phenomenon|See: unaffected phenomenon
uncontrived|A state of mind not mentally constructed by conceptual thought. Also translated as unartificial."
uncontrollably recurring existence|See: samsara
uncontrollably recurring samsara|See: samsara


unhappiness|That feeling which, when it arises, one wants to be parted from it.

unified pair|A pair of items, joined inseparably, in which the initial attainment of both items occurs simultaneously. Sometimes used as a general term whether the initial attainment of both items occurs simultaneously or sequentially.


unimputed|See: true unimputed existence


universal|See: conceptual category
universal, audio|See: audio category
universal, collection|See: collection mental synthesis
universal, kind|See: kind mental synthesis
universal, meaning|See: mental category
universal, object|See: object mental synthesis

universal, sound|See: audio category
unlabored|A state of mind, such as bodhichitta, generated instantly without needing to work oneself up to it, with deliberate effort, through a series of steps, each of which entails a line of reasoning.
unlabored bodhichitta|A bodhichitta aim that arises automatically and effortlessly, without need to build up to it through steps or by relying on lines of reasoning.

unmixed with confusion|See: untainted




unspecified|See: unspecified phenomenon
unspecified phenomenon|A phenomenon that Buddha did not specify as being either constructive or destructive. Also called ethically neutral."
unspecified phenomenon, nonobstructive|See: nonobstructive unspecified phenomenon
unspecified phenomenon, obstructive|See: obstructive unspecified phenomenon

untainted|Something that does not derive from a disturbing emotion or attitude, or is not related in any way with a disturbing emotion or attitude. Also translated as unmixed with confusion or dissociated from confusion. Many translators render this term as uncontaminated."
untainted aggregates|Aggregate factors of someone's experience that do not include the causes that will obtain for that being any further samsaric rebirths.




upsetting|A way of being aware of something that shares five congruent features with craving for one's own tainted, obtainer aggregate factors of experience.

urge|See: mental urge


Vaibhashika|A Hinayana school of Indian Buddhism that does not assert reflexive awareness and does assert external phenomena; a subdivision of the Sarvastivada school of Hinayana. One of the four Indian Buddhist tenet systems studied by all traditions of Tibetan Buddhism.

Vajra Body|See: Vajra Corpus

Vajra Body, Immutable|See: Immutable Vajra Corpus

Vajra Corpus|In some dzogchen systems, the voidness factor of the deep awareness of a Buddha's pure awareness (rigpa); the unchanging nature of the other corpuses of a Buddha. Also called Vajra Body.
Vajra Corpus, Immutable|See: Immutable Vajra Corpus






Vajrayana|The Diamond-strong Vehicle of Mind, within Mahayana, that makes use of the tantra methods. Synonymous with Mantrayana and Tantrayana."
valid bare cognition|Bare cognition that is fresh and nonfallacious. See: bare cognition.
valid cognition|(1) According to Gelug Sautrantika, Gelug Chittamatra, and Gelug Svatantrika-Madhyamaka, a fresh, nonfallacious cognition. (2) According to Gelug Prasangika and all tenet systems according to non-Gelug, a nonfallacious cognition.

validly knowable phenomena|Phenomena that can be the objects of valid cognition. Synonymous with existents."
valid phenomenon|A phenomenon that is validly knowalble now.

valid straightforward cognition|Straightforward cognition that is nonfallacious. See: straightforward cognition.

Vanquishing Master|See: Vanquishing Master Surpassing All
Vanquishing Master Surpassing All|An epithet of a Buddha - one who has conquered (vanquished) all obstacles, attained (mastered) all good qualities, and gone beyond (surpassed) any of the Hindu gods for whom the epithet Bhagavan has also been applied. Some translators render the term as Blessed One."


vast-minded|An adjective used to describe a Mahayana practice, practitioner, person, aim, or motivation. It implies something that involves a mind that is aimed at the vastest goal (enlightenment) for the vastest number of beings (everyone).
Vast Vehicle|See: Vast Vehicle of Mind
Vast Vehicle of Mind|See: Mahayana

vehicle|See: vehicle of mind
Vehicle of Far-reaching Attitudes|See: Paramitayana
vehicle of mind|A level of state of mind that acts as either (1) a vehicle for bringing one to the spiritual goal of either liberation or enlightenment, or (2) the resultant goal of liberation or enlightenment to which one is brought.
verify|To check the validity of something.
verses, melodic|See: melodic verses
verses, metered|See: metered verses
verses, special|See: special verses
vertical mental synthesis|A collection or mental synthesis that extends over time, such as a human body over a lifetime.
very nature of reality|A synonym for voidness (emptiness). Some translators render the term as thusness."

Victorious One|See: Triumphant One

view|In the description of a Buddhist system in terms of the view of reality, a way of meditating, and way of behaving that it espouses, the main way for regarding and understanding reality. See also: outlook.
view, distorted|See: distorted outlook
view of reality, way of meditating, and way of behaving|A way to describe a Buddhist system that specifies it in terms of its main way for regarding and understanding reality, its main topic of meditation, and its main manner of acting in the world.
vinaya|See: rules of discipline

vipassana|Vipassana (Pali for vipashyana) is a state of mind that cognizes clearly, distinctly and directly the true nature of the breath, thoughts, and all other affecting variables -- namely their being nonstatic (impermanent), suffering, and, in relation to them, the lack of an impossible soul. Also, the Theravada practices leading to this state of mind. See also: exceptionally perceptive state of mind.
vira|(spiritual hero)
virini|(spiritual heroine)
virtuous|See: constructive






void form|See: devoid form
voidness|An absence of an impossible way of existing. The impossible way of existing has never existed at all. Translators often render the term as emptiness."


voidness, other|See: other-voidness
voidness, realize|See: realize voidness
voidness, self|See: self-voidness


vow|(1) In the Sautrantika, Chittamatra, and Madhyamaka schools other than Gelug Prasangika, the subsidiary awareness (mental factor) to restrain from a certain type of detrimental behavior, which, during a specific ceremony, one has formally promised to restrain from. (2) In the Vaibhashika and Gelug-Prasangika systems, a non-revealing form on a person's mental continuum that performs the same function as in (1) by shaping one's behavior.
vowed restraint|See: vow
vow preceptor|A spiritual mentor who has kept one or more of the sets of pratimoksha vows purely for a certain number of years and who confers on disciples one of the sets of pratimoksha vows that he or she has kept purely.
vows, bodhisattva|See: bodhisattva vows
vows for individual liberation|See: pratimoksha vows
vows, take|See: take vows
vows, tantric|See: tantric vows
wandering being|A being that wanders from one uncontrollably recurring rebirth to the next; a being caught in samsara. Synonymous with limited being (sentient being).
wandering, mental|See: mental wandering

wavering, indecisive|See: indecisive wavering
way of cognitively taking an object|Also called: way of taking an object
ways of being aware of something|One of the three kinds of nonstatic phenomena -- all types of mental activity cognizing an object.



what is supported|See: something that is supported by something else
what supports|See: something that supports something else
wholehearted commitment to a spiritual mentor|See: relating to a spiritual mentor in a healthy manner
winds of karma|In the Kalachakra system, the subtle energy-winds that carry the impulses of karma -- either the karmic impulses that draw one into actions or the karmic impulses with which one carries out physical or verbal actions.


without a referent aim|A state of mind, such as immeasurable compassion, that lacks focus on the three circles ('khor-gsum) involved -- the action itself (in the case of compassion, wishing all beings to be free from suffering), the object, and the agent -- existing in an impossible way. Also translated as: unaimed.



words, permitted|See: permitted words

worldly|See: mundane

would-be divine|A class of limited beings characerized by extreme jealousy toward the divine beings, with whom they continually fight. Also translated as quasi-divine beings, anti-gods, or simply as asuras."
wrong livelihood|A dishonest means of earning a livelihood or procuring offerings.
wrong view|See: distorted outlook
wrong views, sixty-two|See: sixty-two wrong views




Yogachara|Another name for the Chittamatra school of Indian Buddhism.
Yogachara-Svatantrika|According to Gelug, a subdivision of the Svatantrika Madhyamaka tenet system that does not assert extermal phenomena, but which does assert reflexive awareness.







zestful vigor|The mental factor of taking joy and pleasure in being constructive, which accompanies joyful perseverance.
zhinay|See: stilled and settled state of mind

